HOWARD:
OR,
THE MYSTERIOUS DISAPPEARANCE.
CHAPTER I.
The Fleet in Hampton RoadsThe signal for getting
underweigh
The
convoy of merchantmenBrief sketch of the
origin of the Tripolitan warGroups on shoreThe
squadron
makes sailThe spectacleThe manuvres of the brig
of warThe curiosity of the observersSundry speculations
of an old sultThe brig takes on board a passengerNight
.
It
was on a bright, breezy morning early in June, 1801, that the
signal for getting underweigh was fired from a flag ship of a fleet
of vessels of war riding at anchor in Hampton Roads. The fleet
consisted of three frigates and a small gun-brig of twelve guns.
The frigates were unequal in size and weight of metal. The largest
was the `President' 44; the next the `Philadelphia' 38; and the
smallest one the `Essex,' 32. They had the day before dropped
down to their anchorage ready for sea. Their destination was the
Mediterranean.
The system of piracy which had been for more than a century
pursued by the Princes and Pachas of the Barbary States,
especially
,
Algiers, Tunis and Tripoli upon the commerce of all nations, at
length called for the warlike indignation of the European powers,
which had long openly recognized this systemized buccaneering by
paying the piratical princes an annual tribute to insure the safety
of their respective merchant vessels. This weak and temporizing
policy strengthened the evil, while it tarnished the escutcheon of
every nation that consented to resort to such degrading measures.
Emboldened by their submission to the terms of protection these
royal sea-robber each year grew more exhorbitant in their demands
of tribute; and on being refused by England and France further
payment of protection money, they seized upon their vessels and
made captives of those on board. The spirit of the British people
was roused, and a fleet was sent against the strong holds of these
Corsairs. Algiers and Tunis were severally bombarded and
block-aded
,
but with little further result than compelling these Regencies
to consent to take the old amount of tribute. And with this
success
,
if that can be called successful which reflects dishonor upon
the party, England withdrew her ships of war. The United States
falling in with the custom of European nations also found it
necessary
to become tributary to these Barbaric Powers, for the
preservation
of her infant commerce. But at length, as the American mer
chantmen began to increase in numbers and to whiten every sea
with their canvass, and especially to crowd the Mediterranean with
their fleets, the Pasha of Trpoli, protested against the small amount
of tribute he received compared with the amount of the commerce
of the United States that passed his piratical shores, and haughtily
demanded of the United States government that it should be
increased
.
`You have made concessions to the Dey of Algiers and bribed
Tunis,' was his language; `Algiers has received a frigate while I
have received none. You express friendship and say you desire to
do justice. We could wish that your expressions were followed by
deeds and not by empty words. You will therefore endeavor to
satisfy us by a good manner of proceeding so that for the future we
shall have no cause of complaint! But if only flattering words are
meant, without performance, every one will act as he finds it
expedient
.
A speedy answer is required, as a delay on your part
cannot
but be prejudicial to your interests.'
Such was the bold and imperative language of the piratical chief
of Tripoli not only to the American Consulbut also in a
communication
addressed to the President of the United States.
This haughty missile being unnoticed, the Pacha signified to the
Consul at Tripoli that unless a large present in money and a frigate
were sent to him within six months he would declare war against
his government and let loose his corsairs upon its commerce.
The period he designated having expired without the tribute, he
despatched an officer with a body of soldiers to the dwelling of the
American Consul to cut down the flag-staff. By this act war was
virtually declared, and the same day a fleet of his heaviest cruisers
put to sea to prey upon the American merchantmen in those
waters
.
The delay of the usual tribute, and the indifference with which
the Pacha's menacing letter to the President was met was owing
to a new policy determined upon, with reference to the Barbary
Powers, on the part of the U. S. Government. Hitherto, its course
had been weak and degrading. It had acknowledged its weakness
for years by being, with all Europe, tributary to them. But the
disgrace was keenly felt by the States, and the power was only
wanting, for them to throw off this stigma fixed upon the national
shield. The war which had just terminated so successfully with
France had shown the navy its strength. It had created also a
warlike
spirit in the nation, and elevated her pride of character as a
people and as individuals. It was at this period of conscious
power
,
and desire of distinction among nations, that the menacing
demand
for additional tribute was made of the United States
Government
by the Pacha of Tripoli. This menace at such a time was
enough to rouse all the energies of the new Republic. The
demand
was openly pronounced an insult; and the idea of being
longer
tributary made the blood burn in the cheek of every true
American
.
`Shall we,' said her orators, `who have sustained a successful
war with England, and made France so lately acknowledge our
power, shall we pay tribute and bow the neck to the yoke of a
barbarian
Corsair? Shall we protect our flag from insult by
disgraceful
bribes when it is in our power to do it with our arms? Shall
we, free-born and free, be tributary to a despot? No. Rather let
us assert our dignity and show these nations of pirates that we are
their masters! Let us dictate terms to them, not they to us! We
have been long enough tributary. Tunis is dissatisfied with our
last present, saying the guns are too light and the oars too long!
Algiers finds fault with us for want of promptness! Morocco will
soon expect tribate also. Let us no more pursue this timid and
disgraceful policy, but at once send our ships of war to their coasts
to teach them submission or drive them from the seas!'
These sentiments found an echo in every bosom throughout the
land, and a squadron was at once ordered by Congress to be got
ready, and despatched to the Mediterrancan. Before the six months
had expired, which the Pacha had fixed for an answer to his
demand
to come from the United States Government, a squadron
was fitted out and ready for sea. It had dropped down to
Hampton
Roads, the day defore the opening of our story, to wait for its
commander, Commodore Dale, whose broad pennant was hoisted
on the President, 44. This officer had been detained in
Washington
waiting for despatches, and reached his ship in a pilot-boat at
sun-rise, when he instantly gave the signal for putting to sea.
The report of the heavy guns, drew many people to the different
points of land commanding an open view of the road-stead. The
warlike mission upon which the fleet was to be sent, was well
known, and there was the deepest interest felt in every thing
concerning
it. It was at that period
the
navy of the Union. There
were a few other vessels of war in different ports, but these were
all that were then in commission. Around that little squadron
were concentrated the pride, the hopes, the ambition of every
American, who loved the navy and rejoiced in her laurels. She
was then just acquiring that popularity, as a branch of the national
defence which she now so eminently enjoys, and which she so
well merits.
The vessels of war were not alone in the Roads. A fleet of at
least twenty merchantmen, consisting of ships, barques and brigs,
and two or three clipper schooners were anchored to leeward,
waiting for convoy to the Mediterranean and the coast of Africa,
whither they were bound; for the seas between Gibraltar and
Mogadore were infested by piratical cruisers, which were
constantly
hovering about the straits, vigilantly upon the watch to pounce
upon any unprotected vessel of any nation.
The morning was clear, and without a cloud in the sky. A
light westerly wind just stirred the trees on land, and rippled the
waters of the bay. The blue wreath of smoke from the gun was
borne by it slowly sea-ward, and had not faded into the air ere the
frigates' three top-sails were spread to it, her jib was set and she
was seen by the spectators on shore to move majestically from her
anchorage ground, with her yards squared and her head seaward.
In a few moments afterwards, her top-gallant sails and royals
were displayed aloft, and with her courses hauled up and every
thing drawing free, the noble vessels stood out to sea.
The attention of those on shore was so much taken up with
watching the motions and preparations of the flag-ship, that they
did not observe that the other vessels of war followed her
manuvres
in every respect, and were under sail and standing
seaward
almost as soon as she was. The merchantmen also got
underweigh
,
but with less diligence and skill, the leading frigate
being far to le eward before the first merchant vessel got her anchor
up. In less than half an hour all the vessels were underweigh
and standing eastward, presenting a fine sight to those who were
looking from the shore. The wind freshened as the squadron
moved seawhrd, and as every vessel had early set her lower studden
sails, the picturesque effect of the marine scene was thereby
greatly
increased. The whole sea was white with canvass; and to the
eye of a poet it would have seemed that a city of white marble
pyramids was in majestic motion over the waves.
`That's what I call a sight, to make a blind man overhaul his
eye-tackles, and take the hatches off his spy-glass,' said a sailor
amid a group on a pier-head, who had lost his leg in a fight with a
French cruiser. `Them frigates will spank it away to the straits,
and by sun-down every merchantman 'll be left hull down astern;
and Dale is not the man to heave too for 'em, if there's any
powder
to be burned ahead.'
`I used to sail in a brig out o' Charleston,' answered a sort of
fresh-water looking sailor, with a short pipe in his mouth, `and
used to think there was nothin' like a snug built trader; but since
I've cruised in a frigate I can't bear a merchant vessel!'
`Jiss so,' answered Bill with the one leg; `it's as different as
ridin' in a stage-coach and a market-wagon, ashore! Did'nt you
see how altogether them frigates topsails fell, as if one man held
the ropes of 'em all and let go at once! I wish I was aboard there.
It makes me proud to look at the beauties!'
`I should think, friend, you'd had enough of the sea from your
appearance,' said a man near him who looked like a shop-keeper.
`And do you think, master, because I've lost one leg fightin'
Jonny Cropeaus, I can't spare another to fight the Algerine
corsair
on,' answered Bill indignantly. `A man's limbs are his
country's
.
My country has got one o' mine, and she's welcome to the
rest.'
`Bravo, Jack,' cried several voices. `Hurra for the old tar!'
`Let's give the fleet a hurra?' cried the old seaman, animated
by the praise; and flinging up his tarpaulin he gave three cheers,
in which the crowd loudly accompanied him.
`There's a gun fired from the leading frigate,' said the sailor who
had sailed in the merchantman, `she must have heard us and
answered
it!'
`That's all you know about the navy ships,' said the old tar;
`they don't burn gun powder for nothing. They could'nt hear us,
it stands to reason for she's a league to leeward; and if they did
that gun was not fired for us. She would'nt ha' answered a
cannon
much less a hurra. Merchant ships may do such things for
they don't know no better. Keep your eye on the fleet and you'll
see, if you know how to understand sea-manuveres, that that
gun was a signal.'
`You are right, Bill, for there flies a signal at the gun-brig's
fore,' said the other sailor.
`I know'd it, and the frigate has another set! The gun was
fired to draw her attention before signalizing. Now watch her.
The other frigates don't mind the signal and stand on. There see
that manuvre! The flag-ship has hove to, the brig has luffed a
point and is standing on for her!'
The attention of the group who had heard these remarks and had
witnessed the interchange of signals between the leading frigate
and brig was now wholly drawn to these two vessels. The brig
stood steadily down for the `44,' and soon was seen to heave to
under her lee. A boat was put off from her and boarded the
frigate. In the meanwhile the rest of the squadron and the fleet
of merchantmen kept on their course until the last lagger of the
convoy had got abeam of the two vessels, when the frigate was
seen to fill away and keep on her former course. The brig soon
after followed her example in squaring her yards, but instead of
keeping on with the frigate tacked ship and stood back up the bay,
close hauled on the wind. The frigate moved on majestically among
the merchant vessels, like an Eagle mingling with a flight of
pigeons, and when her hull was beneath the line of the horizon she
had nearly taken her former place as the leading vessel of the
wide-spread
,
far-stretching fleet.
The crowd now began to retire from the pier, but many idlers
and curious persons lingered to watch the manuvres of the
returning
brig; and various were the speculations upon the object
which had brought her back. The old salt with the one leg
seemed
to be the oracle of the highest authority in this matter.
`You don't know nothing about the matter, Mr. Peter last,
said the seaman biting off three inches of `pig-tail,' and stowing it
away in his larboard jaw; `in the trade o' building shoes and such
like leather sheathin' for foot-bottoms, your opinion mout be as
good as another man's; but a shoe and a ship is different
guess-sort
o' things. You're all out when you say that pr'aps Capt'n
Dale has forgot his trunk and sent the brig back to port to get it!
And Sam Talbot the tavern keeper there shows his ignorance o'
ships when he gives it as his 'pinion the brig's come back to get
the Captain's case o' liquors. But what can land-lubbers know
about sea matters?'
`Well, then, Bill, what is your opinion?' said little Sammy
Talbot
the publican.
`Why, at first I thought the brig was ordered to windward to
whip up the stragglers and keep the craft all together, and to
prevent
any on 'em from droppin astern and gettin out o' the convoy;
for the merchantmen in convoy, are just as troublesome as so many
sheep. A little brig is jist as necessary to a frigate to help her, as
a dog to a shepherd when he's drivin his flock to market. But you
see the brig's coming up to windward and turned heel to the whole
fleet!
`And now Bill what can have brought her back again?' asked
Sammy.
`This is it, or may I never see a Frenchman at the end o' my gun
again; the brig's ordered back to land some o' the long-tog shore
dignitaries o' government what went down aboord along with
Captain Dale. That you may be sure of! and if we stay here we
shall see 'em land!'
`There you're mistaken, Bill,' said a fisherman near. `I was
close under the stern of the forty-four when the pilot-boat run
aboard of her with the Commodore and there was nobody went up
the side with him but a midshipman.'
Bill looked round at the speaker with a glance of contempt, and
replied scornfully,
`What does a fishing-skipper know 'bout sich matters! I'm
right, and you'll see. But if 'taint this, she's put back to send the
Captain's last despatches ashore.'
`The pilot-boat could have taken these when she leaves her,'
said the fisherman.
`So it would,' responded several voices. Bill looked at the
fisherman again with a scowl and then glancing round upon the
fickle crowd who were disposed to regard the new comer the wisest
oracle, he hobbled away in great ire.
The brig in the meanwhile stood in on her starboard tack as if
she would run for Norfolk and then going about stretched away
up the bay until her topsails dipped. The group on the pier had
one by one dispersed and the several individuals who had composed
it, went to their various occupations. The motions of the brig,
however, were watched by others from different positions along the
coast; and particularly by gentlemen at their plantation houses,
with glasses. Towards noon when nearly up with York river she
was seen to tack and stand south with the wind abeam, and only
her fore course, topsails, jib and tri-sail set. At the close of the
day she had returned nearly to the anchorage ground in the
Roads from which the squadron had weighed in the morning. Her
near neighborhood again drew many persons to the pier and
headlands
to watch her and speculate upon her movements. Slowly
she stood on, keeping a south-east course and running only under
her fore-topsail and jib. The had evidently shortened sail with
some object in view, connected with the shore, off which she was
hovering.
`If I did'nt know that craft to be the U. S. brig Enterprize,' said
Bill, who had-recovered his temper and was once more the oracle
of the group, `I should, from her suspicious mannvres to-day, set
her down for a buccaneer or a slaver. But the motions of war
vessels is of necessity sometimes secret and mysterious. I'd like
to overhaul her Captain's head locker and see what orders he's got
to keep him shieing about the land in this fashion. There she
stands in towards the pier, and we shall soon learn.'
The brig was now within a third of a mile from the shore. The
sun was just setting and sending his golden line of light in level
streams across the molten wave. The sails of the beautiful and
warlike looking brig were delicately encrimsoned with the touches
of his glowing pencil, and the rippling waters of the Roads danced
merrily in their burnished glory. The green shores bending around
the bay wore a richer hue of emerald, and the white villas and
spires stood in beautiful relief against lawn, forest, and sky. The
whole scene around the fair bay was picturesque and unusually
lovely. The brig sat upon the water in the midst of the sunset
scene, around the centre of all like the goddess of the hour,
warlike
yet graceful, with bright streamers flying at the fore and at her
peak. Suddenly the sun fell beneath the horizon; a flash, and a
jet of blue smoke shot from her bow, followed a moment afterwards
by the deep thunder of the evening gun. The broad flag curving
above her stern at the same instant descended to the quarter-deck,
and slowly over land and water came a soft shadowing like the first
breath of night.
While the group were watching a circlet of blue smoke from the
gun, that was ascending with an undulating motion, high above
the brig, while the body of the cloud rolled heavily away, low
upon the water, a carriage drove rapidly down the pier. A
gentleman
with a cloak on his arm alighted from it and hastened
to the extremity of the mole-head. He waved a handkerchief,
and in a moment after the quarter boat was lowered from the brig,
which hove to. In a few minutes the boat reached the pier.
`Way enough,' cried the midshipman, and the six oars rose
simultaneously into the air and remained upwright, while the
coxswain steered the gig to the foot of the stairs. `We feared you
would miss the brig, sir!' he said.
The gentleman, sprang in followed by a servant with his
baggage
,
and seating himself replied,
`I was surprised to learn as I got into town just now, that the
fleet had sailed, and feared I had lost my passage in the frigate.
But I see the brig has waited for me.
`Let fall! Now give way!' cried the young officer to the men,
and the boat shot away swiftly from the pier and its crowd of
curious
observers. `Captain Dale did not open a letter to him in the
package delivered to him by the Secretary of State, imforming him
that you were to meet the fleet in the Roads, until we had nearly
run out to the Capes, where he sent the brig back. We have been
standing off and on all day and have just run in expecting you
about this time. We have been watching the pier-head closely
for a signal ever since noon.'
`I am sorry to have detained the brig,' said the gentleman, who
was a newly appointed Consul to Algiers, going out in the
frigate
;
`but I could not leave the country without paying my friends
near Richmond a parting visit. But I trust we shall overtake the
squadron!'
`Yes; in less than eight and forty hours. The convoy will
keep them dragging along at a slow rate. The brig is a fast
walker
,
and can overhaul any thing she chooses to! See what a pretty
model, sir! How like a sea-bird she sits upon the water. She
rakes just enough to make her feel her masts and give her a saucy
air!'
`She is certainly a beautiful vessel, though I am not sailor
enough to make my opinion of any value,' said the Consul,
admiring
the symmetry of her yards, and the neatness of her top
hamper
.
`But she presents a very neat and tasteful appearance, and
is a fine object to the eye.'
`Way enough!' cried the midshipman as the boat shot along
side.
The men simultaneously tossed their oars into the air, and the
boat run under the gangway. The man-ropes were thrown into
her, and the passengers who had so long detained the brig, was
received on board with due honor, and the gig was hoisted up again
at the starboard quarter.
`Now all hands make sail,' shouted the captain. `Set every
thing that will draw, Mr. Downie,' he said to the officer of the
deck; the wind has nearly all gone down with the Sun, and there
is scarcely breeze enough to force her along three knots!'
The brig was soon enveloped in a cloud of canvass from deck to
truck, and moved through the water with just motion enough to
give a low, rippling sound under her counter. Gradually, as the
shades of deepening night fell over the sea, she faded from the eyes
of the groups of spectators on shore, who now severally dispersed
to their homes: having been rewarded for their day's curiosity by
its full gratification; for Sammy the publican, had in a whisper,
asked the servant of the Consul, who his master was; and the
information
he received from the communicative black, he was not
backward in dispensing for the general benefit.
`Just as I said! I know'd it Sammy,' said Bill, stumping up the
pier after this rubicund nosed little personage; `I know'd they were
waiting for some Government man.'
`And you said so, Bill, too!'
`That I did. Talk to a man-o'-war's man! He knows more in
his little finger than a land lubber in his whole head!'
`And 'specially sich a intelligent man as you are, Bill!'
`You has got sense, Sammy, if you be a shore-fowl,' answered
Ben, not a little gratified at the flattery of the Inn-keeper, who
picked up all the old tar's stray sixpences, and therefore found it
for his interest to keep him in good favor with him.
`Nobody after this 'll dare to dispute you, Bill, in sea matters,'
he said as they reached the Inn door.
`Not they, Sammy. What does a shoe-maker or a skipper of a
fishin' smack know o' men-o'-war manuvre?'
`About as much as you do about preachin,' said the publican.
`And that is not true nother, Sammy, for I onct preached a
sarmont
and convarted a woolly nigger. Come, let's stump in and
have a glass, and I'll tell you how it vos.'
Bill then hobbled in with a thumping noise of his wooden leg,
like a washerwoman's pounder; and seating himself with a stiff
glass of half and half grog in his hand, he began to relate his story,
to which, as it does not materially concern our own, we shall not
trouble the reader with listening.
CHAPTER II.
The calm continuesThe way to detect the direction of the wind
The Consul and CaptainThe moon rising, and the view
of the shoresThe villa of Colonel DudleyThe discovery
with the spy-glassThe currentThe lead hoveThe
wind risesThe brig in motionThe strange craftThe
brig is hove toThe stranger and mystery
.
The
wind died with the day; and the brig-of-war had not sailed
far from the place where she had filled away, after receiving on
board the Algerine Consul, before it fell calm. The rose-colored
glow of the western sky yet lingered on her masses of canvass,
tinging them with a delicate flush, and the dark green line of the
shores, with their irregularities caused by woods, towers or
hill-tops
,
was plainly visible, with here and there a light flashing off
across the water. The beautiful vessel lay half a league from the
land, motionless,
`Like a painted ship upon a painted ocean.'
with all her sails still spread to catch the faintest zephyr that flitted
past. The glow of the west was fast fading into the gray of
evening
,
and stars in their splendor, and planets with their nearer and
purer light, shone from the deep heavens afar, and night and
silence
asserted their empire. The Captain of the brig and his
passenger
walked the starboard side of the quarter-deck together, the
former occasionally stopping to gaze over the taffrail, and to lift his
hand to the west to feel for the wind. The lieutenant of the watch
paced impatiently the larboard quarter, and at every other turn in
his walk he paused to gaze in the direction in which he expected
it to breeze up. The men of the watch were dispersed forward, or
in the waist, some leaning over the bulwarks looking to windward,
others resting on the guns, or two and two walking fore and aft
the narrow space between the windlass and the heel of the
bowsprit
.
There was no swell to make the brig uneasy, and not a rope
or sail moved. All was motionless, and the men who spoke
together
lowered their voices as if in instinctive sympathy with the
silence
.
`Well this is dull work, Mr. Merley, said the young Captain of
the brig as he stopped in his silent walk, and lifted the palm of his
hand to the west; `we are likely to lay here till the next flood
before
the wind breezes up.'
`The frigates doubtless have the same calm,' remarked the
Consul
,
`so there will be nothing lost.'
`No; they carry to sea the same wind they took off shore, and
are no doubt making eight knots at this moment, while we have
not air enough to open the folds of a lady's pocket handkerchief!
Besides, the current is drifting us toward the land, in the direction
of Norfolk Head, and we may have to drop anchor.'
`I am vexed with myself for being the cause of this annoyance
to you, Captain Sterret,' answered the Consul; but my
appointment
to Algiers was so sudden that I should have been unable to
have accepted it if I had left Washington with Commodore Dale,
and not have been able to have visited Richmond before sailing.'
`It is a part of the brig's duty in the service, this delay on your
behalf, Mr. Merley, and I do not reflect upon you at all,' answered
the Captain in a frank and slightly apolegetic tone. `We sailors are
privileged to grumble in a calm, and find fault with the winds when
they don't blow to suit us. If this calm only keeps you
my
passenger
to the Miditerranean, I shall not regret it; and if it holds
long we shall certainly not reach Gibraltar till after the
commander's
frigate.'
`I feel a light air, sir, coming from the South,' said the
lieutenant
of the watch.'
`Your hand is more sensitive than mine, Hardy; I feel none.'
`By wetting your finger you will be able to feel it, as the side
from which the wind is coming will feel the coldest.'
`I do; the wind will come out from the South; and now I see
the hazes lifting there away. We shall have wind before long.
Take in the studden sails alow and aloft, and let us have the brig
in trim for whatever a good Providence pleases to send us. I
always
look for squalls from that quarter at this season.'
The brig was soon lying under her usual canvass, her royals set,
and her courses up. When at length the decks were all cleared,
and quiet once more reigned on board, the Consul's attention was
drawn to a deepening glow in the east, which he pointed out to
the Captain, saying:
`That must be a vessel on fire at sea.'
`Watch it a few moments, Mr. Merley,' said the Captain
smiling
.
Gradually the rich soft flush spread over the Eastern horizon,
and suddenly a crimson spot like the edge of a globe of heated iron,
rose above the verge of the sea. In a few moments, enlarging till
the whole of its deep red disk was seen, came the moon into full
sight, flinging her crimson beams far across the level water.
`How wildly beautiful is moon-rising upon the sea,' exclaimed
the Consul with delight. `At its first appearance it resembled the
light from a ship in flames beneath the horizon! See, as it
ascends
,
how it loses its blood-like hue and assumes its native silvery
brightness!'
`It will bring us wind, sir,' said the Captain, who looked upon
every thing in a practical manner; and we shall have it from the
eastern board instead of the south, Mr. Hardy.'
`I think so, sir; I can feel no air from the south now.'
`If we get it from the east we shall have to beat to sea. With
the wind abeam she would not be long astern of the fleet. But
patience
,
patience. It will blow from some quarter, and then we
must thank God and brace our yards to meet it.'
`The light reveals objects on shore with singular distinctness,'
said Mr. Merley, looking over the quarter. `Are not these villas
that show so white?'
`Yes, sir. There are many handsome country seats along this
coast, and many fine families. There, on that headland, you see
a stately dwelling. Take the glass sir! You discover that it is an
imposing mansion!'
`Yes. It is surrounded with verandahs, and has extensive
ornamental
grounds.'
`It is the residence of Colonel Dudley.'
`The ex-governor under the colonial regime? I understand he
is wealthy and hospitable, and has a very interesting family.'
`Yes; but people still think he is inclined to Toryism. You
know he took no part in the war of Independence.'
`Yet he has taken active part in our politics, and I am told has a
son he intends to put into the navy. I would trust him, from what
I know of his character.
`I still have suspicions of these old colonial aristocrats. They
never can get over their attachment to royalty. Colonel Dudley
was cadet of one of the noblest English families; and he who has a
brother a lord and sons who may become noble, can have little love
for republican institutions.'
`It may be as you say. He has a very fine estate, if all that
range of fields which I sweep with my glass, appends to the
mansion
.'
`It is a principality in itself. Don't you feel a wind coming
from the North, Mr. Hardy?'
`It feels like it. It seems to be flirting all round the compass,
like a belle in a ball-room. It certainly does blow faintly from the
north.'
`Than we shall have it from the nor' west, with a full cheek
before
midnight. How is it now, helmsman?'
`Nearly three bells, sir.'
`Heave the lead, Mr. Hardy. I think we are drifting fast
landward
;
and there is an ugly rock, with its head just under water
off this point, I should rather the brig should not scrape
acquaintance
with!'
`Mark under water,
nine;
' shouted the leadsman, from the fore
chains.
`This is four fathoms shoaler than we ought to be in, with the
shore bearing as it does.'
`Quar-ter less nine!' sung again the leadsman in a loud, long
drawling, yet not unmusical voice, that sounded singularly wild
and startling upon the silence of night.
`We drift in, and unless the wind soon breezes up we shall have
to drop our anchor, or get out the boats!'
`By the mark eight!' sung the leadsmen.
`There is a strong current setting shore-ward,' said the Captain
to his lieutenant.
`It is the top of the flood, making up Norfolk harbor, sir.'
`If we shoal the water any more we must send the boats ahead
and haul off. Come, blow wind, good wind! Give us a little
breath, and I'll swear never to speak ill of you more, blow you high
or blow you low!'
`There is an object moving in the shadow of the land, I think
Captain,' said the Consul, who had still his glass directed towards
the shore, in the direction of the headland. `It is very indistinct,
but it appears to me like a small boat.'
`Some fisherman out, probably,' answered the Captain
carelessly
.
`I distinctly feel a wind in the north, Mr. Hardy. We shall
have it from that quarter.'
`Quarter less eight!' sung the man in the chains.'
`We shall have to send out the boats, if we shoal this way!
Order the crews of the gig and cutter aft here, to stand by to lower
their boats, Mr. Hardy. Hold on! There the breeze wakes up!'
`It stirs the water, sir.'
`I see it. It comes out of the north. Stand by your lifts and
barces, and be ready to take the benefit of the first cat's paw.'
`That is approaching, Captain, and if it is a fisherman, he is riding
on a fishes back. It looks like a man paddling himself along on
the water, with no boat beneath him!'
`Let me take a look at him, sir. It may be old Nep himself,
coming aboard to pay us a visit, or ask for a passage to the
Mediterranean
.'
The Captain took the glass in his hand, and after arranging the
focus to suit his eye, levelled it shore-ward at the object which had
attracted the attention of the Consul.
`It is a curious craft, and as you say, looks like a person
walking
on the water. Now I can see him plainer still! It is a man
paddling himself along towards the brig, but what he is in I can't
see. I discover no boat.'
`Perhaps, sir, his boat has filled, but not sunk, and he is trying
to reach the brig,' said the lieutenant.
`It may be so,' said the Captain again levelling his glass. `Man
the third cutter and send out and pick him up.'
`Third cutters away!' cried the lieutenant.
The shrill whistle of the boatswain, was heard piping the order,
and the lads sprung aft to the fall.
`Vast there a bit,' cried the Captain' `I can see him now as he
approaches. He is paddling on a plank, and makes good headway
at that! He'll reach the brig without our help, Mr. Hardy!'
The object of general interest grew momently plainer to the eyes
of all on board, and rapidly approached the brig. He was
paddling
very fast, and the quick strokes of his paddle distinctly
reached
the ears of those who were watching from the brig.
`Stand by there in the gangway one of you, to throw him a
rope,' cried the Captain removing the glass from his eye. He is
quite a youth, Mr. Merley, I saw with the glass as the moon fell
full on his face and figure.'
`He must have met with some accident, and has saved himself
on a plank,' said the Consul.
`Or more likely some runascape from the shore, trying to get
out of the country in the brig,' said the Captain, `There she
breezes! Brace up Mr. Hardy. We'll soon have a piping wind
spanking down from the north. What water there in the chains?'
`Eight fathom, sir!'
`Well. Come in board! Now she feels the air aloft? See how
prettily her royal swells out like the breast of a pair of well-fed
partridges, Mr. Merley. Now her top-gallant sails stretch their
idle wings and fill out! Hark there is music! Hear that ripple
about her rudder. Give the forward braces another pull, Mr.
Hardy
.
That's well! A small pull men, at the weather main-brace.
Well! now her top-sails begin to make very handsome baloons, and
her jib looks as if she wanted to stretch ahead, and walk after the
frigates on her own responsibility. Dash! There breaks a wave
under her bow! The sweetest music I ever heard, Mr. Merley, is
that of a vessel getting under motion after a calm!'
`But the lad on the plank, sir,' said the Consul, who had been
watching him through the glass, while the brig was being brought
under steerage way.
`I had like to have forgotten him. I don't see him.'
`He is off the quarter here; the change in the heading of the
vessel has thrown him in this direction.'
`Yes I see him now! He is waving his hand. He finds we are
running away from him. Hark, he hails! Aye, aye, ahoy! What
in the devil can he want, half a league at sea on a plank at this
time of night, or at any time of day for that matter. Mr. Hardy
we shall have to heave the brig to for him.'
`I trust so, Captain,' said Mr. Merley, with deep interest, for
the fate of the person, manifested in his manner.
`It is a pity to lose a thimble full of this fine breeze, but it won't
do to leave the poor fellow, whatever has brought him to sea on a
plank, to the fate that will probably befal him before morning, if
this wind rises to blow stronger as it is likely to do.'
`Brig ahoy!' came clear and strong across the water, evidently
in the voice of a young man. The tone was manly and full, and
wholly divested of any thing like apprehension.
`Heave her to, Mr. Hardy, and send out the third cutter.'
`Aye, aye, sir,' cried the officer, passing the order forward.
The men sprung to obey it with alacrity, for the man was
plainly
visible to every eye, and all the men as well as the officers, felt
an interest in knowing who he was. In a few seconds the boat
which was hung astern was in the water, and the men sliding down
the falls into her, were soon giving way in the direction of the young
man, whose features were now plainly visible through the glass.
The brig which had been running three and a half or four knots,
ni the meanwhile, was luffed so as to shiver her head sails and
deaden
her headway, to a couple of knots.
`I like that chap's voice. It has metal in it, and rings with a
manly tone,' said the Captain, as he watched the boat as it pulled
towards him.
`What can be his motive in putting to sea on so frail a support!'
observed Mr. Merley.
`Some freak; or some rogue. If he had escaped from a wreck,
he would have put in towards land instead of paddling from it.'
`I should think so. He was close in under the land in the range
of the villa of Colonel Dudley, when he first attracted my
attention
.'
`He has been taken into the boat. Luff a little, helmsman!
The lads will have a long pull after us.'
`We shall lose quite as much time, sir, in holding to the wind
as in heaving to. Had'nt I better lay the maintopsail to the mast?'
asked the lieutenant.
The Captain cast a glance astern at the boat, which did not
seem to approach very perceptibly, and then over the side to mark
her rate through the water, and gave the order to heave to. In a
few minutes the cutter was along side, and the Captain after
giving
a loud order to fill away, went to the gangway to see who it
was that had so strangely detained the brig.
`Come, sir, jump on deck out o' that, and report yourself,' he
called out to him. `You are a pretty fellow to bring a U. S. Brig
to, in this style. What's the name of your craft, hey?' said the
Captain half-angrily, half in good humor, looking over the side.
`I beg your pardon for delaying the vessel, sir,' replied the
young man from the boat; and then seizing the man-rope, he
lightly ascended the side ladder and sprung upon deck.
He was a youth not more than nineteen, with a tall, manly
figure
,
and a countenance dark but singularly handsome He was
bareheaded and without jacket or shoes; but there was about him
an air of refinement and birth, that needed none of the
conventional
aids of costume to indicate his position in society. The
moon shone bright and clearly exhibited him to every eye.
`How is it that you have exposed yourself at sea in this
manner
,
sir!' asked the Captain, after observing him a moment in
silence
.
`I was in hopes to have reached the brig without giving you
any trouble: and but for the wind which set you in motion, I
should have done so.'
`But what object had you in boarding her, and in this style?'
`A love for the sea,' he said in a careless tone. `I learned you
were bound for the Medeterranean, and that there would probably
by service seen there. I would have shipped earlier could I have
done so.'
`You don't mean to say you wish to come in the brig before the
mast!'
`Yes sir, if you will permit me to do so.'
`And to sail in the brig, you put off to her on a plank.'
`Yes sir. You were becalmed, and I believed I could easily
reach her.'
`You have deserved well the berth you sought, and shall have;
for true men are worth their weight in gold these days.'
`Have you been to sea?' `No, sir.'
`Mr. Hardy, you will take this young man into your watch, and
the gunner will add him to his mess.'
`I thank you, sir,' answered the youth with an expressive tone
of voice. `I regret I should have detained the brig'
`Not at all. You are worth all the delay, or I am mistaken in
my man.'
`Come bear a hand there, and have that cutter up at the devits
in a trice,' shouted the lieutenant, as the Captain walked aft to
the quarter deck, where stood Mr. Merley.
`Consul,' said he, in the frank seaman-like way peculiar to him,
`did you notice that young man's appearance.'
`Yes, and was struck with it. He sprung upon the deck from
the gun as he came on board, and stood before you with the air of
a young Indian Chief.'
`I noticed it. His place, let me tell you, Consul, is not
forward
of the capstan; and if he goes to sea long, he will not be a
great while before the mast.'
`It is my impression, from his appearance, that he belongs to
some highly respectable family, and has left home privately, from
a spirit of adventure.'
`That is mine also. I thought so when he said he wanted to
ship. But I did not let him discover my thoughts, but treated him
as if he was only fitted for the place he sought. He is evidently
bold, fearless and adventurous, and so long as he chooses to remain
in the brig he will be useful.'
`But if you believe him to be a respectable young man, ought
you suffer him to remain with the crew?' asked the Consul.
`And why not, Mr. Merley? It is no degradation to serve
before
the mast. Some of the best officers in the navy came into it
over the bows. Promotion is free to talent and energy. If this
youthbe he the son of the Presidenthas taken a liking to the
sea, preferring it to the artificial life of a city, or the atmosphere of
a drawing-room, let him follow the bent of his humor. If he is
true to himself he will make for himself a name. If half of the
young men in shops would go to sea before the mast, they would
make better members of society, and ennoble their own natures.
The profession of a sailor is truly noble. His home is ever between
the ocean and sky. Nothing about him is low and debasing. All
is grand, vast, sublime. God's Heaven is above him, with its stars
and silence, and God's sea is beneath him, with the eternal music
of its waves. At sea men learn no vices.'
`Yet sailors are generally credited with the possession of all
vices.'
`The vices sailors have they learn on shore They get them in
port. At sea they are a gentle, submissive, steady, industrious set
of men. They reflect much. They are often religious. There is
more awe, as it touches God, in the bosom of a sailor, than in that
of most of the landsmen.'
`Have you any objection, Captain, to sending for the young
man into your cabin. I should like to ask him a few questions.'
`None at all. There he is already at work at the fall, as if he
had regularly shipped. I have taken a fancy to him.'
`He is evidently a young gentleman, and perhaps I may know
his family. In case he should prove to have eloped it would be
your duty, I think, to land him at the Cape.'
`I will see what he has to say, as soon as I can leave the deck.
The wind is settling to the north west, Mr. Hardy, and will blow
steadily all night after it once gets breezing stiff. See how fast she
is moving through the water.'
`Hold the reel!' cried the lieutenant in a loud tone.
Two of the watch came aft, and one of them taking the reel
and another the minute glass, a midshipman tossed the chip into
the water.
`Watch!' cried he, as he turned the wheel rapidly round.
`Turn!' he said; and the reel revolved with velocity as the man
held it above his head in both hands.
`Out,' cried the man inverting the sand-glass.
`Six and a half, sir,' answered the midshipman.
`That is doing bravely,' said the Captain with animation. I am
going below now, Mr. Hardy; and when you get the Cape abeam
and the wind blows steadily, set the weather lower and topmast
studdensails. Get all out of her you can! for recollect there is a
long chase ahead of us to overhaul the frigate.'
`Aye, aye, sir,' answered the lieutenant, the next moment
giving
the order to set the lower studdensail.
`Now, Mr. Merley,' said the Captain, `I will go below with you
and let you question this youth. I have some curiosity to know
more of him than he has chosen to communicate of himself. Mr
Rowe,' he said to the midshipman of the watch,' send that raw
hand that came off to the brig on a plank, into my cabin.'
`You are wanted aft here, Captain of the Plank,' said the pert
little middy, going into the waist. `You need'nt bring your chest
and other toggery.'
The youth strode aft to the quarter-deck with the air of its
maser
,
heedless of the jest of the lad upon his scanty wardrobe.
`The Captain wants to see you below,' said the lieutenant.
The young man, bare headed, and without jacket or shoes, as he
came on board, hesitated a moment, and then descended the
companion-way
into the Captain's cabin. A lighted lamp swung by
brass chains beneath the closed sky-light, and shed a bright light
upon a table in the centre, at which sat the Captain and his
passenger
,
the Consul. As he entered the glare fell full upon his
face. His hair was almost perfectly black, and was carelessly worn
long upon his temples and round his neck. His countenance was
decidedly intellectual. Its expression was frank and sincere, and
indicative of a generous heart. His carriage was something less
haughty than when he first stepped upon deck; but his air was
still sufficiently proud and bold. His dark eye fell upon the two
occupants of the cabin with a calm survey, and for a moment his
finely curved lip moved with an expression of impatience.
`There is your man, Mr. Merley,' said the Captain quietly, and
half-disposed to offer the proud looking young man a seat; but
restraining
the impulse on reflecting upon the condition he had
voluntarily
taken upon himself before the mast; for whatever claims
he might have to his courtesy, they could not now be recognized.
The result of the interview was unsatisfactory both to the
Consul
and to the Captain. The young man firmly declined
answering
any questions that might draw from him his name or history,
and neither threats on the part of the Captain, nor art and entreaty
on that of Mr. Merley could produce any effect upon him. They
respected his firmness while they were annoyed by it, and he was
at length dismissed from the cabin, leaving their curiosity not only
ungratified but greatly increased. This mystery, however, is not
so hidden as to evade the magic pen of the romancer, which, like
a charmed key, unlooks the secrets of heroes and heroines. The
mystery touching the young man's presence on board will,
therefore
,
be unravelled in the next chapter.
CHAPTER III.
Description of an evening sceneDuncan Howard and his passion
The scene in the boudoirHis brother and Isabel Sumpter
The character of the two brothersThe story goes back to their
childhoodThe adventure with the bearThe deer huntThe
danger of Isabel SumpterThe encounter in the waterThe
rescue, and the death of the stag
.
A FEW days prior to the time of the opening of our story, a youth,
tall in person, with fair hair, blue eyes, large and full, and a
countenance
,
noble and prepossessing, was standing upon a low,
wooded
cliff, overlooking the waters of the bay. His arms were folded
upon his breast, and his face wore a thoughtful and sad expression.
It was twilight, when the first shadows of evening steal over the
sky without obscuring the scene. On his right and left, curved
the long disappearing line of shore, till distance dissolved land into
air, and the bounds of the horizon were lost in the hazy blent of
earth and sky. Before him stretched the bay, calm and serene.
A ship of war rode at anchor far away to the left, black in her
distinct
outlines; while dispersed here and there over the wide wave
moved under gentle sail, many a trading ship and smaller craft.
The snow-white sea-gull, balanced himself in the air level with
his eyes, or darted downward and skimmed along the surface with
a shrieking cry. The fisher's boat lay moored near the shore, and
at intervals the smooth deep would be broken by silvery fish
leaping
from their element high into the air, and then falling back into
it with a sharp dash of the parting waters. The waves of the ever
breathing sea unfolded their silvery edges at his feet, with low
sounds like the murmured dreams from the lips of a sleeping
infant
.
Above his head on the branch of a scathed tree, sat a robin,
warbling at intervals a sweet note as if the day had not been long
enough for it to pour forth all its joy for its existence, and it would
tell the night of its happiness. At the feet of the young man,
crouching in submissive posture, but with a look of affection that
showed him to be the friend and not the slave of his master, was a
noble intelligent looking hound; and ever and anon he would look
wistfully up into his face to win, but in vain, a glance of kindness.
But the majesty of the sea, the beauty of the hour and scene,
the melody of nature and the caresses of affection, were all alike
unheeded by the young man. His own thoughts were a world,
which shut out the present and visible.
`It must be,' he said to himself at length giving utterance to his
musings: `the haughty and beautiful girl loves my brother
Duncan
;
and I must forget her, and banish this love that is consuming
me from my heart! Let them be happyI will seek excitement
and adventure in the wide world and in its votex of action forget
her!'
He turned from the cliff as he spoke, and slowly took his way
along a path which led by the shore to a noble mansion, situated
on an open lawn, commanding a view of the bay. A light twinkled
through the foliage from one of its windows.
`That is her boudoir! I hear notes of music! She is at her harp.
I will seek her while her soul is subdued by its deep power, and
pour out before her all my feelings! If she hate meif she scorn
meI can only fly, as I have already resolved to do! Yet I must
see her ere I go! Love me I cannot hope she ever will! Would to
God my brother and she had never met! then I would have had
her love; I alone been the possessor of the rich treasure! She
loved me ere he came to win her! But he knew not I loved or he
would not have sought her love. I will seek her and know the
worst. Life or death are in her words. Her lips are the arbiters
of my destiny!'
He approached the mansion by a path half hidden by shrubbery
and stopped opposite and near a window in one wing from which
streamed the rays of light. From it came volumes of rich sounds,
proceeding from a sweet female voice, mingled with harp-tones.
He listened with the breathless adoration and secret joy of a lover.
The voice ceased, and the harp was silent. He was advancing
when a deep melodious voice, modulated by passion and
tenderness
,
fell upon his ear in the place of the sounds he heard. He
recognised it to be his younger brother's, the dark-eyed,
dark-locked
Howard's! He started as if an added had stung his bosom, and
involuntarily an exclamation of deep emotion and bitterness
escaped
him. It was unheard, for the speaker went on to breathe into
her ear soft words of love.
`That song, dear Bel, hath never been so sweetly breathed from
mortal lips. Your voice hath a spell that makes me feel music as
I never feel it when others sing. Is it love, ma belle?'
Duncan saw his brother as he sat on a low ottoman at her feet,
look up into her face with a glance of admiring devotion, and also
her own returning smile He saw him press his lips to her fair
hand, whose whiteness rivalled the brilliancy of the pearls that
adorned its fingers.
Fickle and inconstant! thus have I pressed
my
lips to her fair
hand, and
thus
have I too looked up with love to meet the same
returning smile! I will forget her! I need nothing further to
assure
me that she loves my brother! Alas, noble and beloved
Howard
!
how little do you know the thorns that you are planting in
the bosom of your brother! Thou canst not love her as I have
loved her! Thy nature is more buoyant, thy spirit lighter than
mine! Love with me is life; with thee 'tis but life's pastime.
What is the sweet Isabel to thee, that other beautiful women may
not also be! But for me there is but one Isabel, but one woman!
But love on even with thy deepest love! Worship at the shrine
where I have laid my heart as a sacrifice! I will not speak to thee
of my bitterness. If thou canst be happy, he so! I love thee too
well to mar it! though thou, O thou, my brother, hast deeply
marred mine! Yet, as I gaze, methinks there sits a sadness upon
her brow, as if her thoughts dwelt on me! She smiles, but 'tis not as
she has smiled on me, putting all her heart into it! It cannot be that
she, so noble and generous, so superior to her sex, should be so
false to me! I will speak with her once more, and then say
farewell
forever! I will walk awhile in this grove till Howard has
departed
,
and then seek her presence!'
And was Isabel Sumpter false to this noble young man? Had
she ever loved him, and now loved his brother? Let us review
the story of their passion. Isabel was the only daughter of one
of the oldest Virgiman families. Her father had been a
prominent
leader in the provincial Congress; and was now living on
his estate at the age of sixty, enjoying the blessings of that liberty
for which he had with every other American gentleman of that
day risked life, and property, and sacred honor. His estate lay on
the Chesapeake bay, between Norfolk and James river, and the
mansion as we have already mentioned, commanded an extensive
view of the shores of the Bay. In this retirement Isabel was the
idol of his affection, her mother having long been dead. The
adjoining
estate to that of Judge Sumpter's, was the property of
Colonel Dudley, something of whom is already known to the
reader. The mansion of this gentleman, which we have already
had a glimpse of through the telescope of the Consul, was
beautifully
situated on a headland of the bay, in a grove about a third
of a mile from the water. The proprietors of the two estates had
been of opposite politics in the war, and little intercourse had
existed
between them. But as their children grew up, became
acquainted
,
and time merged old differences in oblivion, they were
oftener thrown together, till at length a neighborly and friendly
feeling
was firmly established between the two. The family of
Colonel Dudley consisted of his wife, a handsome, strong-minded
woman, and two sons, Duncan and Howard. There were two years
difference in the ages of these two young gentlemen, and a great
difference in their characters. Duncan the eldest, was of a quiet,
studious turn of mind, yet fond of the chase and other manly
exercises
.
He loved the beautiful in nature for the sake of beauty,
and the universe around him, and a part of which he was, was ever
a source of wonder and poetic contemplation to his reflecting
mind. The ocean in the loneliness and majesty of its space and
power, had for him an indescribable charm; and hours he had
spent upon its verge, watching the play of its leviathan-like
billows
,
and listening to the solemn and grand music of its roar.
Night after night had he walked beneath the splendid stars, and
gazed in awe and admiration upon the glorious display of Infinite
Wisdow and Power. All nature to him was a book in which the
Deity had written forth the manifestation of himself.
The mind of Howard was cast in a different mould. Books he
had little love for; and his free spirit spurned impatiently the
tramels
of tutors and masters. He loved the forests, not like
Duncan
,
for their solemn beauty, but for the game in their coverts. He
was bold, reckless and full of adventure from his boyhood. He
was a proficient in every hardy sport and his life, save that he dwelt
in a house when in doors, was as free and independent as that of a
young Indian. He loved danger, for the feeling of independence
it gives. He loved to venture upon the bay in a frail skiff, and
risk his life in the warfare of the elements. If a hawk's eyrie was
discovered on a cliff, he would scale the height, though
inaccessible
to all others, and make captive the fierce bird.
Thus, opposite as were the tastes and characters of the two
brothers, they were alike in one point, that is in their devoted love
for each other. Nver was fraternal affection so beautifully
illustrated
,
as in the bearing of these two youths towards one another.
They also were one in their reverence for the great and noble; in
the high tone of their feelings; in the purity of their principles;
though Howard from the impulsive character of his being, was
often
found erring.
Such were the two sons of Colonel Dudley at the ages of
seventeen
and nineteen, when one morning, the day after Duncan's
return
from two years absence at the University at Cambridge, the
two brothers were walking by the shore watching the fishermen in
the bay, and talking of a thousand things of the past, the present
and the future. They were accompanied by two hounds, a
stag-hound
and a light, elegant grey-hound. Duncan had one year
more to remain to complete his collegiate course, and was now at
home during the fall vacation. Howard had resolutely declined
fitting for college, preferring he said to be a farmer. He had,
therefore, during the period of his brothers' studious absence,
remained
at home, nominally under a tutor, but rarely reciting a
lesson
to him, passing his days shooting, boating, and in other sports
suiting his temper. Isabel Sumpter had been in Philadelphia
since her tenth year, with an aunt at school, and there her father
also passed most of his time, occasionally visiting his estate for a
few weeks in autumn. The young man had not, therefore, seen
her for four years.
`I must take you to a famous burrow,' said Howard, as his
brother stopped as if he would turn back again; `I have an old
she fox there, safely caged in with stakes, that has two young
ones nearly grown. I'll let them go while you are at home, and
then we shall have capital sport. Last year I run a fox across
seven plantations four miles beyong Norfolk, and he took the
water
.
I was mounted on `Billy,' and plunged in and swum after
him. I liked to have drowned Billy, but got the fellow's brush,
and it now hangs up in the hall.'
`Stay a moment, brother, and then I will gladly go where you
wish. I want you to admire the beautiful manner in which the
waves break upon this floor of sand! they swell up far off from
the shore, and then roll inward with a slow and beautiful motion,
and with an edge like liquid flint, which breaks like a casket
opening
and lavishly empties a wealth of pearls at our feet.
`I never saw pearls here, Duncan,' answered the practical
Howard
;
`but I have seen the waves break here many a time. And
once I was bathing just where we are now, and was swiming off
about twenty yards from the shore, to ride in upon the waves which
were rolling mountain high, when I saw a large shark lift his
huge back from a billow close to me. I instantly dived and as I
went down I saw his dark shadow above me, and thought I was
lost. But he rode away on the next wave, and when I rose to the
surface close in shore, I saw his black fin on the crest of a wave
too far off for me to fear him?'
`And did you continue in the water?'
`Yes, and had at least twenty rides ashore on as many billows,
but I saw no more of him.'
`You were rash and imprudent.'
`If you call that rash, brother,' said Howard, indifferently,
`what would you call an exploit of mine last winter with a bear.
Judge Sumpter's servants came running over here in great alarm
one night, saying that a bear had entered the negro quarter and
carried off a young negro boy. The Judge was away and the
agent was at Norfolk, and the blacks had no fire arms. I was in
bed, and instantly rose and got my double-barrelled gun, and gave
Black Zip my ducking piece, and calling Belt and Lightfoot, I started
on the track of the bear, which the negroes pointed out to me. It
was a moonlight night, and when once the dogs took the
trail we travelled rapidly. A mile from the quarter we tracked
him to the old Tobacco house down by the Red Spring. The dogs
stood outside and filled the air with a terrific noise of barking and
yelping, but feared to enter the long dark building. The
moonlight
which streamed in through the ruins showed me the bear
a huge black fellow in one corner. He was squatting on his hind
legs, and held the little negro hugged closely to his breast. He
growled and gnashed his glittering fangs as he saw me. I
leveled
my piece, and was about to let him have sixteen buck shot in
his head, when Zip knocked it up, crying,
`Gorra,massy, young masser, you kill de little nigger sure for
sartin.' The piece went off, and with the jerk, and one barrel
firing the other, both were discharged into the roof of the building.
I threw down my gun, the bear howled horribly, and the negroes
yelled and the hounds barked louder and more fiercely than ever.
The little negro made no cry, and I believed the bear had pressed
him to death. I now told Zip and the others, among whom were
the parents of the boy, that if they meddled with me, I would let
the bear cat the boy. I then tried to coax the dogs to attack him,
but they proved cowardly. So I resolved, savage as he looked, to
do it myself. If I had a rifle, I could have settled him with a
single
ball. The gun I now had I knew to coutain only duck shot.
I was therefore fearful of hitting the boy. So I laid it down, and
took from my pocket my jack hunting-knife; and this very blade.
he said, showing Duncan a jack-knife with a blade not more than
three and a half inches in length; and crept towards him,
grasping
it in this manner, firmly in my hand. My other hand I
wraped
up in a blouze jacket belonging to Zip, making a thick bunch
of it on my hand. The bear growled and snapped as he saw me
advancing, and as I came nearer he fairly roared. I kept my eye
on his, which looked fiery red, dark as it was, and expected every
moment to see him drop the little negro and spring upon me. I
went nearer and nearer still, and he gnashed his white teeth more
and more angrily. Yet he did not stir from the corner or let go
the boy. I thought he seemed to hug him closer and closer, the
closer I came to him. I got so near him that I could feel his
breath as he growled, warm on my cheek. But I was not near
enough to strike him. One step more, and not three feet
separated
us. I drew back my arm to bury the knife in his heart. As
I did so, he caught the negro on his left paw and made a
simultaneous
spring and blow at me with his right. The blow was like
a man's blow. It fell upon my chest like a fist. I staggered back
under it; but instantly recovering myself I caught a firm hold of
the paw, and held it with the gripe of a vice. The bear blew his
fierce hot breath in my face, and dropped the boy to release his
other paw. As he did so, I buried the knife and half the hilt into
his heart! He sprung upon me, nevertheless, with a terrific
growl of vengeance, and I fell under him. He got my wrist
between
his jaws, but he did not close them upon it. He was dead
ere he could bury his fangs. I had to call the negroes to take him
off from me, he was so heavy and large. The little negro was'nt
hurt, but was terribly frightened. The skin of the bear I'll show
you when we go home!'
`That was true bravery, my noble brother,' said Duncan; `you
risked your life in the cause of humanity. Your conduct
touching
the shark was less praise-worthy. There is a difference
between
courage and rashness. The coward (not that you are one,
mark me!) often is or affects to be rash and imprudent, to conceal
his cowardice. The truly brave man only risks life on great
occasions
.
A hero and a bravado are persons of very different
characters
.'
`You are always wise and sensible, Duncan,' answered Howard.
`And you ever frank and generous, brother. See yonder snowy
sea-gull! How silvery bright his slender pinions flash as he
wheels in the air!'
`Yes, he could be taken on the wing at this distance with a
rifle, as he balances himself,' answered Howard, who saw only a
good shot in the object which had drawn forth the poetic
admiration
of his brother.
`There is a group of fishermen on the white beach in the curve
of the bay, and from the smoke they seem to be cooking their
morning meal. How picturesque the whole party, with their
upturned
boats, their out-spread nets, their various attitudes about the
fire!'
`And those are the fellows that prowl about the forests here, and
poach all the game. One day I started a deer on the marshes
below
Rock Hill, and run him to the sea-shore, when he came in
contact with the net stretched across the beech, as you see them
now. His antlers became entangled in it, and before he could ex
tricate himself, or I could come up, the brutes knocked him in the
head with oars and stones, fairly beating the noble creatures brains
out! I could have served them in the same way!'
`But there are plenty of deer here to test your skill with the
rifle, Howard. I have seen no less than four in the glades as we
have walked along, gazing on us at a distance, in spirited, timid
attitudes, lingering, yet ready to fly!'
`Yes, they are plenty enough; but a deer should fall only by
the rifle. It was shameful, the way those fishermen did butcher
that one!'
`And here comes a second deer along the snow-white sands,
brother, or I am deceived by the distance,' he exclaimed, his eye
following the curving shore of the bay, where it gracefully bent to
the right towards the seat of Judge Sumpter, the cupola of which
was visible half a mile distant over the tree tops.
`You are not mistaken! It is a deer! He is coming, dashing
along over the hard sand just where the one went I have just
mentioned
.
There is a marsh above here out of which, if you drive
them, they are sure to take to the firm beech and fly along it like
the wind, till a mile the other side of us they come to a gorge in
the cliff, which they are sure to take and regain the marsh-land
inland. He is now making for it, and will soon pass beneath us
on the shore, unless the fishermen again stop him.'
`There are hunters abroad to have started him!'
`Yes; and there they appear in sight, round yonder rock, riding
like the wind!'
`And one is a female, by her flying robe! And she has the
lead!'
`And will keep it too!' cried Howard with enthusiasm,
hastening
from the edge of the wood along which the path they had been
pursuing led, to the verge of the head-land, which rose forty or
fifty feet precipitously above the smooth beach.
`They ride well, both of them!' observed Duncan, with
animation
,
as he gained the cliff, which commanded a full view of the
sands. `See, Howard! The fishermen have risen to stop the
deer! The gentleman waves his hand to forbid it! See, he has
cleared their nets at a single leap!'
`Bravo!' shouted Howard. He is a noble stag. I can
distinguish
the gentleman. It is Judge Sumpter. His hat has fallen
off, and exposes his white hair. He is an old and keen sportsman!
But who can that fearless girl be who sets her horse and lets him
go bounding and flying as if he was in his native freedom! See
him take that ravine; and she never moved from her firm seat no
more than her saddle did! Oh for Billy and to be dashing on by
her side! She is beautiful, too! I can see her face distinctly
flushed and brilliant with excitement! She must be a Virginian,
for none but Virginians ride thus!'
`I think it must be Miss Sumpter,' said Duncan.
`And sure enough who but she!' cried Howard. I recollect
hearing some one say last week that Isabel Sumpter was expected
home! She is a noble creature, if it be she; and I could fall in
love with her were I a man, for the way she sits a horse. How
gallantly the deer carries himself. See how feely, like wings, he
flings his fore feet cut and erects his chest. Fly, good deer, fly!
you earn your freedom! But if you knew what fair dame
followed
in pursuit, you would willingly suffer yourself to be taken
captive
!'
`You are gallant, Howard, for a youth of seventeen,' said
Duncan
,
smiling. `But the lady is very beautiful. What a superb
figure and air! How expressive of high enjoyment her face is!
All is animation in her! How gallantly the old gray haired
hunter
rides close behind! In a moment the deer will pass us and
the next moment they, and then we shall see her better! There
dashes off your stag hound down the crevice to the shore,
Howard
!'
`And there leaps the grey-hound over the cliff after him, and
both to meet the deer! It is too late to restrain their fire! They
will be sure to bring him down.'
`Perhaps the judge will thank you for the service of your dogs
to stop the chase, as he seems to be calling after his daughter, as if
alarmed at her fleet riding!'
`There go the dogs, both scouring along the sands!' cried Howard,
his whole spirit in the scene. `The deer is coming along full in
their path? Look! he sees them approaching him, and suddenly
stops in full flight!'
`What an attitude of surprise and fear! how expressive! He
hesitates!'
`He will turn from the dogs! See! he hurriedly measures the
height of the cliff; now glances at the water. The deep bay of
the hound appals him. He
turns
!
He flies
back again! He prefers
rather trusting to human beings than to brutes! Look at that
fearless girl as the hounds sweep on after the fugitive! She means
to turn him with her slender riding-whip! Hark! hear that shout
of warning from her father!'
`And she will perish if she heed it not!' cried Duncan earnestly.
The deer maddened and terrified, dashed on with his antlers laid
back upon his shoulders! His course was swift and direct as an
arrow. He strained every muscle to escape the fleet bounds of the
grayhound, who was close at his haunches. The young lady on
seeing him turn in his course, had reined in her spirited hunter,
over which she seemed to have the most perfect command, and as
he came back on his flight, she dashed fearlessly into his path,
leaning forward in her saddle with her riding whip levelled as if to
turn him again! She heard not, or heeded not the voice of her
father warning her to keep out of the track of the deer, which
blinded by fear, would not avoid her. The deer made directly for
her, and she galloped forward as directly for him. The path
between
the cliff and the water was very narrow, and the two horses
nearly took up the whole space.
`She will be sacrificed,' cried Duncan, throwing himself over
the cliff and sliding to the bottom, with risk of life and limb.
`The deer will take the water before he encounters a horse, be
he never so mad,' said Howard; yet following his brother down
the precipice, to the sands.
The deer on coming within two lengths of the horse, on which
the young lady was mounted, was startled by a loud shout from
her father, and at the very moment when he threatened to come
in contact with the fiery horse, he swerved suddenly from his strait
course, and sought to pass by the edge of the water. The maiden
encouraged by this desire to avoid her, guided her horse so as still
to meet him. The deer took to the water, and dashed in deeper
and deeper into the briny flood, to endeavour to get round her,
while in the excitement of the moment, the maiden let her horse,
ambitious for the contest, plunge deeper and still deeper to head
him, until the water flowed up to the horn of her saddle. At length
they came in contact, horse and stag, with such violence as to
unseat
her. A sharp point of one of the antlers of the deer, which he had
levelled to meet the shock, entered the chest of the horse, cleaving
his heart, and with a leap high in air, he plunged beneath the
encrimsoned flood. The fearless and rash girl to save herself,
involuntarily
caught by one of the antlers of the stag, who endeavored
to shake her off; and finding this impossible, for her grasp was for
life, he struck her with his hoofs, just as the dogs took the water
to assail him. She was sinking insensible beneath the waves when
Duncan Dudley caught her in his arms. Howard, seeing that she
was likely to be in safety, bounded after the stag, which had got
out of the water, and which the greyhound in a moment after,
brought down upon his haunches. Howard threw himself bodily
upon him, and forcing back his antlered head with on arm, he
plunged
his knife deep into his white breast. The crimson tide flowed
from the wound, and the stag fixing upon him a look of almost
human sadness and reproach, sighed heavily and died.
CHAPTER IV.
The young surgeonThe bleedingIsubel's restorationThe
concoy homeThe effect of the maiden's beauty upon Duncan
Howard gallops after the carriageThe illness and
convalescence
The
growth of young loveThe confession
Howard and the sea-gullThe first emotions of jealousyThe
boat-expedition planned
.
Duncan
bore the young lady from the waves, and placed her
insensible
in her father's arms as he leaped from his horse.
`My God! she is dead!' exclaimed the old gentleman, as her
pale head fell over lifeless upon his bosom.
`No, sir! She breathes and lives,' said Duncan; `The terror
of the scene has rendered her insensible. She was not wounded
by the hoofs!'
`And yet I saw the stag strike at her fie rcely. Bless you, sir,
for your interference. Isabel! My daughter Bel, my child!
Nay, she hears me not!' cried the father with anguish.
`It is needful to let blood! If you will permit me sir?' said
Duncan diffidently, as he gazed upon the pale, marble, immovable
countenance of the young girl, as she lay in her father's arms, her
head dropped over her shoulder like a lily broken from its stem.
`Are you a surgeon, sir!'
`No, sir; but I have learned the art.'
`Is not this Colonel Dudley's son?'
`Yes, sir.'
I will assist you!' said Judge Sumpter; `I beseech you let
there be no delay.'
Duncan took from his pocket a finely pointed pen-knife, and
with a firm yet careful hand, ripped up the close-fitting sleeve of
the riding habit, exposing a snow-white arm rounded with the
fairest proportions of feminine beauty. He had never been in such
a situation before, and felt strange sensations of awe and
tendeness
.
`The ribbon of her riding-switch will serve for a ligature,' said
Howard, who now came up from the slaughter of the stag; and
tearing it off he bound it round the arm with a firm hand.
`You are too rude, brother!'
`I have bled rabbits and hounds often,' answered Howard
confidently
,
`and know how hard to tie it.'
`But a rabbit and a young lady are very different,' answered
Duncan, smiling. `There is a full vein, sir;' he said lifting his
eyes to the anxious face of the father; and then dropping them
upon the pale, lovely countenance of the daughter.
The Judge held the arm while Duncan pressed the vein, and
then prepared to inesrt the point of his pen-knife into the
deliate
azure line.
`Your hand I fear is not steady enough, young gentleman,' said
the Judge.
`It shakes like a leaf, brother; give me the knife.'
Again Duncan suspended the knife-point over the beautiful arm
and his heart failed him. He felt that it was sacrilege to mar its
purity, and the beauty of the maiden, and the novelty of his
situation
agitated him.
`Take it brother!' he said, transferring the pen-knife to
Howard
;
who taking it in his fingers, cooly, and with the skill of a
surgeon penetrated the vein. `He could not,' thought Duncan,
`have bled a pet hare with more nonchalance; But Howard's
sensibilities
were less lively than Duncan's besides, the beauty of the
maiden had not agitated his nerves as it had done his brother's!
The rich blood flowed freely from the alabaster arm, and trickled
upon the silver sands; and with painful intenseness of hope and fear,
did the father watch the first signs of returning life. What would
not Duncan have given to have held her, as her father did, with
her head resting upon his shoulder; and gazing unreproved down
into her face, as the flitting changes of returning life passed over
the cheek! Gradually animation returned. The eye was
unsealed
and gazed round with expression. The chest heaved with
strong efforts to resume its suspended action; and with delighted
ears the happy father heard her lips murmur his name. He
pressed
her to his heart with tears of grateful joy; and lifting up his
voice he devoutly gave God thanks for her restoration.
`Forgive me, dear father! I was indeed rash to risk so much and
give you such cause for anxiety.'
`There is nothing to forgive, my dear Bel,' answered the father.
`You are restored to me living! There passed an expression of
pain across your face! Do you suffer?'
`Yesintensely in the breast! It is over! I recollect the stag
struck me with his hoofs. But what has become of Antelope?
He was struck also.'
`He was killed by a single stroke of the stag's antlers, and there
is his body heaving in shore,' said Howard.
`Poor, dear Antelope! I can never forgive myself for this.'
The sound of his voice seemed for the first time to make her
conscious of the presence of others. She glanced round at
Howard
,
and gazed a moment steadily upon his fine face; and then her
looks fell upon Duncan, whose deep, expressive eyes met hers and
caused her instantly to droop them, while the blood deepened in
her cheek. Her father now bound up the orifice, and she said she
was so much better that she could walk home.
This Judge Sumpter would not permit, and she suffered herself
to be placed by him and Duncan upon his saddle.
`If you will support her, Mr. Dudley,' he said, `I will carefully
lead the horse.'
With a strange, palpitating sensation at the heart, novel and
delightful
,
the young man passed his arm around her waist and
walked by her side; while Howard got the saddle and bridle from
the dead horse, which he gave a fisher's boy to carry. He then
gave to some fishermen whom the dangers of the chase along the
sands had brought to the spot, directions to take the stag to Judge
Sumpter's. He then followed the young lady and her party.
For some distance there was no word spoken either by Miss
Sumpter or Duncan. She evidently suffered more than she was
willing to make apparent, and evidently needed all the support of
his arm. He was happy in being permitted the happiness of
serving
one so lovely and interesting. From time to time her father
would turn and kindly speak and ask her how she rode; and tell
Duncan to be careful to hold her firmly in the saddle. But he felt
diffident even at the slight pressure he found it necessary to use
in supporting her.
`I will get into the saddle, Judge, and hold her firmly with my
arm around her,' said Howard, who now came up.
Miss Sumpter smiled at his frank speech and free proffer, and
said,
`I fear, sir, Sultan will hardly carry double.
`Never fear, Miss Isebel; he knows what it's for!'
`And pray how do you know I am Miss Isabel?'
`I heard Miss Sumpter was coming to Virginia with her father.
and that she was very beautiful; and as this is Judge Sumpter,
and you are very beautiful, I take it you must be Isabel. Besides,
I recollect your smile. It is just the same as when you were a
little
girl, and used to thank me for young squirrels and birds, when
I would give them to you.'
`And are you Howard?' she asked, with a look of animation
and pleasure.
`Yes; and I am very glad you have come home again. It's
dull enough here without any body! Duncan is no company for
me!'
`And do you really expect, Sir Froward, that I am to be a
companion
for you in all your forest tramps, and forays by shore and
moor?' asked she, laughing.
Howard looked confused and blushed, and then answered
petnlantly
,
I forgot you had been in Philadelphia, where country born
girls soon lose their naturalness, and affect to despise the scenes and
pastimes of home! Well, brother Duncan, then, will make an
excellent
companion for you. He can be as grave as a quaker, if you
wish it. Look at him now! He looks as if he were Take
care, brother, you will let Miss Isabel fall with your careless hold
of her! I should think she was glass. That was a fine escape
you had from the deer! Duncan had you in his arms in a
moment
,
or I believe you would have gone for it!'
`And then I am indebted to you, Mr. Dudley, for my
preservation
from the antlers of the stag,' she said, turning and fixing her
fine dark eyes upon him with a look expressive of the deepest
gratitude
.
`My life would have cheaply purchased your safety, Miss
Sumpter
,'
replied Duncan with feeling; `but I can lay no claim to any
merit in your preservation. I merely was so fortunate as to save
you from further danger. Permit me, with my brother Howard,
to congratulate you on your return to Virginia.
`I thank you. I should not have recognized you. I only
guessed
who you were by hearing my father address you as Mr.
Dudley
.
You have
so
altered!' and she surveyed his fine person and
noble, intelligent and now blushing countenance with admiration.
`I will not trouble you to support me longer! I feel very much
better. The pain in my chest is slighter than it was! I shudder
to think in what danger my wild riding after the deer involved me.
It has also killed poor Antelope. Dear father, if you will permit
me to walk I can do very well! Mr. Dudley must be tired holding
me on!'
`By no means, Miss Sumpter! It gives me pleasure! It is a
happiness!' he hurriedly repeated, in a very embarrassed and
confused
manner.
`If you will give me your hand I will spring to the ground!
There! That is better! I feel that I can walk very well!'
`Will you lean on my arm?' he asked, tenderly.
`Thank you,' she gracefully replied.
Her father gave her his arm also, while Howard, bounding upon
the horse, galloped on ahead as he said to send the carriage for
them; for they were still half a mile from the house.
Her face was still very pale, and occasionally a shadow of pain
would mingle with the cheerful sun-light of her spirit, as she
talked
in a lively manner with her father and the happy Dudley.
Never before had he been thrown thus closely into the society of
a young lady. His sense of admiration for the beautiful in the
sex had before been awakened; but the impression was as fleeting
as the presence of the fair object that produced it. His pulse had
never bounded to the touch of the hand; his blood had never
coursed to his temples at the glance of the eye; nor his soul
trembled
with joy at the tones of the voice! But now a new being
seemed to have been created in him. The eye, the touch, the
voice of Miss Sumpter had a singular effect upon him. The
sensation
was one of exquisite happiness, and he asked not whence it
came nor its name! When his gaze first fell upon her marble and
lifeless countenance, a piece of divine sculpture beneath his eyes,
he felt tenderness fill his soul which went out towards her with all
its sympathy and kindness! The exquisite finish of her silent and
immoveable beauty made him feel like adoring her. And we have
seen the trembling joy, the gentle fear, the reverential admiration
with which he regarded her, and how his hand refused the office
which was to restore her to life! This was the first unfolding of
love! love as pure and fathomless in its deep strength as his own
soul. But he knew it not!
He asked not whence came the strange, tender trembling delight
that overflowed his heart. He was happy in knowing that the fair
creature leaning upon his arm was its object.
He spoke a little as they walked along. It was complete
happiness
to let his ears drink in the sweet tones of her voice whether
addressed to him or her father. At length they reached the
entrance
of the ravine from which they had started the stag. A path
or cart road along the gorge wound up to the grounds in front of
the villa of Judge Sumpter. Here they were met by the carriage,
and the young lady was assisted into it.
`Get in, Mr. Dudley,' said the Judge, as Duncan bowed as if
retiring
;
`You must see us safely home. We can't part so, after
such a morning; and I want to know you and also that gallant
mad-cap brother of yours, who is galloping back again here as if
he was riding against his neck.'
Duncan diffidently complied and got into the carriage. Miss
Sumpter was on the seat immediately before him. He felt
awkward
and embarrassed and kept his eyes down, though he felt he
would have given worlds to have been permitted to gaze unseen
upon that pale and lovely face.
Such was the first meeting of Duncan Dudley with Isabel
Sumpter. The following day proved her error in supposing she
was not much hurt; for much pain and fever confined her to her
bed for more than a week. During this period Dudley daily called
to ask after her, and daily sent her gifts of flowers. At length
she left her bed for the easy chair in the drawing-room, and he
was permitted to see her and to congratulate her upon her
convalescence
.
Isabel Sumpter was at this time just seventeen. She
was a charming creature, with a fine generous temper and great
liveliness of character. She was singularly beautiful, possessing
the dark hair and eyes of the Southron, with all their feminine
grace and enchanting manners. Being early left motherless her
education was somewhat more masculine than it would otherwise
have been. Her father taught her to ride boldly and to love the
chase. Her teachers at the boarding-school performed well their
task of cultivating her heart and mind. She had left school
probably
not to return, and had now come to Virginia to remain with
her father.
Warm-hearted and grateful, she felt full of gratitude to Duncan
for his act in rescuing her; and was disposed to regard him with
kindly and friendly favor. But her bosom was yet a stranger to
the deep tumultuous emotions that moved his. She could not
however, remain long insensible to the tender and devoted
attention
he bestowed upon her as she convalesced. He anticipated
every wish and consulted every means to contribute to her
happiness
.
He read to her, sang with her, and almost worshipped
her, in his every look and act.
For a week he had been a daily guest at the mansion, and the
drawing room with its deep bay window overlooking the lawn and
the bay beyond, the trellised woodbine clambering around it and
softening the light, and Isabel seated or reclining within it, half
veiled by the curtain, himself occupying a low taboret at her feet,
was to him a heaven on earth. Insensible, indeed, would have
been the breast of any maiden under the influence of such deep
and ardent devotion. She read his love in the gentle tones of his
voice whenever he replied to a question, in the soft beaming of his
ardent gaze, in the delicacy of his attentions, and the embarrassed
diffidence of his whole manner. Gradually, a kindred
feeling
was awakened in her bosom, and the light gaiety of her look
and voice and manner changed. She laughed less loud and
merrily
and conversed less. A sweet confusion, a conscious diffidence
was perceptible in her replies and she seldom spoke without
blushing
and dropping her eyes; though hitherto she had looked him
so full in the face whenever she addressed him, as to make him
shield his own.
They had been sitting one afternoon together by the window,
the maiden now quite restored to health plying her fair fingers with
a piece of needle work, in which, however, she had made for the
last hour very little progress. Duncan was reading to her and at
every fine passage looking off the page to see its effect upon his
lovely auditor, and often discovering her sympathy in her
encountering
glance. Often their lifted glances thus met flashed and fell
stirring each of their young hearts with wild, sweet, fathomless
delight. The afternoon stole insensibly into the dreamy twilight
hours, and the maiden laid her needle-work upon her lap and
Duncan
closed his book. Both were silent, gazing through the open
window upon the gleaming waters of the baywhich were suffused
with the roseate reflection of the gold-hued west.
`How full of love and beauty is all this scene,' he said scarce
lifting his voice beyond her ear. `How clear and deep the blue of
the sky beneath yonder cloud of pearl and gold. Deep,
deep!
how deep and far beyond the soul's stretch the space the eye
traverses
.
How the mind that would follow the eye that finds no
rest, and out-going it would still fly on and on seeking for a shore,
falls back upon itself?'
`I have had that feeling! It is painful and terrible!' answered
Miss Sumpter; `it shows us the finite bounds of our being. The
infinitive in space or time can be comprehended only by God!
Yet we feel sad that it marks our penetrating eye and flies still
beyond
our mental wing! How difficult to conceive space
out-stretching
there before us that has no bound! A centre without a
circumference
!
When I suffer my thoughts to wander on such
themes, I feel a sensation wholly indescribable. It is as if my
soul were being annihilated.'
`Such feelings are natural to all,' answered Duncan; and it is
dangerous to let the mind cherish them. The attempt to measure
the infinite is an impious assumption of Almighty attributes. It
brings with it its own punishment. I knew a young man in
college
who loved to dwell upon such incomprehensible subjects, until
over-tasking his mind in endeavoring to comprehend and trace to
`the beginning' an unoriginated First Cause, he lost his reason and
is now insane!'
`Then let us not dwell on such themes! There is to me, I must
confess, a strange fascination in those subjects, and I have felt as
if I should go mad if I understood them not! But let us talk no
more in this manner! Eternity is before us to learn and know all
these things that perplex us here! Let us enjoy and appropriate
that we can understand; and such is nature with its varied and
glorious beauty! How mellow is all the air, and what a gentle
influence is shed around us in this evening hour. The leaves stir
in the idle breeze and seem to live; and the clouds sail like barks
along the azure ocean; and the waves of the bay dance and tumble
together as if they had life! And yonder white sail! how beautiful
it decks the horizon like a sea bird resting on its wing!'
`There is beauty enough on earth to fill the heart, Isabel, if the
heart would open itself to receive it. There is no unhappiness, no
evil but in ourselves! Nature ever looks and speaks kindly to us;
and bids us forget our griefs and partake of her joys.'
`Yes, God has done his part to secure our happiness here; and
it only remains for us to do our part by accepting and enjoying
what his bounty and love have bestowed! But not satisfied with
His gifts we are ever inventing happiness for ourselves; which
like all human inventions is, when done, mixed up with much evil.
Yet we are so in love with our own works, that we love these ways
we have sought out, better than those God has marked out for us.
He who can truly love God's works is truly wise and happy!'
`I am surprised, I must confess, Miss Sumpter, to find one so
young converse so sensibly and thoughfully upon such subjects.
I shall ever esteem it the happiest event of my life, the privilege of
becoming acquainted with you.'
`This assurance is most gratifying,' said the young man.' `I do
indeed appreciate your noble and thoughtful character, and cannot
feel too happy at the consciousness of being able to understand
you. But, dear Isabel,'here he checked his words as if he had
forgotten himself, and, deeply blushing, said, confused and
hurriedly
,`Pardon
me, Miss Sumpter! I betrayed my deep
interest
in you without reflection. Forgive me! It was the impulse of
the heart!of a heart, permit me to say,' he continued, gathering
confidence as he saw her sit with her eyes cast down, and her
vesture
heaving with emotion, `that
is wholly yours!
'
He waited with a throbbing heart for a reply. She remained
silent, but deeply agitated. He knelt by her and looked up into
her face with a cheek pale with his intense feeling. He strove to
read in the downcast look and changing cheek of the maiden, the
answer to his hopes and fears! He took her hand. It lay passive
in his own. He raised it to press it to his lips, and fearing to
offend
,
let it fall; when, looking up, he met her eyes! They were
full of a merry light, and a smile played roguishly about her sweet
mouth. Instantly the solemnity and serious aspect his love had
put on, vanished before the radiance of her sunny countenance,
and smiling at his own fears, and with his heart bounding with
hope and joy, he arose from his kneeling posture at her feet, and
folded her to his heart.
This was spoken with an earnestness so unusual to the young
student, that Isabel fixed steadily upon him a moment her dark
eyes; but meeting his own deep gaze, she turned them away,
while she said with a richer hue on her cheek, and in a tone not
wholly free from a slight tremor of feeling,
`I cannot think you would say this, for the purpose of merely
complimenting me, and feel grateful for your words. It is a
pleasure
to us all to know that we are regarded with kindness, and
that our society, however indifferent it may be, contributes in any
degree to the enjoyment of another. It is a happiness to feel that
one is appreciated; and I feel that you appreciate me.'
Thus love had silently but surely been growing up in the heart
of the maiden, and in the hour of his confession her soul
responded
to his. Scarcely had the happy Duncan released the blushing,
struggling girl, when a sound in the shrubbery close by the win
dow caused them to assume a quiet composure which neither felt
at such a moment. Belt, Howard's greyhound, the next moment
bounded upon the lawn and leaped into the window. To conceal
her confusion and her gladness at the consciousness of being loved
by Duncan, Isabel bent over the beautiful animal to caress him.
`Howard cannot be far off,' said Duncan, trying to affect
indifference
,
which, after what had passed, he was far from doing
successfully
,
if we may judge from his heightened color, and brilliant
joy-dancing eyes; and as he spoke he removed his seat from the
low taboret at her feet to a chair a little farther off. Howard at
the next moment made his appearance with his double-barrelled
gun in his hand, and a snow-white sea-gull dangling by the wing
in his hand.
`I thought I should find you here, sitting both of you like two
mopes, when the free air, the free sky, and the free wide woods
are all out doors! Here is a pretty gull I have shot for you, Isa
bel, he said, standing in the window and holding it by its outspread
pinions before her. It measures full four feet from tip to tip, and
the wings will make a pretty ornament for your mantle-piece!'
`What taste, Howard!' said Isabel laughing; `but it is very
pretty. Poor bird! see the spot of blood on its snowy breast!'
`That is where the buck shot hit him. I thought of you when
I fired, or I should not have troubled him. I would, for myself,
have sooner brought down a pigeon or duck. To-morrow I am
going in my boat to the Hawk's Ledge, where there will be fine
sport. I shall take my lines, as fish are plenty off the rocks.
Now I want you both to go! Duncan has been good for nothing
since you have been sick, and now you are well you must pay for
keeping him so much from me by going out yourself.'
`It seems to me you are a very positive young gentleman, said
Miss Sumpter with a smile as she gazed on his handsome
countenance
.
`Suppose I decline going.'
`I shall be very sorry, for I like you very much, and want you
to enjoy yourself,' he said in a gentle, courteous tone that
singularly
contrasted his former bold, careless style of addressing her.
`It is a pity you and brother Duncan should be cooped up here all
day, when there is so much to invite you abroad. Come, put
yourself
under my charge, Isabel, and I will be a beau worth half a
dozen of my brother, there, who is laughing and wondering I can
talk so freely with a handsome young lady, and call her Isabel,
when he seems half afraid to raise his eyes to hers, though he'll sit
in a chair two yards distant from her a whole day, as if he was
watching a hare.'
Here the eyes of Isabel and Duncan met, full of meaning; both
blushed and smiled, and the former said playfully:
`Well, Howard, I will go with you in the boat, provided you
will make a sailor of me. But I insist, on the outset, you are not
to make me climb cliffs after hawk's nests.'
`No; but I will do it for you, and make you a present of a nest
of young hawks, to bring home. Brother Duncan will perhaps try
and find you a cooing dove's nest, also,' he said. `Would'nt you
like one, Miss Isabel?'
`You are as mischievous as you are'
`What?' he asked archly.
`Handsome, I was going to say, but I won't.'
Howard colored, and looked a little confused, and Duncan felt
a pang from some unpleasant sensation that these few words
awakened
,
dart through his bosom.
The presence of Judge Sumpter, who at this moment rode up
and alighted at the door, turned the conversation into other
channels
,
and in a few moments the party retired from the window to
tea.
CHAPTER V.
The young hunter and his dogsThe power of beautyThe
wild tamedThe dangerous position of IsabelThe
correspondence
The
truth told in a letterTwo kinds of love
A dissertation thereonIsabel defendedThe gradual
change in the character of HowardThe jealousy of Duncan
The discovery by Isabel of her own feelingsThe
decision
The
result
.
After
the confession of young Duncan, `the course of true love'
ran smoothly for many days after, deepening and strengthening in
both their hearts as it flowed. Both were happy in the
consciousness
of loving and being beloved. But Duncan's term of absence
from the University rapidly drew to a close; and he looked
forward
with sadness to the arrival of the hour when he should be
compelled to seperate from her, around whose heart the cords of
his own life were firmly bound. The day at length came and
tender
and passionate and sorrowful was the farewell; for his absence
was to be for a year. A winter and a summer was to elapse ere
they should meet again.
Absence only served to strengthen the passion of Duncan, and
his letters to Isabel breathed the ardor of the purest and most
elevated
love. This devotion and sincerity met a warm return from
her, and her replies breathed affection and tenderness, and were
filled with pledges of constancy.
But Miss Sumpter knew not her own heart. Duncan had been
her first admirer, and love in her had grown from gratitude and
pride. Yet it was love and
true
love! But the same causes still
involved the power of creating the same effects. And this power
was soon tested. After Duncan's absence, the youthful Howard
became a frequent visiter at Judge Sumpter's. But it was from
loneliness rather than any tender motive of which Isabel was the
object. He generally came with his gun, and with his dogs at his
heels, and usually called to her through the window, instead of
entering
the house. The Judge often was his companion in the
forest after game, and sometimes Isabel also accompanied them.
As Spring opened she became more frequently his companion;
and he taught her to use the fowling piece and to manage a boat
almost with skill equal to his own. Thrown so much into society
Isabel insensibly took a delight in joining him in his daily
excursions
;
till at length the Judge playfully reproved her for
neglecting
her harp for a shot-gun and loving the green forests better
than the drawing room! And there was truth in the reproof; for
so agreeable had Howard's companionship seemed to be, that she
preferred a morning ramble with him by the sea-side, or through
the forest glades, than remaining at home, where he would never
remain a moment. Indeed, he scarcely ever entered the house.
And had she not joined him out doors, she would rarely have
seen him. The beauty, good humor and buoyant spirits of Miss
Sumpter, had a charm for Howard, and he got so bewitched with
her fascinating companionship, that he felt dull, and was
indifferent
to the game whenever he went abroad alone. At length there
seemed to take place a great change in him; and instead of going
into the forests for the love of the chase, it was apparent that he
only went for the love of Isabel's society. This was clearly
evident
from the fact that of late, when she could not accompany
him, he would himself deeline going, and, standing his gun by the
side of the window, sit on its step with his feet upon the lawn, and
pass the time with relating his hunting adventures, and listening
to her stories of boarding school frolics.
This change in the aspect of affairs took place in less than seven
months after poor Duncan's departure. Howard was now past
his nineteenth year, and as tall as his brother, and equally
handsome
.
Indeed, Isabel, as she watched his countenance as he
related
some stirring incident of personal adventure, and marked his
flashing dark eyes and his finely animated features, let the thought
enter her mind that he was even handsomer than Duncan!
Weeks past on, and Howard forgot when he came to bring his
gun, to ask her to accompany him in his forest pastimes. He would
sit by her and talk, and sometimes she would sing to him. He soon
learned to love her songs better than those of the forest birds, and
the tones of her harp were pleasanter to his ear than the music of
the winds and of the waves dashing upon the beach. A gentler
influence
came over his soul. His voice grew gradually lower in its
tone, and his manner subdued. He was no longer the reckless,
rash, thoughtless boy of a few months back. He was tamed! and the
power lay in that secret charm which is given to woman for the
purpose
of taming and subduing our fiercer natures. Miss Sumpter was
the magician that had changed his nature. Yet, she knew it not!
She was blind to her own involuntary work! She had not sought
to win his heart, nor wished to lose to him her own! She had
thought nothing about results. She liked his society, and was
gratified when she found her influence over him was so great as to
induce him to prefer an hour's quiet, thoughtful, conversation at
home with her, to passing the morning in pursuit of game in the
forests, or climbing cliffs for young hawks; or flying over the
waves in his light skiff, pursuing sharks with his rifle! She did
not foresee any danger in this intimacy. If any day he came not,
she missed him more than she ought to have done; for she was
restless and indifferent, and cared not to touch her harp and sing,
if he could not be there to listen. Yet she was not, (at least she
did not think of being,) false to the absent Duncan. Her letters
to him were just as tender as ever, and as full of love and desires
to see him, with warm expressions of anticipated happiness when
he should return. Yet, oddly enough, (perhaps it was her sex's
instinct,) she did not mention Howard, save in a line or a
postscript
,
such as follows:
`Your brother appears quite well, and we frequently see him:'
or, `Howard was here yesterday for a few moments, and is looking
finely; but seems to care less for hunting than he used to. But I
suppose he often writes to you.'
These postcripts should have been truly written in this way:
`Howard is now here trying to learn a favorite air of mine on a
guitar he has bought for himself, having of late taken a strange
fancy for music. He has a fine voice, which I am cultivating for
him; as he sings with me every piece I play. He passes most of the
forenoons with me, and is a most entertaining companion. I could
listen to him for hours. He has a fine taste for painting I discover,
and some sketches he has made I have been colouring under his
direction. We often walk out to the cliff at sun-set, in the path
where you and I used to ramble so fondly together; and I think no
young man could be a more delightful companion at such times.
He has a taste for poetry, and has recently penned, and presented
me a pretty poem on my adventure with the stag, and the tragic
death of poor Antelope. I would write more, but am working a
game bag for Howard, the pattern of which he has himself drawn;
it represents a young hunter with his bow unstrung, his arrows
broken, and his quiver cast aside, reclining at the feet of the
Graces, who are crowning him with a wreath!'
The reader will see from this true statement of affairs, that
Isabel
was in very great danger of proving traitorous to her troth
pledged to Duncan. But this idea never entered her mind. She
did not think of
loving
Howard. And in truth, to do her full
justice
,
she regarded him more as a brother than as one who might
steal her affections. She would not have been so intimate with
any one
but
Duncan's brother. This she felt was the truth; and
if ever any notion of impropriety entered her mind, she would
meet it with this defence, and so acquit herself. But she knew not
herself, and how dangerous it was for a betrothed maiden to cherish
close friendship with a handsome youth, in the absence of the
betrothed
,
even if the youth
were
his brother! And thus, with the
delusive idea that it was no harm to teach Howard to sing, to
work game-bags for him, and to feel very happy in his society, and
unhappy out of it,
because
he was Duncan's brother, this
beauteous
erring girl, suffered herself imperceptibly to let her friendship
silently deepen in her heart to love! `But, how can she love
twice?' asks some fair one with surprise, Love is of a two-fold
nature, and a two-fold origin, yet both are true! There is a love
which is inspired by assiduous attentions, by tender devotion, by
series of kindness, by expressions of admiration, and confessions
of ardent attachment, from the lover; to all which the maiden is
supposed to be, at first, indifferent but to the strength and
steadiness
of which she at length yields her heart, and loves in return
because she is beloved. This is passive love, and it is the most
common in the world; Its true name is gratified pride, at being
made the
exclusive
object of admiration. This is an inferior
aspect of love, with reference to woman. There is a love deeper
and more pure and lasting. It is when, without any effort on the
part of the man to win her affections, love silently steals into her
bosom; and he discovers that he is a beloved object, ere he had
by word or act made an effort to win! This kind of woman's love,
is true love, and never perishes while the heart endures! The
other is transplanted from the soil of the lover's heart to her own!
this
is the growth of her own rich heart; upsringing from roots
that draw nourishment from the springs of her own being. It
overgrows the other and ont roots it! It is a tree of life, bearing
immortal fruit. The other is the love that terminates with time,
and oftener in time, this is a love that transcends time, and is
existant
in eternity.
The love of Isabel Sumpter for Duncan, sprung not from her
own heart. It was the love of Duncan planted there, and
growing
from roots that had been first nourished in his own being. It
was therefore, that his love was the deeper and purer! Yet she
loved him as the world deems it, and the world is content to call
this passively reflecting love, `love!' To most it is love. The
majority of mankind know no other. When the
true
is awakened
and begins to grow by the side of the other, then follow all the
mischief of which the heart is the theatre and the player!
What was the condition of Howard's heart, while the change
was silently going on in the bosom of Isabel? Youths of Howard's
age are sufficiently susceptible of impressions from the beautiful,
among the other sex. But Howard was not so impressible with
the tender passion as others! He was too light and volatile, to be
easily subdued by bright eyes into a sighing lover. Yet he loved
the society of Isabel more than that of any person in the world,
and had no relish for any thing in which she did not participate.
But his liking for her was rather that of a brother for a sister. His
heart was not interested, and he would not have been jealous, if
she had told him, (as she never had done) that she was engaged to
his brother Duncan! Perhaps, however, a better idea can be
obtained
of the true state of Howard's feelings, in reference to Isabel,
from the following extract of a letter addressed to his brother, a few
weeks before the time when he was expected home, after his year's
absence at College.
`When you return, dear Duncan, we shall have much more of
each other's society than before; for Isabel Sumpter has taught
me to love in-door pursuits. Would you believe it! I can sit in a
room with her a whole morning, without any wish to go out, shine
the sun never so brightly. The other day when I was walking
with her, `Belt' started a hare and instead of joining him in the
chase, I called the dog away, because Isabel was talking, and I
had rather listen to her. I think she has grown much more
beautiful
.
Her step is just like a deer's! and every motion is as
graceful
as a fawn's! I think when you see her you will fall in love
with her. I am sure I love her she is so very lively and
entertaining
always. I dont know what I should do without her, she is such
clever company. She can shoot a rifle nearly as well as I can, and
is a most accomplished fisherman, or fisherwoman, perhaps I ought
to say. I am glad you are to take your degree and come home so
soon. We shall have fine times! Father, says something about
sending you to England; but I think you have got learning enough
for one head! There are a great many things I dont know, that I
find Isabel knows, but I get along very well; though sometimes,
she condescends to enlighten my ignorance, at which times I am,
she says, a very apt scholar. It is so pleasant to be taught by a
pretty girl! You had better come home and be her pupil, than go
any where else. Five words from her give me more insight into a
thing than a whole book would do! You didn't have an opportunity
in the little time you were here, of knowing her so well as I do,
and I want you to see how she has improved in the year you have
been absent. But I am engaged to ride with her to the cliff-head
at five o'clock, and it is now half past four. So good bye.'
Howard
.'
The reception of this letter filled Duncan's brain with all sorts
of lover's jealous fancies. It troubled him sorely. He had,
indeed
,
no proofs of Isabel's falsity; but there was proof that
Howard
was too intimate with her, for an absent lover to bear with
perfect
philosophy. That very day he had also received a letter from
Isabel. It breathed the same tenderness and affection; at least he
thought so when he read it. He now went to his desk and
opened
and read it again by the light of Howard's epistle. He now
thought he discovered a coldness and stiffness in it, which had
before
escaped his observation. He examined it more jealously still,
and picked many a flaw in it; till at last it seemed to him in every
line to contain proof of her untruth. Such is jealousy.
He answered Howard's letter, and never before had he written a
letter to his brother with such difficulty. He wanted to be angry
with him, but strove to write with his usual affection. He also
wrote to Isabel. Here he found it more difficult to write with
indifference
.
He felt like reproaching her; but reflection and fear
of being unjust, withheld every expression of reproach as it rose
to his pen. The letter was affectionate and kind; but the ardour
and devotion which characterised his other letters was wanting in
this; and he could not help it. He felt grieved, pained, restless.
In a word he was jealous.
Howard did not notice the slight change of manner in his
brother's
letter; for suspecting nothing, he searched for nothing in it.
This was not the case with Isabel. Its new tone struck her at
once. She saw his wounded heart in every line, disguised as it
was. One sentence gave her the key to the whole, and awakened
her to a review of her conduct. It was as follows:
`I have received a letter from my father, in which he desires me
to spend a year in Europe before I return home. I replied that I
could not consent to go abroad without first paying a visit to
Virginia
.
Need I say that you were alone in my thoughts! But
since my reply was mailed to him, circumstances have occurred
which have led me to change my mind. I shall, therefore, leave
here direct for Europe. My absence you have by this time become
accustomed to; and should my decision occasion any
disappointment
to you, the society of my brother Howard will no doubt,
compensate for my absence, as it has,
hitherto
, served materially to
alleviate it!'
This last sentence Isabel-read over several times very
thoughtfully
,
till she fully understood the feeling that dictated it.
`Yes,' said she, with a deep blush of consciousness of giving
him cause; `yes, Duncan is jealous of Howard, and doubts my
faithfulness. Till this moment I never suspected that my
acquaintance
with Howard was improper, under my peculiar relations
with Duncan. But I see it now. I have thought too much of
him; and loved his society too much. Yet I truly love Duncan.
I do not
love
Howard. I am sure I do not! I have never thought
of such a thing; and certainly
he
has not! I think Duncan has no
right to be jealous!'
But notwithstanding her attempts to excuse herself, she could
not but feel that her lover would have a right to feel some
resentment
if he knew all. `But does he know all?' she asked herself.
`How can he know all?'
And this self-questioning caused her deeply to blush; for it
involved
the fact that there was that which she did not desire should
be known. This led her to reflect upon all her intimacies with
Howard, and she was conscious that she should not be quite
willing
that he should have been witness to all the tender passages of
words and looks, which had passed between them in a sisterly
and brotherly way,' as she phrased it in her heart. She also was
led to examine her feelings in relation to the handsome youth, with
whom she was in the habit of such daily intimacy. The result was a
confession in the depths of her own soul, that Howard was very dear
to her. The more she examined herself the deeper and stronger she
found were her feelings of tender regard, and at length the
conviction
flashed upon her mind that she
loved him!
She was
startled
at the idea and trembled with strangely mixed dread and
happiness
.
She was seated by her window with Duncan's letter still
open in her hand, as this conviction that she
loved
Howard, stood
forth prominent in her mind. There was, shall we say it?
joy
in
the thought; yet there was more alarm. She felt happy and sad
together. She leaned her head upon the window and hid her face
and thought long and painfully. Duncan's image seemed to rise
before her, and with a visage of grief and sorrowful anger
reproached
her! Then would intervene the bright countenance of the
noble Howard! The consciousness of her influence over his proud
and independent spirit, and the hope that she was dear to him,
with the conviction that she loved him, oh, as she had never loved
his brother, dried her tears and filled her soul with peace. Yet
she was not happy! She did not feel guilty. She reproved not
herself. But she pitied Duncan; for she knew how much he
loved her. She sympathised with the grief of his noble spirit,
when he should learn that she loved Howard.
`But he shall not know it,' said she, under an impulse of
generous
feeling. `Let the secret of my love be locked in my own
bosom. Howard shall not know it. Duncan shall be happy in
believing
me true! I love him. I can love him as a wife. I can
make him happy. He shall be happy. Howard I will forget, or
remember only with sweet sad pleasure!'
At this moment a light touch was laid upon her hand. She
looked
up and beheld Howard.
`You are ill or sorrowful, dear Isabel,' he said, taking her hand,
and then with a smile of gentle feeling parting the fallen hair back
from her forehead.
`Howard, II entreat you to leave me,' she cried pressing her
hand upon her eyes, while her bosom heaved with strange, deep
emotion.
`Have I offended you, then?' he asked, starting back and gazing
upon her with a look of surprise and embarrassment.
`Nono!' she answered earnestly; `but, but, Howard, I feel
that it is notnayI hardly know what to say! Will you leave
me?' she asked imploringly.
`Yes, Miss Isabel, if you command me,' he answered with
increased
surprise, and in a proud tone.
`Now you are displeased! I have been too hastytoo
indiscreet
!
Staygo not from me with that cloud on your brow!' she
cried, rising and detaining him. `Forgive me, Howard; but I
am far from being well this morning.' And reseating herself, the
poor girl buried her face in her hands, and burst into a flood of
tears.
`There is nothing for
me
to forgive
you
, my friend Isabel,' said
Howard, tenderly bending over her. `I have been too hasty to
take offence, and I myself need to be forgiven. I am sorry that
you are ill.'
Isabel made no answer. Her bosom was torn between love and
duty. Each moment deepened the consciousness of her strong
passion for Howard. As he bent over her, and his low,
sympathetic
voice fell upon her ear, she could not hide from her soul the
deep joy his presence gave her, and she trembled the more.
Duncan
filled her thoughts; Howard filled her heart! Her being was
torn by the conflict. She was bewildered and lost in the chaos of
her feelings.
`You seem deeply agitated, Isabel. Pray what has occurred?'
he inquired with touching interest. `This is not illness so much
of the body as of the mind. Have I offended you? I know I am
often rash and thoughtless; but intentionally I would not wound
your feelings. I would take my own life first. Have I been the
cause?'
`Yes. No, no! You have not offended me. Pray don't ask
me. Do not be offended with me! but I must beg you to go! I
feel sorrowful, and tears and solitude are better for me for a while.'
`I will go; but, dear Isabel, I leave with you all my sympathy,
whatever be the cause of your grief. If it will alleviate it at all,
know that you have my deepest sympathy.' Never had Howard
spoken so tenderly to her. Her tears had unfolded the tenderer
emotions of his nature
`I know it, Howard.'
After gazing a moment upon her as she leaned her head upon
her arm, her face half hid in curls, and her whole form heaving
with the intensity of the struggle with herself, he turned away,
feeling in his breast a gentle and kindly interest awakened for his
lovely friend he had never before experienced.
From this hour Howard's manner towards her was changed from
what it had been. The next time he met her he found her calm
She made no allusion to the past, nor did he. But his manner and
the tone of his voice she noticed were singularly tender and gentle.
His eye was softer and deeper in its expression as it lingered on
her face and timidly sought, yet shrunk from, her own. His
attentions
were more delicate and touching; and she was not blind
to a deeper meaning in his every word and look.
She had, on the day of her interview with Howard, struggled
long with herself, and the issue had been, not victory over her
new love, but a generous determination to sacrifice it to her sense
of duty to Duncan. She resolved to be passive in Howard's
prosence
,
and in no instance to suffer her passion for him to grow.
She nobly determined to let it perish in her heart if her heart
perished
with it. This she might in time, with proper watchfulness
over herself, have been successful in if the change we have spoken
of had not come over the whole being of Howard. The tears of
the lovely weeper had dissolved his youthful heart, and awakened
in it all its sweet sympathies and manly sensibilities. He thought
of her with gentle pity, which is akin to purest love. When next
he met, these feelings showed themselves so apparently that she
had not only her own love but
his
to combat with. And did she
sorrow at the discovery that Howard loved? Did she shed tears at
this fresh obstacle in the way of her duty to Duncan? No, oh no!
The sweet conviction made her forget her resolutions, made her to
forget Duncan; and filled her whole being with the most
exquisite
delight. `She was then loved in return,' was the happy thought
that poured itself like a full fountain into her bosom.
`Howard, dear Howard! my heart is all thine! Thou only art
my soul's idol! Henceforth thou art the centre of my life's bliss!
the sun around which, like a planet, I shall revolve in an ever
circling
orbit of light and love!'
Such were her feelings while, three weeks afterwards, she
leaned
fondly upon Howard's arm, as they walked together in the
embowered
path by the cliff, and discoursed of love by the golden
light of the autumn moon.
At length the day approached when Duncan was looked for
home; for when the hour he was to leave for Europe came close at
hand he felt that he could not fulfil his intention and depart
without
seeing Isabel once more, and learning from her own lips her
treachery to his love, reproach her for her perfidy, and leave her
forever. He had therefore written that he should visit Virginia
before quitting the country. This letter was to his parents and
not to Isabel; who, too candid to write when her affections were
transferred to another, she had left his last letters unanswered.
Yet in her heart she felt she loved Duncan no less; she but loved
Howard more.
CHAPTER VI.
A struggle between two-fold loveThe arguments advanced by
Isabel
to exculpate herselfThe delay of DuncanThe visit of
Howard to IsabelTheir walk and the meeting with Duncan
The manner of Duncan towards herHis resolution
Hamilton WoodhallThe overheard conversationThe crisis
.
With
this, and a part of the succeeding chapter, dear reader,
we shall close our reminiscences of the more youthful years of our
heroes and heroine, bringing the time up to the period of the second
departure of the brig of war from the Road stead, when we shall
resume
our narrative on the sea,
As the hour drew nigh when Duncan was expected to arrive,
Isabel became restless and ill at case. She could not but painful
ly reflect upon their plighted troth, and that she had been untrue to
him who had been true to her, and whom she knew was coming
home only to see her. She tried to convince herself that she still
loved him, and that her deep passion for Howard was not
incompatible
with her troth to him! Her feelings were mixed and
varying
;
and sorely was she perplexed. She felt she could regard
Duncan as a dear friend, and welcome him as such; but she was
conscious he would claim, as he deserved, all that love which she
bestowed on his brother. But this she felt could never be given
him. Howard had become her heart's idol. She had folded her
life up in his, as the bud of a rose is folded within its cup.
`Oh, that the dread meeting with him were past,' she said, as
she seated herself by the harp to see if she could not drive her
unpleasant
thoughts away with music. It was the morning on which
Duncan was expected at `Merton,' the seat of Gol. Dudley.
Howard
had not called that morning as usual, having detained himself
to welcome his brother; whom he promised to bring over to see
her as soon as he came. She would have forbidden this, but
Howard
said he knew his brother would wish first to hasten to her.
Howard was yet ignorant of his brother's love for Isabel. He
loved her with romantic ardor. All her deep, passionate love, he
returned with idolatrous devotion. In her he found and adored
all the graces of her sex. His emotions at the expectation of
meeting
Duncan were very different from her's. He wished his brother
to know his happiness, that he might share his gentle sympathy.
`How happy,' thought he, `will the knowledge of my happiness
in Isabel's love, make him!'
The morning passed by, and the noon, and yet Duncan did not
arrive. Howard delayed no longer, but hastened to Judge
Sumpter's
,
giving his brother up till the next day.
Isabel had been all day in a state of painful suspense. She
feared
to meet her lover, yet wished the meeting passed. As hour
after hour went by, she was a prey to a nervous anxiety which
gave fevor to her pulse and cheek.
`Am I gurlty, then, in loving Howard?' she asked herself, as
she paced the drawing-room, listening and starting at every sound.
`If I am guilty in loving the one, I am also in loving the other,
and
love is guilt!
But love is not guilt. I loved Duncan, but I
had not then known Howard, or I had not loved Duncan! He
never had my heart. I thought he had, but I was in error.
Howard
has my heart, my life, my being! If it is not wrong to love,
it is not wrong to love with all our nature. Nay, it is wrong not
to love wholly. Duncan cannot complain! I gave him all I
could then, and thought I gave him all. But if a new nature is
awakened within me, a new love has sprung up in my heart which
overgrows the other, shall I not cherish the last and noble love,
even though the first perish! Should I be doing justice to myself
to crush the nobler germ, and cherish the baser! Should I be just
in bestowing upon Duncan the baser, when his love demands my
better love, which he never awakened, and which never can be
his! But into what a subtle maze of reasoning am I plunging! If
that be love which I hold for dear Howard, then I have never
loved Duncan. Let him, henceforth, be only as a brother to me;
for as such I can love him. But how shall I tell him this? How
shall I wound his noble and truthful heart, by telling him I love
him not. My lips will refuse utterance! And need I tell him?
Had I not best by manner, by degrees, show him that we can only
be as friends! Oh, how strongly does duty urge me to sacrifice
myself, and let him be happy in finding me his! But can I
deceive
him?'
Here she suddenly stopped and listened to a footstep, with a
throbbing heart. It was only a slave passing the window.
`It was not
he!
How my heart palpitates! Yet, why should I
condemn myself! I have not injured Duncan. In loving How
ard I have only been true to my own nature! And how can I
give up my love, my
living
love, for the shadow and form of it
which went before? How can I cease to love Howard; or
keeping
still my troth to Duncan, love Howard without guilt. Oh,
that I knew how to act! If Howard knew the truth; generous
and noble as he is, I feel that he would at once fly me to give his
brother place in my affections! Never would he stand between
his brother and his happiness! If Howard knew all, I should lose
him forever! How then shall I guard the secret, save by
appearing
to Duncan as ever, till events shall further guide me! This
I will do. I will meet him with affection, for this I feel; for
loving
Howard should not make me love Duncan less! He shall
have all the love he has ever had, for it is still his. Content with
this, he may not discover a deeper love which is his brother's! I
will meet him as he would wish me to, and let after
circumstances
govern my conduct. But my soul is sad! I feel heavy
fore-thoughts
of pending evil. Yet I know not how to act to avert it!
List! There is Howard's step! He is alone!'
`Dearest Isabel,' said the youth, as she met him at the window,
tenderly pressing his lips to her hand, `I have come to relieve your
anxiety; having waited so long for Duncan.
`And he has not yet come?'
`He is not yet arrived, and will not probably be here till
morning
,
as it is now nearly sun-down.'
Isabel felt relieved, and was glad in her heart that he had been
delayed.
`You look ill, Isabel,' he said kindly regarding her; `let us take
a walk together on the cliff. The evening is pleasant, and the
sun-set promises to be very fine!'
She took his arm, and they proceeded to the cliff. For some
time Isabel remained silent. She was very much distressed; for
notwithstanding her decision she was still troubled. Her sense of
duty, of honor, and of justice was correct and high-toned. She
could not for a moment cherish the thought of hypocrisy or
deceit
.
Yet she knew the truth would make Duncan, whom she
still tenderly regarded, wretched; and her knowledge of
Howard's
character assured her that he, on knowing it, as he too must
know it, would at once resign her to his brother, whatever might
be the sacrifice. Thus she should lose both Duncan and Howard,
and perish the victim of a two-fold love. What woman would
not pause ere she made such a sacrifice? The sacrifice was not
only of herself and her own love; but it would involve Duncan's
happiness and Howard's love. It would be the wreck of three
noble
hearts!'
`How happy I should be, dear Isabel, If brother was our
companion
in this walk,' said Howard, as they passed along the
woodland
avenue. `I am impatient to see him, to let him see how
beautiful
you have become! how changed since he saw you!'
Isabel sighed as her heart echoed `how changed!' Howard's
words also startled her.
`Howard!' she said, with embarrassment; and stood still by
an oak, beneath which was a rustic arm-chair.
`Dearest Isabel!' he answered, looking at her face, and
impassionedly
seeking her glance which wasdown-cast:
`I would rather you would not speak of me in terms of
admiration
,
to your brother Duncan!
`Why, Duncan I know would be delighted to hear you spoken
of! He thinks, or used to think a great deal of you! I know he
will like you very much, and feel that you will become greater
friends than you were when he was here before!'
`I fear not, Howard! But you must beware,' she added with
attempt at playfulness, `that you do not praise me too high!
Duncan
is very susceptible!'
Howard blushed and then said, smiling, `I should be very sorry
if Duncan should get to love you
just
as
I
do, sweet Isabel!'
`Then don't be instrumental in producing such a catastrophe.
Speak of me only as a friend.'
`Yet I love my dear brother so fondly,' continued Howard,
pursuing
the train of thoughts Isabel had interrupted, `But I could
almost have wished he had loved you first!'
Here both seated themselves on the rustic seat, beneath the
dark shadows of the grove, through an opening in which the sea
was visible.
`Can you be so indifferent to me, then, as to utter a wish like
this, Howard!' she asked in a tone of disappointment.
`No, Isabel, dear! It is not that I do not love you with all my
heart, for I do; but that I love Duncan so well that I could have
been willing, ere I had known the bliss of loving you, he should
first have known it!'
`And if Duncan should love me now?' asked Isabel timidly,
trembling for Howard's constancy.
`Duncan is too good to try to steal your heart from me, my Bel!'
he answered smiling, and pressing her gentle form to his heart.
`But he might not know you loved me, Howard,' she said, her
heart deeply and painfully interested in his conversation.
`I shall tell him of it, for I know my happiness will increase his
own!'
`Oh, never, never!' she cried with such energy and distress
that Howard started from the seat, and gazed upon her face by the
dim twilight with surprise and astonishment. `Pardon me, dear
Howard. I knew not what I said,' she added re-seating herself,
and for a moment burying her face in her hands.
`You are strangely agitated,' he said affectionately, as he marked
the strong heaving of her bosom.
`No, I am better. Howard!'
`What, my Isabel!'
`If you love me, name not to Duncan ourour intimacy!'
`Naycall it truly what it is, my sweet Bel! Call it by its
right name, `love.'
`Tell him not you love me! Dear as the knowledge of this fact
is to my poor heart, I would not it should be known to othersat
least at present.
There was a secret hope in her heart that time and absence
would cure Duncan's passion, and that all might yet be well.
`If you wish it, I will not,' he said warmly.
`Thank you, Howard. You are ever kind and good.'
`What could I refuse
you
, Isabel.'
`Here is a step coming along the path!'
`It is Duncan!' cried Howard, as he saw his brother's form in
the walk, relieved against the light of the sky and sea. `My
brother, my dear brother! You are indeed welcome home!' he
said, as he clasped him in his fraternal embrace and kissed his
cheeks.
`Can it be possible that this tall young man is the stripling I
left,' thought Duncan, as he received and returned his embrace,
kissing him in return. `How you have altered and grown! I
should hardly have known you, brother!' he said to him in the
full, glad tones of re-union.
`There is one, also, you will be scarcely less welcome to, dear
brother,' he said, leading him to the rustic bench where Isabel sat,
unable to think or move. She would have met Duncan any where
than there at that hour with Howard.
Duncan approached her, and in the few steps he made towards
the seat where she sat, his mind was distracted by a hundred
thoughts! At one instant he felt like bowing coldly at a distance,
and then conversing with Howard on indifferent subjects. At
another
he felt like rushing forward and folding her to his heart, with
all the warmth of his heart's unchanging love. He had arrived
half an hour before his sudden appearance, having been detained
by an accident to the stage. On learning that Howard was at
Judge Sumpter's he departed to see him, and also meet Isabel at
the same time. He still had doubts of her constancy, and
believed
that his brother was his rival in her affections. This was
however, only a suspicion. It had, nevertheless, made him very
uneasy and unhappy, and as we have seen, had drawn from him
cold letters to her. He had now come home to know the truth of
his suspicions; to confirm or destroy them. His love for Isabel
had met with no abatement. He was trembling with joy to clasp
her to his bosom, and find his doubts were without foundation. It this
state of mixed feeling between hope and fear, he was traversing
the walk to the mansion of Judge Sumpter where Howard
discovered
his approach.
The words of Howard, which informed him of the presence of
Isabel, strengthened his hopes of her truth; notwithstanding, he
felt a jealous pang shoot through his bosom, at meeting her at such
an hour in his brother's company. It was too much like intruding
upon two lovers!
Isabel put an end to his indecision, by rising and meeting him
ere he reached her.
`Duncan, dear Duncan, I also welcome you back again,' she
warmly said, extending her hand to him. The words, and the act,
were alike impulsive and unstudied. She felt as she spoke. Her
grasp of his hand was frank and kindly. The sight of him
awakened
,
in a degree, her former feelings.
His doubts were dispelled like mist before the sun. A beaming
smile from a glad and grateful heart, illuminated his face; and he
returned her greeting with tenderness and warmth, that showed
her how that he, at least, remained unchanged. He felt that he
had wronged her, and tried to laugh at himself for his jealousy of
his brother; and seriously condemned himself for his suspicions of
her truth. Isabel was greatly relieved, to find the dreaded meeting
had come off so happily; and felt a lightness in her heart that
made her very cheerful, as giving each brother an arm, she
walked
homeward. There was no need of explanation now, she felt.
She had met Duncan as she ought to have done, and he was happy!
Days passed on which, in their progress, gradually unfolded to
Duncan what a first nor a second meeting with the parties could
fully develope; that Isabel, though she might love him, also loved
Howard! and that Howard betrayed his own reciprocating passion,
in every word and look. The old suspicion slowly revived and was
reluctantly received into his mind. It was made stronger by the
communications of a dissipated young man of the neighbourhood,
who had spent a fortune at races, and at the gaining table. His
name was Hamilton Woodhall. He had made up his mind to try
and repair his fortune by a union with the wealthy Miss Sumpter.
He therefore called upon her, and made her acquaintance. He
was already known to the brothers, whom he now daily visited.
Through him Duncan learned the close intimacy between Howard
and Isabel; for the spendthrift Woodhall, detected the passion of
Duncan for her; and hoped by creating a rivalry between the
brothers to profit by it. Duncan had not been ten days at home,
before he was satisfied that he shared a divided heart; and also
that his brother was ignorantly his rival in Isabel's affections.
This discovery was made by accidentally overhearing a
conversation
between them, which proved to him that they were
lovers
. On making this discovery, Duncan's first emotions were
those of resentment against both; but a little reflection, with the
remembrance of some words of Howard's he had overheard,
convinced
him his brother knew not of his own attachment. But
towards
her, his bosom burned with anger! He felt that she had
deceived
him; and he resolved to accuse her of duplicity, and leave
her never more to see her. But his pride came to his aid, and he
resolved to leave home without any interview. But this
determination
was given up at the suggestions of his love for her, which
would not suffer him to leave her, without an effort to restore his
place in her heart.
`And,' said he, at home in his own chamber, in which he had
shut himself, to reflect upon the subject; `shall I make this
attempt
,
and, if I succeed, wreck my brother's hopes, who, I have
discovered is not less attached to her than I! But yet he cannot
love as I have loved! She cannot love him as I have believed she
has loved me! He is young and gay hearted, and this love is
perhaps
merely a romantic attachment. If my brother knew the
truth he could forget her in a few days, and I feel that he would!
He is capable of making any sacrifice for me, or any one that he
loves! But if, to save me from unhappines, he would willingly
resign
his love, would it not make her unhappy, if her heart is set
upon him! I feel my own peace is dependant upon recovering her
affections! She is kind; she is gentle; she is friendly; nay, she
is even affectionate to me. Yet what is all this, when I know her
heart is not wholly mine. I am torn with conflicting feelings, and
know not how to act!'
Such was the trial in Duncan's generous and true nature. He
loved his brotherhe loved Isabel too well, to desire even his own
peace and happiness at the expense of their own. He loved her
even in her inconstancy, too much to purchase her constancy at
the risk of Howard's unhappiness. Before he acted he resolved to
study them both, unobserved; and then, if he found them deeply
attached to each other, so that disseverance would produce pain,
he nobly resolved to leave them his blessing, and fly his home,
though he carried a crushed heart with him.
It was the evening of the day on which he made this noble,
self-sacrificing resolution, that we have introduced him to the
reader, in the third Chapter, as witnessing a tender interview
between
Howard and Isabel. This scene between the lovers, he felt
sealed his own destiny. Howard, and not himself had her heart.
Painful as this conviction was, he resolved to resign her, if she
confessed the preference. It was, proper, before he did so, that he
should formally restore her pledged troth!
He lingered in the walk, until Howard departed; and as he
witnessed the tender looks with which they parted, he felt feelings
of jealousy rise in his heart against his brother, which he could
not resist. He also felt against her, deep displeasure. He had said
he would not entertain such feeling's, but bless them in their loves.
But he forgot that he was human; and that the heart of man in
love, is not always under his own government.
When Duncan entered the drawing-room, Isabel was seated
thoughtfully were Howard had parted from her, her hand listlessly
laid upon her harp. She was thinking pleasantly and tenderly of
him. Duncan was not in all her thoughts. Since his return, her
manner towards him had been unusually kind and cordial. She
strove to please him, and to atone by attentions, for the
involuntary
treachery of her heart. Her voice when she spoke to him,
wae characterised by a tone of sympathy, as if she grieved in her
heart for the heavy disappointment which she knew he must
sooner or later suffer. She pitied him; and this feeling cast a
gentle
shadow over all her manner. It touched him, and he thought
and hoped, it was the gentleness of love. But when he observed
her manner, the tone of her voice and the glance of her eye when
she spoke with Howard, he felt, with bitterness at his heart, that
that was love and not the other!
She looked up, and seeing him when he entered, appeared very
much confused.
`Do not rise, Isabel,' he said, taking her hand and reseating her,
and occupying the place by her side which his brother had
recently
vacated. `I will not detain you long. I have come to say that
this hand, which I feel I am unworthy of, but which you once did
me the honor to pledge to me, with, as I then believed, your heart
in it, I now surrender to you.' And he laid her hand down.
`From this hour I will try to forget you. To-morrow or next day
I take my departure for Europe. May you be happy with
Howard
,
should you ever become his wife. He is every way worthy of
you. As for me, I shall not expect any more happiness in this
world. I have no more fountains of affection in my heart to
unseal
,
to let their waters run to waste. Pardon me, if I seem
severe
!
I do not feel so. Now receive my last advice, Isabel!'
he said, rising, and taking up her passive hand. `But before I say
the last word farewell, I would have you answer me one question?'
He looked at her steadily and calmly as he spoke. It cost him
a great effort to seem so. During his address she sat silent and
immoveable as a statue. Her face was pale as marble, and the
tears trickled from her eyes like rain. He silently observed her a
moment, and his heart yearned towards her. But he restrained
his feelings. He felt that she was no longer his own!
`The question I would put you is this?' he said, in an even tone.
`Does my brother know of our plighted troth?'
`Nooh no!' she cried, covering her face, while the tears
forced
their way through her fingers.
`I am relieved by this answer, greatly relieved,' he said, with
emotion. `Howard is still my dear brother! Now, farewell, dear
Isabel! That you may be happy shall be my daily prayer!'
He turned and was leaving the apartment, when she arose and,
flying towards him, caught his hand and sunk at his feet.
`Forgive me! forgive me! Say that you forgive me, Duncan!'
`I do, Isabel! But,' he added, in a tone that chilled her, `only
for my brother Howard's sake!'
`Duncan, oh, if you knew my poor heart! But its struggles you
can never know. You are dear, very dear, to me! I love you, I
have not ceased to love you! But I had not known Howard, or I
should have known my heart better, when I fondly believed it was
all yours! I love not you less, but Howard more! Hate me not
for what I cannot help! Be still my friendoh, if not for
my
sake, for Howard's!'
`Isabel, I am your friend,' he said, lifting her to her feet. `You
are dear to me! I think I can understand your conflict, and
believe
I know all you would tell me! My loss is Howard's gain!
But one more question rises to my lips.'
`Speak, Duncan,' she said, standing passively, looking the
personification
of sorrow, by his side.
`I would ask if you had never known Howard, if I still should
have retained the first place in your affections? Does not the
cause lie in me?'
`No. You are noble and good! I, alone, am the unworthy!
Yes, Duncan! You would have still held the throne of my heart
but for him who has taught me that I had a heart
within that I
offered
you
.'
The brow of Duncan grew dark, and he looked displeased at her
words. He walked across the room, and then returned to her,
where she stood trembling like a statue. Both were so taken up
with the subject in which they were so deeply interested, that they
did not discover the presence of a third person. This was
Hamilton
Woodhall, who had entered by the hall door unannounced;
not that his intimacy at the house had by any means warranted this
familiarity; but, knowing himself not to be a favorite of Miss
Sumpter's, and being naturally of a reckless, head-strong
character
,
he resolved to forestall a denial to see him. He came in very
softlya mode of entrance peculiar to the stealthy and suspicious.
The conversation interested him, and it was like him to remain
unobserved
and listen to it; and to do him justice, he was a very
attentive
listener. There was still another person who appeared, a
moment after Woodhall's entrance by the hall door, at the lawn
window. He was a very different character from this young man,
however. It was Howard, who had returned, after leaving, to
restore
to her a pet rabbit he had given her, which he had found
wandering
far from the house on the skirts of the forest; and perhaps
to say and receive another tender `good night.' He also was an
involuntary auditor of their conversation.
Again Duncan advanced towards her and said, in a tone of deep
feeling:
`One more question, dear Isabel!'
She trembled, but said with a painful exertion of the voice for
utterance, `name it, Duncan!'
`If Howard were not living, (which heaven forfend!) would
your love be mine!'
`All the love I ever knew for you would then be yours,
Duncan
,'
she said, feeling a strange fear paralyze her heart at his
singular
words.
`Enough! I ask not for more than that! If a deeper love
lay in the grave with Howard, then let it lay, so thou wouldst be
mine on earth, and surrender to me all thy earthly affections. If
Howard were dead, and thou wert my wife, I would still let thee
love him with thy more spiritual love, so I had thy true affections.
This reply has strengthened me. I know by it that I am still dear
to thee, and that thou lovest me, but lovest my brother better!
May you be happy together, and may he long live to enjoy that
better love which the depths of my own true love, alas, could
never
move in thy soul! Now fare thee well, Isabel, and God bless
thee and my brother!'
With these words Duncan pressed his lips to her hand and sprang
from the window upon the lawn. His eyes were blinded by tears,
and he did not see his brother, whom he almost touched as he
brushed past him. Isabel stood a moment as if stupified with
surprise
and grief, and then uttering a sad, wild cry, she fell senseless
her length upon the floor. Howard, however, saw it not. He had
hastened after his brother, who had gone at great speed towards
the cliff along the path homeward.
The fall and the shriek brought Judge Sumpter from his library
on the opposite side of the hall, and the house-keeper and servants.
But Hamilton Woodhall had her already in his arms, conveying
her to a sofa, when they entered.
`It was some difficulty or quarrel, Judge, with that haughty
fellow
,
Duncan Dudley! They were at high words as I came in,
when I saw him abruptly quit her, and she fainted and fell,' was
the artful reply of Woodhall to the hurried inquiries of Judge
Sumpter
.
The Judge, without replying, relieved him of his charge, and
taking his daughter in his arms, bore her to her chamber, where
she in a short time revived. Hamilton Woodhall, after lingering
a while, and finding himself unthought of, left the house,
muttering
his displeasure at the Judge's want of hospitality. When she
revived, to her father's questions she said earnestly:
`Ask me not to explain, dear father. I cannot.'
`Has Duncan Dudley insulted you?'
`No; oh no!'
`Young Woodhall says you were quarrelling, and he left you in
anger.'
`I cannot explain now, sir! some other time, perhaps, dear
father
,
I may confide all to you. Let me exculpate Duncan. He has
done nothing. Oh, no! he is good and noble. I have been the
erring one.'
The Judge was too sensible a man to urge her further; and
referring
the cause of her shriek and fainting to some love
misunderstanding
between her and young Dudley, (for he suspected their
attachment,) which her affections led her to conceal even though
Duncan were to blame, he left her to the quiet and repose she so
much needed.
CHAPTER VII.
Howard discovers his brother on the cliffDuncan's struggle with
himselfTheir interviewThey return home together and
part for the nightHoward's subsequent proceedingsThe
lock of hair and leave-takingHis parting with IsabelThe
water sideHe swims toward the fleetThe adverse current
His landing and fatigueHis final successThe brig
Arrival in the MediterraneanThe pursuitTaken
prisoner
.
As soon as Howard recovered from his surprise at what he had
heard and seen, he started in pursuit of his brother, who he
believed
contemplated some act of self-destruction. Duncan was already
out of sight, but he could hear his swift, strong tread falling among
the broken twigs and autumn leaves of the forest. He had no time
to ask himself what he was to say to him, or to reflect properly on
the astounding discovery he had made of his brother's love for
Isabel
!
The feelings that agitated his bosom were painful in the
extreme
.
He condemned himself, censured Isabel, and pitied his
brother. The next moment he reversed these sentiments. His
mind was a chaos of the wildest thoughts. He knew not what to
think or how to act. But his generous nature was uppermost, and
he internally resolved that he would sacrifice himself, if need were,
to his brother's happiness. But surprise at his discovery more than
all else, filled his mind as he hurried on in the pursuit. To what
end the pursuit? He knew not himself, save that Duncan was
unhappy, and he wished to comfort him.
The unhappy lover, in the meanwhile, flew along the forest
glades, amid which he had, in happier hours, walked with her from
whom he now fled. He paused not to reflect until he reached that
portion of the path which traversed the brow of the cliff and gave
an open view of the bay.
Here he paused and bared his head and threw back the hair from
his feverish temples, and seemed to gasp for the free cool air from
the sea. It was star-light, save in the west where the roseate hues
of the sun-set still lingered. A gentle breeze came landward and
cooled his brow. The waves broke musicallly and with a soothing
sound at his feet. Half a league distant were faintly visible the
dark outlines of the three frigates and brig of war, comprising the
Tripolitan squadron, anchored and ready for sea. The lights from
each and from the numerous merchantmen anchored farther
below
,
danced fitfully and brightly across the mottled water, and
gave brilliancy and novelty to the scene.
He stood a few moments and the influence of the quiet scene had
its effect upon his mind. He thought calmly and reflected with
reason.
`Yes, I see how it is. Isabel loves him. She misunderstood the
character of her feelings when she thought her sentiments towards
me were love. My brother Howard has been the happy one to teach
her what the true love of the heart is! Yet, nevertheless, I loved her,
and love her still, for all that she loved me not with all her being.
Did she love me as she loves Howard, I could love her no more
than now. Oh, luckless hour that my brother came in the way of
my happiness, and unwittingly dashed the cup of my bliss to the
earth. He knows not what mischief he has done. Had he not
loved her she would still love me as much as I would ask her to
love me. He cannot love her, he cannot adore her as I have done.
Nayand why should he not? His nature is full of kindly
feelings
,
and his heart is charged full with the best affections. It only
remains
for me to let them both be happy. I will in a day or two leave
for Europe. I will not see her again. I will try and forget her in
my absence, and try and pray for the happiness of both. She has
made me happyshe has atoned to my pride by confessing that
but for Howard she would still have been, and believed herself to
be wholly mine. Nayshe even said if my brother were not
living
(Heaven preserve him in a long and happy life!) she could be
mine. Oh, blest thought! sweet solace to my wounded love!
This is as if she were mine in heart, for my brother can never hold
in my idea the place of a rival! Let him take her, so she loves me
also He is the brother of my soul, and I can make even this
sacrifice
for him. To-morrow I leave for Europe.'
`Nay, brother, my noble injured brother,' cried Howard, whose
approach he had not regarded; `nay, this must not be so.
Forgive
me what I have done. I knew not the truth, or I would have
drowned myself in the sea ere I would have been the guilty wretch
I must seem to you. Forgive me, brother.' And Howard caught
his brother's hand and threw himself at his feet in tears.
`Generous and noble ever, my beloved brother!' cried Duncan,
raising him from the ground and folding him to his heart. `Thou
hast no need to ask forgiveness at my hands. But what dost thou
know?'
`Say thou wilt pardon me, Duncan. I have by accident
overheard
thy parting conversation with Miss Sumpter. I know all!
She was thinebetrothed to thee ere I ever thought of love.'
`And yet thou lovest her with all thy being, brother! I have
seen this. I know it! She cannot love me now. She never
loved
me, but deceived by her heart, believed she did. She knew not
love save by name till she saw you!' said Duncan bitterly.
`Brother, hear me! I pray you listen kindly;' said Howard with
fervor and much feeling.
`Nay, thou lovest her, and she loves thee. I have made up my
resolution to go to Europe to-morrow. She is worthy of thee, and
thou art her peer in all things. God bless you both!'
With these words, spoken with deep emotion, and interrupted by
strong efforts to suppress the heaving of his laboring heart,
Duncan
turned and walked away, with his face buried in his hands.
`Duncan, brother!' said Howard, laying his hand affectionately
upon his arm, and speaking in a tone of great firmness and
earnestness
;
`if you love me, stop and listen to what I have to say. You
love Isabel Sumpter, still, with all your soul. She loves thee still.
NayI know it! Her wordsher mannerher very looks
betrayed
it to-night. Do not speak yet. I only stand between her
and her former love for you. She confessed to you if I were not
living her heart would fly back to you! You are satisfied with her
love as it once was, though it may not be of the romantic
character
she entertains towards me. Indeed, I question, if she hath
loved
me, save idly, till you returned!'
`Herein you do yourself injustice, brother, to make me think
your sacrifice less,' answered Duncan. `I am satisfied of her love
for you.'
`But I do not love herat least,' he said quickly, `so fondly that
I cannot give her up to my brother. I love my brother most!'
`Howard! I will confess that my life's happiness is wrapped up
in Miss Sumpter. But she loves me not. You are her heart's
chosen one! To you I surrender her! I love you, not more than
her! but more than
myself
, and can make this sacrifice to you.
Take her and be happy, both of you. Now let us speak no more
of it!' he added, evidently with a painful effort to speak with
cheerfulness.
They walked along the cliff together for some moments arm in
arm, Howard's face silently turned in the direction of the lights
of the squadron sparkling over the waves, and Duncan with his
eyes musingly fixed upon the ground At length Howard stopped
full, and spoke with extraordinary energy.
`Brother!'
`Howard!'
`If by any chance I no longer stood between you and Isa
Miss Sumpter, would you take back her heart, with only its old
love for you, letting her keep the residue buried in her heart's
depths for my memory's sake. In plain words should I die to
night, would you still be happy in her love, if she would in time
return to you?'
`Heaven in mercy prevent the contingency, and long preserve
your life, my dear brother! But, I frankly answer, for frankly
you have put the question, I would!'
`And do you think her love would flow back into its former
channels in your bosom?'
`I do. But why these questions?'
Howard made no reply for a moment, and thus said, in a low
half tone, as if uttering aloud his thoughts,
`And that it would flow back, I know from her own confession
this evening to him. It would not flow with all its deep waters of
love,' he added tenderly; `for there would still remain at the
bottom
of her soul the fathomless still fountain, in the calm eternal
depths of which I know my own image to be reflected!'
Duncan was lost in his own thoughts, and did not hear or heed
his words. At length Howard spoke out:
`Brother!'
`Howard!' answered Duncan, starting at the abruptness of the
address.
`Be happy! I have resolved to give up my love for Isabel, for I
confess I love her as deeply as I am capable of loving, to my love
for thee! I will not be made happy at your expense. I am
younger
and more buoyant of spirit, and can forget easier than you can.
At least to resign her will not sink so deep into my soul as into
thine. If I am out of the way she will love thee in my stead, and
you will be happy with her. You will cause her to forget me. I
have therefore decided to leave home at once, and not return till
you are husband and wife. Absence will work its own cure in
her affections, and you will be happy!'
`Never, brother, shall you make this sacrifice,' cried Duncan,
in a spirit of generous enthusiasm. `She loves you most, and
your own happiness is as much enlisted in her as my own. Shall I
be so selfish then, as to secure my own happiness at the expense
of yours! No, my noble Howard! The sacrifice shall be mine!
She will regard my absence less than thinenay she would forget
me in the light of thy love! Thee she would never forget while
thou wert living, nor cease to hope for thy return! No, Howard!
The die is cast! I go away and leave thee to the love and
happiness
which fate has denied to me!'
`Brother!'
`Do not urge me, Howard! My mind is made up! The
decision
is a painful one, but it may not be revoked. The day after
to-morrow I leave for Europe!'
The brothers stood together a moment in silenc, both gazing
seaward, but with absent looks, when Howard suddenly said,
`Promise me, Duncan, that you will wait one week before you
proceed to fulfill your intentions!'
`The sooner I leave the scenes that continually remind me of
Isabel, the better it will be for me,' he answered with melancholy.
`Yet promise me what I wish, brother! I have a reason deeply
involving your happiness, in asking it.
`I promise then to delay my departure a week, but on the
condition
you pledge me your honor, Howard, that in the interval,
you will not make any effort to influence the mind or feelings of
Miss Sumpter in my behalf!'
`I cheerfully give you the pledge you wish, Duncan,'
answered
Howard. `Now let us change the subject. How beautiful the
effect of the numerous changing lights from the vessels in the
Roads, as they flash out or glimmer along the water! I wish,
instead
of idling at home here, I had been attached to our infant
navy. I burn with ambition to distinguish myself in the war
with Tropoli; and wish I was now on board yonder fleet. I love
the sea; and the bay has been as much my home as the forests
here!'
`And I have always thought I should like the sea,' answered
Duncan. `You know before I went to college, application was
made by father for a midshipman's warrant for me, which was
denied
by the party in power, because he had taken no part in the
Revolution, and was suspected of Toryism. If I could now get
it, under this administration, I would accept it to-morrow and sail in
this fleet! I will have my father write to Washington city
to-morrow
!'
he concluded with animation. `I want action!'
The young men walked together homeward, conversing on
various
subjects, and affectionately parted for the night. Howard went
to his chamber and taking from a drawer a lock of hair, and one
or two trinkets (gifts of love) from Isabel, and pressing them to
his lips with affectionate tenderness, he placed them in a locket
which he bound close to his heart. He then waited until the
house was still, and then stole softly to the apartment of his
parents
,
both of whom he kissed tenderly while they slept and bade
them farewell! He then sought his brother's chamber, whom he
found in fitful sleep, often murmuring the name of Isabel He
stood and gazed on his fevered brow a moment, and then leaving
a fraternal kiss there, softly left the room.
He then took his way silently from the house and walked rapidly
in the direction of the cliff. Here he lingered a moment and fixed
his eye on the indistinctly seen squadron in the Roads.
`Yonder lies my way!' he said in a decided tone. `The fleet
sails not without me! Now, Isabel, one farewell to thee!'
`He took his way to the mansion by the path through the
woodlands
.
All was repose around. He well knew the casement of
her room and he stole beneath it! It was closed and a faint light
shone through the blinds. He listened all was still. At this
moment
the wind gently swung back the blind. She was asleep but
pale! He saw her lips move and knew his name was murmured.
A negro woman was seated by her bedside sleepily, or quite asleep,
waving to and fro above her young mistress's head a plume of
peacock feathers. He obeyed the impulse of his nature and
entered
.
He stood a moment bending over her as she slept. It was
like the calm repose of an infant. He knelt by her side and kissed
her brow and lips. He then rose and said `farewell, Isabel! I
leave thee, but I can never forget thee! Be happy thee and
Duncan
!
for great is the sacrifice I make!'
He again kissed her and was turning away when he heard her
articulate his name. He looked back; but she still slept, and he
knew that she dreamt of him, and his soul was both happy and sad!
From the house he took his way to the beach and soon arrived at
a fisherman's cabin, which stood in a secluded spot under the brow
of the precipice and near the gorge from which the stag had
emerged when pursued by Isabel and her father. The cabin was
silent, and after he had knocked several times he was satisfied it
was untenanted.
Paul has gone out to fish! But why do I wish to see him!
What I do must be done with secrecy and without a confidant!
I will find a skiff somewhere on the beach and go out myself! But
the absence of the skiff will betray my destination.
She
must
believe me dead! I will take no boat, but swim out to the nighest
vessel, which is not more than a mile and a quarter!'
He had no sooner come to this determination, than with the
impulsive
decision of his character, he hastened to a rocky ledge,
which extended a little way into the sea, from whence, after
divesting
himself of his outer clothing, he fearlessly cast himself into
the waves. With a strong arm and a determined spirit he struck
out towards the anchored fleet, and for sometime made rapid
headway
.
But he soon fell into a current setting strongly out from the
river which carried him far to leeward of the fleet, which he soon
found, with his most streneous efforts, he should be unable to reach.
He therefore, being greatly fatigued by his exertions, suffered
himself
to float, borne by the current in the direction of a promontary a
league eastward of the point from whence he had started. Here
he landed just at day break, having been five hours in the water, so
overcome with fatigue, weariness and disappointment, that he
threw himself down in a nook in the rocky shore and fell asleep.
When he awoke it was with a sensation of freshness and vigor,
that showed him he must have slept a long time; and on rising
and looking round, he saw that it was near the afternoon. With a
sinking of the heart, he glanced in the direction of the Road, and
to his confusion and surprise, not a vessel remained at the
anchorage
.
He hastened to the summit of the headland, and turned his
eyes seaward, in which direction he beheld just on the verge of the
horizon, two or three of the slowest sailers of the fleet! He uttered
an exclamation of the keenest disappointment, and was inflicting
upon himself the severest censure, when his eyes fell on a vessel
northward, slowly standing down towards the coast. He watched
this sail with intense interest for more than an hour, and was
satisfied
that it was the brig of war which had been attached to the
Tripolitan Squadron. This discovery gave him new hope; and as
the brig seemed to be standing off and on, as if waiting for
communication
with some part of the shore to the west of him, he
resolved
to make an attempt to get on board of her. About five
o'clock he saw her come to a league above him, and he
determined
to reach her before night, if it was in the power of man to do it.
There was no boat any where within sight, and he traversed the
beach a mile eastward, without discovering one. He retraced his
steps, and proceeded along the coast towards his own house, until
fearful of being discovered, he hid himself and resolved to wait till
dark, and then calculating for the current, go above her and swim
off, and reach her, or perish in the attempt.
While he was watching her from his covert, he saw her fire a
gun, and soon afterwards the boat put off and return with the
Consul
.
He then saw her square away, and stand down along the
shore.
`Now I can reach her, if I make my calculations correctly for
the drift of the current,' he said with animation.
As he flew towards the water, he picked up a paddle, which he
retained to help him in swimming. On the beach he found a heavy
plank, which had drifted there.
`This with the paddle will be all I shall want,' he said with
delight
.
`It will give me height out of the water at least, and I shall
be seen by them if I can get nearer!'
He then launched the plank which just supported his weight,
and paddled himself on this frail vessel boldly out into the bay, so
as to intersect the course of the brig, which was slowly drifting,
their being not wind enough to fill her royals. Before he reached
her, however, the wind rose, as we have seen, and the vessel
began
rapidly to glide away from his grasp. But his final success in
getting on board, has been witnessed by us all.
The sacrifices thus generously made and persevered in by this
noble hearted young man, cannot be too highly regarded! It was
perfect in its plan, and complete in its results. No obstacle
defeated
it! no delay or disappointment or danger, prevented him
from carrying it into effect. Yet he loved her he thus fled from, no
less than Duncan loved her. But his love for his brother, his desire
for his happiness, united with a feeling of injustice towards him in
unintentionally stealing from him Miss Sumpter's heart, inspired
him to this step, and gave him resolution to go through with. All
he now wished was, that he might be supposed to be drowned. He
felt pain at the idea of the grief with which such an idea must
overwhelm Isabel, and in imagination, saw her weep inconsolably
for his loss. But he cheered himself with the reflection that time
would soon heal her sorrow, and that her recusant heart would
return to its first attachment, and that she would be happy, and
restore happiness to the bosom of his brother. And with a manly
resolve, to try and think of her henceforth only as his brother's
wife, he set himself to his duty on board.
The course before him, he cared not what it might be, so that it
were adventures and full of action. He was not reckless, and did
not feal so; for the act which had then cast him upon the world,
was his own, and performed for the noblest end, and with the
noblest purpose! He did not wish his name or family known, and
therefore gave the name of Howard only to the Captain of the Brig.
His whole aim was to be so lost to all his friends search, that he
should be believed to be deadso that the only obstacle to his
brother's happiness might be removed. He did not intend,
however
,
to remain a common seaman, longer than the fleet should
get into active service, when he felt he could come his own way
to distinction.
The brig, the third day out overhauled the fleet, and the Consul
was placed on board the flag-ship. On the first of July the
squadron
reached Gibraltar, and in a few days afterwards dispersed on
different cruising grounds; while the President frigate and the
brig of war, sailed for Tripoli, off which port the former made her
appearance towards the last of August. In the meanwhile the brig
had fallen in with a Tropolitan cruiser of fourteen guns, and after
a close action, within pistol shot, compelled her to strike.
During
this engagement, Howard's bravery and gallant conduct, were
so conspicuous as to draw from the Captain, a public expression of
praise.
The armament of the prize was thrown overboard, and the
vessel
given up to the Tripolitans, as the instructions of the
commander
of the brig would not permit him to send her into port. The
brig then kept on her way towards Malta. The following
evening
just at sun-down, as she was running down within two leagues
of the coast, under a light wind from the South West, a polacca
schooner was discovered creeping along close under the land, in
the direction of Tripoli. Captain Sterret immediately made sail
in chase, and as night set in, had drawn so near as to be able to
discover her to be a Tripolitan. As the wind was light and a strong
current was setting off the land, he found he should have to give
up the chase, as the polacca was propelled along by sweeps, or else
attack her in his boats. This he finally resolved to do. The first
and second cutters, and the launch were immediately manned and
despatched in shore in pursuit.
A low neck of land with here and there a group of date-trees,
upon it stretched along for several miles, with a rocky beach.
Towards
this and into a sort of inlet making up the land, the polacca
was rapidly pulling. The first cutter took the lead and pulled
steadily in, until the increase of darkness rendered the polacca no
longer visible. But by listening, the heavy dash of her banks of
oars could be heard about a mile distant. This encouraged the
pursuing party, and with renewed vigor they pressed on in the
chase. At length the moon rose like a large shield of bronze from
the sea, and flung her golden light over land and water. By her
light, they discovered the polacca making her way up an inlet
which was separated from them by a ledge of black rocks. The
entrance was, after some difficulty discovered, and the boats dashed
boldly through. The inlet was small and on the side to the sea,
defended by a cliff of great height, which flung a dark shadow half
over its surface.
The commander of the boats detained them in the entrance of
this deep, dark gorge, till he could survey its character and the
position of the polacca, which seemed to be anchored not five
hundred
yards distant close in with the shore. With his glass he
discovered
that she was moored close to the rocks, and that her decks were
crowded with men. On the heights back he discovered what seemed
to be lines of walls, and the barricaded outlines of old Moorish
houses, with two or three tall palms towering above. After
having
made his observations, he gave the order to advance and
board!
Simultaneously, with one movement, the armed boats shot
forward
,
and were soon within pistol shot of the polacre, when those
on board, after hurriedly and without effect discharging their
firearms
took to the water and swam to the land, while those on board
the launch and first cutter poured in and took possession. The
second cutter, in which Howard pulled an oar, and which was
commanded by a midshipman, seeing the polacca captured, pulled
across her stern directly for the land.
`Way enough,' he cried, and the bows struck the beach.
He sprung out, followed by his crew, armed with pistols and
sabres
,
and followed up the hill in chase of the flying enemy.
Howard
was foremost in the pursuit, and his eagerness carried him far
beyond the rest, who had been commanded to return to their boats
by an order from the captain. But he had got sight of a
gorgeously
dressed Tripolitan, who had been watching from behind a rock
the fate of his vessel, and whom his approach had started to flight.
Supposing him to be the captain, Howard was anxious to pursue
and capture him. He therefore was heedless of the recall, and
dashed up the hill after him at full speed, with his drawn cutlass
in his hand.
He saw him disappear on the summit in a sort of walled
enclosure
,
into which he fearlessly followed him. It was a ruin. There
were no gates to the entrance, and the moonlight streamed in
through numerous windows upon the brick pavement. In the
midst was a ruined fountain, and around were galleries fallen into
decay. It was evidently a deserted Tripolitan castle, the sea villa of
some powerful Dey. He lost sight of the fugitive in the deep
shadows
of the ruins, and was standing deliberating which way to
advance
,
when the man he was seeking, seeing he was alone, suddenly
reappeared from a recess, and attacked him with a scymeter.
Howard
,
though taken by surprise, defended himself with great
bravery
,
and more than once forced his antagonist, who was a
splendid
swordsman, to retreat to the wall of the ruin. But the clash
of swords drew another man to the spot, when Howard, severely
wounded and overpowered by numbers, was compelled to yield.
He would have been slain upon the spot by the new comer, but for
the interposition of his antagonist, who, impressed by his youth
and gallantry, commanded him to save his life.
`You are brave, and you shall live,' he said to him in French,
with which Howard had been familiar from his nursery. `Ha!
they have fired your polacca, Rais,' he said to the man, a short,
fierce looking Moor. Your sea-cruisers are never safe. I will
ne'er trust another, while I can stride a horse. A good steed is
your only safety! Come, let us to the top of the ruin and see her
burn! The sight will perhaps help your philosophy.'
The Rais, or captain of the polacca, frowned, and fiercely
curling
his mustache, turned on his heel and left the ruin; while
the other, bidding Howard follow him, walked to a spot whence a
view of the scene could be obtained. The atmosphere around grew
more lurid each moment, and at length they saw the cruiser
beneath
them enveloped in flames, which shot up her masts and
wreathed themselves about the spars like serpents. The light
shone far and wide, and the brig was plainly seen lying to outside.
The boats of the brig were all visible to Howard, drawn at a little
distance off from her, but half a mile from him, the men lying on
their oars, watching the spectacle. In a few moments she
exploded
,
and filled the air with blazing fragments. The concussion
was felt at the ruin. The water around her was for an instant or
two dotted with blazing wood or cordage, and then all disappeared
in darkness, leaving the moon once more her empire of the night.
Suddenly the silence was broken by a loud shout from the
Americans
!
Having given nine cheers, they once more bent to their
oars and the three boats pulled out of the inlet to regain the brig.
CHAPTER VIII.
The breakfastHoward's disappearanceThe conjectures
Duncan's suspicionsHe proceeds towards the cliffHe meets
with Hamilton WoodhallTheir quarrelThe fruitlessness
of the searchThe general alarmThe effect upon Isabel
The discovery made by WoodhallThe gull, and Woodhall's
fiendish scheme to ruin DancanHis return, and the effect
upon those present
.
We
shall now return to Duncan, and to the events which
followed
the sudden disappearance of Howard. On rising the
morning
after his parting with him to return to his chamber, Duncan
went to his room for the purpose of saying to his brother that he
had resolved to pass the week which he had promised him to
remain
,
at Norfolk, where he should escape the unpleasant necessity
of meeting with Isabel, whom he felt no wish to see again, now
that he had made up his mind to resign her to his brother. He
knocked twice at the door, and receiving no reply, he opened it
and entered. To his surprise the bed had not been slept in; the
pillow was unpressed! Wondering what could have kept his
brother
up, he hurried down to the drawing-room, expecting to find
him sleeping upon a sofa. But in this expectation he was
deceived
.
Breakfast was, at this moment, announced to him by a
servant
.
`John, is my brother in the breakfast room?'
`No, massa Duncan,' answered the African.
`Have you seen him this morning?'
`I hab'nt seen mass' Howard since I saw him come 'ome wid
you, mass' Duncan, lass night.'
`It is very strange,' said Duncan in an under tone, as he
followed
the slave to the breakfast room. Here were seated his father
and mother. Colonel Dudley was a fine looking military man,
with his hair powdered, his bosom ruffled, and wearing buff
breeches
with silver buckles in his shoes. He was about sixty-five years
of age, but being well preserved, looked not more than fifty. His
air was dignified and somewhat austere, but his manners were those
of a finished gentleman of the `old school.' His lady was tall and
graceful, and at the age of fifty-five retained the graces of more
youthful charms. Her smile was remarkably sweet, and her
manner
affable, gentle, and full of dignity. She smiled on her son as
he entered. He respectfully kissed her cheek, and then bade his
father good morning, which the Colonel acknowledged by a
gracious
paternal nod.
`Where is Howard?' asked his mother, seeing him come in alone,
for generally both brothers rose about the same time and walked
together before breakfast.
`I have not seen him, dear mother. He has evidently not slept
in his bed.'
`He probably remained at Judge Sumpter's,' she said, as if not
surprised.
`No. He came home with me, and we bade each other good night
at the hall stairs.'
`Had he any business that could have called him to town so late
that he should have gone out again?' asked the Colonel, interested
in the inquiry.
`Not that I know of, sir.'
`Has he had any quarrel with any one of late?'
`No, sir, not to my knowledge,' answered Duncan with a
sudden
suspicion. `Yet he may have had. But then he would have
made me his confidant.'
`God in mercy forbid he should have gone abroad to fight a duel,'
cried his mother with intense solicitude.
`I can ascertain, sir, at once,' said Duncan, hastily quitting the
room.
In a moment afterwards he returned and said:
`He has not taken his pistols nor his sword with him.'
`Then he has rode to town,' answered the Colonel.
`John,' said Duncan to the slave, `go and see if master Howard's
horse is in the stable.'
In a few minutes the negro returned with the information that
he was, and that no horse had been taken from the stalls. Duncan
and his parents looked at each other a moment and then sat down
to breakfast.
`He will turn up by and by,' said the Colonel. `It was not
right for him to go off for a night without giving us notice. After
breakfast, you had best ride over to Judge Sumpter's, Duncan, and
see if he is not there. Perhaps he went back,' added the Colonel,
smiling archly as he broke an egg into his glass, `after he had left
you at home, to take a moonlight walk with Miss Isabel! You
know there is a tender attachment in that quarter.'
Duncan felt his temples burn, and was conscious that his mother's
eye detected his confusion. He made no reply, for he was too well
convinced of the truth of his father's words. Mrs. Dudley, after
letting her gaze rest for full a moment on her son's countenance,
which told her of a fact she had not before suspected, let drop her
eyes and said:
`Perhaps Howard has had a restless night, from some cause, and
not being able to sleep, went abroad very early.'
`I think this is the most probable construction we can put upon
his absence,' said the Colonel. `So we will not let it trouble us
any longer.'
Duncan also thought so, and he well knew what was the cause
which had driven sleep from his brother's eyes, were his mother's
suggestion true. He felt that Howard had indeed a deeper feeling
in the matter they had been the night before conversing upon, than
he chose to betray before him.
`Yes, he said to himself, `my generous brother is struggling
between
love and fraternal affection. His love for me will conquer
too, to his own and her misery, unless I myself fly. I will see
Howard, and depart, and remain at Norfolk the week I have
promised
to delay. But where shall I discover him?'
He thought, in his heart, that he had only to ride over to Judge
Sumpter's to solve this query. But there he had not the courage
to go. He had solemnly renounced Isabel to his brother, and he
wished to see no more the treasure that was no longer to be his.
`Duncan, I feel anxious about Howard,' said his mother,
coming
to him as he paced the hall an hour after breakfast, waiting his
brother's return. `I fear some accident may have happened to
him. He may have fallen from the cliff, or been gored by a stag,
or shot himself accidentally with his gun. I wish you would go
forth and seek him; and perhaps you will find him with Isabel
Sumpter.'
The blood flew like lightning to his temples at the mention of
this name, and again the observing mother had her growing
suspicions
confirmed.
`He did not take any of his guns. They are all here. He
may
have gone to Judge Sumpter's. I will walk in that direction. I
will take Scot with me,' he said, glancing towards one of the
servants
,
who, while he was at home, acted as his body servant.
`Follow me, Scott.'
`Yes, massa.'
`Don't drive Belt back; let her come also,' he said, as the slave
would have prevented Howard's greyhound from following.
`It is so strange, too,' said Mrs. Dudley, `for Howard to be out
without Belt. Well, I hope we shall soon hear from him. It is
now nearly eleven o'clock. Hasten, Duacan, for I am full of
fears!'
`If he is not at Judge Sumpter's, let me at once know, Duncan,
said Col. Dudley, with animation, `and I will have a general search
for him. Ascertain if he has been seen on either of the high
roads.'
`I will, sir,' answered Duncan, who had now began to feel
equally
anxious at the absence of Howard. It was very plain to all that
he had not gone away to remain, for he had taken nothing, not an
article of clothing with him; not even his watch, which was lying
on his table, run down.
Duncan, followed by Belt and the negro, walked rapidly along
the winding gravelled walk that bordered the lawn and hedge,
until
it entered the belt of woodland which extended along the ridge
back of the cliff. The forest opened a hundred yards before the
path reached the cliff, leaving a clear space in front, along which
the way led, with a broad view of the Bay. On reaching this open
elevated space, Duncan was surprised to see the fleet, which had lain
at anchor in the Roads the day before, all under weigh and
stretching
sea-ward in a long line, the frigate leading. They were already
far to leeward of him, and the leading frigate was nearly hull
down on the horizon. It was an imposing and beautiful spectacle,
and with an exclamation of surprise and delight he stopped to gaze
upon it. This was the first intimation he had had of the sailing of
the fleet; as he was not up when the signal gun was fired; and
the woodlands covering the ridge had prevented a view of the
Roadstead from the house.
While he was looking at the sight, and letting a suspicion slowly
steal into his mind that Howard's disappearance had something to
do with the sailing of the fleet, he was made conscious that he was
not alone, by a voice addressed to him.
`A fine show, Dudley! You should have been here to have
seen them get under weigh! They've got a fair wind, and by
sundown
will be ten leagues out to sea!'
Duncan had already recoguized the voice to be that of Hamilton
Woodhall; a young man for whom he had no very great liking;
knowing him to be a person of dissolute morals, and altogether
destitute of character, though belonging to a highly aristocratic
family. He therefore dryly replied, without turning his head,
`Yes, sir.'
Woodhall bit his lip and muttered, `haughty!' But he was not
one readily abashed or put down. He thought, in the vanity of his
heart, that Duncan's dislike to him originated in a feeling of rivalry,
of which Miss Sumpter was the object He again spoke.
`Miss Sumpter should be here to see this magnificent spectacle!
She has a fine taste, and is a devilish fine girl!'
Duncan turned round and fixed upon the speaker his full dark
eye, and for quite a minute removed not his stern, withering glance
from his face. His lips parted to say something, but he was silent,
and contented himself with turning away with a contemptuous curl
of his lip. It seemed desecration to him for such a man to utter
Miss Sumpter's name, and in such a flippant, impertinent way.
`Humph! You don't seem to be in the best of humors this
morning, my lord Dudley,' said Woodhall, in ironical allusion to
Duncan's known relation to a noble English family.
`You are impertinent, sir,' said Duncan, with a flashing eye.
`I was merely jesting,' said the young man, stepping back a
pace for better security; for he felt he could not safely discharge
the little spite of his heart upon him.
`Then jest with thy fellows,' answered Duncan.
`Where is Howard? I can get along with him! We are
friends!'
`My brother Howard hath both chavity and patience, and may
endure thee. Hast thou seen him this morning?' asked Duncan,
eagerly.
`No. But I was going to tell him I had a pair of pup
stag-hounde
to sell, and that he shall have them at a fair price.'
`My brother is not at home,' answered Duncan, `nor has he been
this morning. I am now seeking him. He is probably at Judge
Sumpter's.'
`No. I came past there! I asked the servants if he was there,
and they said no; for I thought he might be there, and save me a
walk. You know he is in love with Miss Isabel, and she with
him,' he added in a significant tone, and watching with secret
delight
the effect of his words.
`This is nothing to thee, sir; and the less Miss Sumpter is
alluded
to, the better and safer it will be for thee,' said Duncan,
menaceingly.
`I take no threats from any man,' responded Woodhall,
doggedly
.
`If you like blows better they shall be at your service on your
next offence,' answered Duncan, fixing upon him his eyes so sternly
that those of the young man fell; and walking slowly away he
muttered,
`You shall one day repent this insult! I will move all hell,
Duncan Dudley, but I will bring down your proud neck!'
Duncan smiled scornfully, and continued on his way along the
cliff, insensibly taking the path leading to Judge Sumpter's. The
sight of the house before him only brought him to a consciousness
of the direction he was taking.
`Why should I go thither?' he said, `Hamilton Woodhull says
he has not been there. Scott!'
`Massa,' answered the negro coming up from behind, and taking
off his hat.
`Go forward and see if Master Howard has been to the Judge's
this morning. Be sure that you ascertain certainly.
`Yes, Massa,' answered the negro putting on his hat and
starting
forward.
`Scott.'
`Massa.' answered the black, taking off his hat again and
making
a bob bow.
`You need not say I am here. Go and return to me directly.'
During his absence Duncan, with Belt lying on the grass
watching
him, paced to and fro in the path near the seat where he had
met Howard and Isabel on his return home. He recalled this scene
with pleasure and pain. The return of his servant interrupted his
reveries.
`Well, Scott!'
`De Judge say how he hab seen notin' ob Mass Howard dis
day.'
`And'Duncan hesitated a moment and then continued, `Miss
Isabel, Did you sce her?'
`Yes, I did, Massa Duncan.'
`Well what did she say?' asked Duncan impatiently.
`She was little sick, lying on um sofy in de parlor. And when
I axes for Mass Howard and tells the Judge as how he was loss
since last night, she scream and run to me and axes me twelve an'
a hundred question `bout him? But Mass Judge quiet her, and
tell me to go back, and when I find Mass Howard to let him know.
Dem's what Miss Isabel say, Mass' Duncan.'
`It is plain her life is wrapped up in his; and that she can never
be mine,' he said bitterly. `But what can have become of my
brother? I begin to fear the worst. Strange suspicions agitate
my mind, which will not be driven out! If he comes not and we
hear not from him to-day I shall be confirmed in them! But I
cannot
harbor them now. I will hasten home and learn if intelligence
has not, by this time, been received from him! If not, then shall
I fear, what I begin to suspect, that my brother has sacrificed
himself
by sudden flight ornohe cannot have taken his life! I
will think no more of it!'
On reaching home, he found that Howard had not arrived and
that nothing had been heard from him to account for his absence.
His information that he had not been to Judge Sumpter's increased
the solicitude of his parents; and after advising a few moments
with Duncan, Colonel Dudley ordered the alarm bell of the estate
to be rung. When all the negroes were assembled to the number
of three hundred he selected fifty of the most intelligent and
despatched
them in every direction through the forest and along the
sea-shore in search of him, with instructions to leave no crevice
or nook unsearched. But night approached and no discovery had
yet been made of anything which could afford a clue to his
disappearance
.
The alarm of Colonel Dudley and his lady had
extended
itself to Judge Sumpter and other neighbors, who were
assisting
in the endeavor to ascertain the fate of Howard; the
generally
prevailing suspicion now being that he had been murdered
or fallen into the sea. Isabel was only prevented by coercion
from going forth to prosecute the search; and she remamed at
home, walking the hall, in a state bordering upon frenzy;
questioning
every returning servant with an energy as if her life hung
on his reply. Duncan was scarcely less calm; for he dearly loved
Howard, and he believed that for his sake he had thus disappeared.
The woodlands, the more distant forests of the domain, the bay
shore for a league, had been traversed without any vestiges of him
The sun was just setting when the several parties accidentally
met at Judge Sumpter's, and reported to Colonel Dudley who,
with Duncan was there, their total want of success. It was about
a quarter of an hour before this time that a young man, rather
shabbily dressed in faded fashionable attire, and with a face bloated
by dissipation, who had been engaged very officiously in the
search for Howard, only for the gratification, it would seem, of
returning
every half hour to Judge Sumpter's to tell Isabel he was
not yet found; and to have her thank him warmly, and bid him
again go upon the search with the others.
This was Hamilton Woodhall. He was now traversing the
beach on his way to make his usual report for the sake of speaking
to Isabel, when a while object at a distance on a rocky ledge
attracted
his eyes. He hastened towards the spot, and as he
approached
he discovered it was a gull, which some one had shot,
and which had fallen there. He was about to return when his
eye fell on another object beyond the gull, which caused him to go
on and examine it. As he approached he saw that it was a pile of
garments and a hat. He flew forward and reached the spot where
they were, hid by the spur of the ledge from view of any one on
the beach. To his surprise he saw that they were the coat, vest,
hat and boots of Howard Dudley.
He stood for a moment gazing at them with astonishment.
`Here is a mystery!' said he. `Here are his clothes, where can
he be? But I will examine in the pockets.'
In the vest he found a folded note. On it was some writing
with a pencil. They were addressed to Duncan Woodhall was
not scrupulous and read as follows:
`
Dear Brother
: I have seen enough of your feelings and
deep emotion at the discovery of Isabel's passion for me, to know
how much your happiness depends on regaining her entire
affection
.
It is true I love her. But what is my love compared with
yours for her. She was first yours and she shall still be yours.
I have, therefore, determined to remove what I sincerely believe
to be the only obstacle to the re-union of your heartsmyself!
To night I go without leave-taking. Her I could not bear to part
from;
you
would not let me go! I did intend at first to depart
unknown to all and let it be supposed I was deadhad
accidentally
fallen from the cliff and drowned. But I could not bear to
grieve you with this idea. I therefore leave this note, which I
have written rudely to-night on the rocks here, to tell you that I
intend to swim to the fleet, and commit my destiny for the future
to it in its active service in foreign war. Make no efforts to
regain
me, if the fleet should not sail before you get this. But I
wish that Isabel should believe me dead! It is only with this
belief
that her heart will return to you. Therefore let her know
nothing of my fate. Let it remain in mystery. She may grieve,
but time will heal her sorrow. I shall bury mine in
action
. This
secresy on your part, dear Duncan, will only render the sacrifice
I am making of any avail. Believing I live, she will still, I fear,
withhold her heart; and I wish her to give it to you freely and
entirely. Do you not owe to me, the sacred compliance with this,
my last request? Now God bless you both, and make you both
happy, is the prayer of your affectionate brother,
Howard
.
P. S. After I hear of your marriage, I may return! Till then
you will not hear from me.
Hamilton Woodhall read this note to its close, and then stood
thoughtfully gazing upon it for some minutes immoveable. At
length the thoughts it gave birth to in his depraved mind, found
utterance.
`This little paper now unravels the whole of the mystery,' he
said in a tone of intense satisfaction. Howard has got aboard the
squadron, and is now ten leagues a-sea!' (But at the moment he
was speaking, Howard was within half a mile of him, just
prepairing
to launch his plank for the brig, which Woodhall plainly
saw not two miles from him, but which did not attract his
attention
,
so wholly absorbed was he with his discovery.) `Well, he is
a fool and that is my opinion! Here he has given up Miss
Sumpter
whom he loved, and who loved him in return, to that haughty
brother of his, Duncan, because he happens to be also in love with
her. And that Miss Isabel may have nothing to tempt her, he
swims a mile or two to get on board of a ship and get out of her
way, leaving Duncan a clear coast. This is dn handsome to
say the best of it, but it is what I call being a confounded fool.
But that's his look out. He's gone, and his absence is all in my
favor as well as Duncan's, who shall not have the whole field to
himself, if I can help it!'
Here he stopped and seemed to be impressed with some sudden
idea, which from his manner, must have promised to himself the
most important results. All at once his gray eyes flushed, while
his eyebrows lowered darkly over them like an assassin's. He
compressed his thin lips with vindictive resolution, while his hands
were nervously clutched together.
`I have it!
I have it!
' he muttered through his shut teeth,
looking
stealthily around him, as if he feared the winds and the waves
should catch his words, and bear them to human ears. It shall be
done! Then without a rival, Isabel Sumpter is
mine!
Ha, ha!
Proud Duncan Dudley! I have you in my power!' And he
laughed
inwardly with malicious joy. `Now for the first step!'
In furtherance of his dark purpose, whatever it was, which he
had resolved to achieve for the ruin of his enemy and rival, he
took up Howard's coal, and after rending the sleeve and collar, he
rubbed it forcible along the rocks. He tore the rest in a similar
manner and bruised and battered the hat. He then put stones in
the boots and dropped them in the water saying:
`These I will sink! They might weaken the evidence instead of
increasing it! Now for the gull which Providence seems to have
sent here expressly in my behalf.'
He then went for the gull, and opening its breast with a knife,
sprinkled the blood over the vest and coat and hat, the latter
saturating
so that the lining on the inside was crimson. Having done
this he buried the bird in a crevice of the ledge, and covered it
from sight by throwing stones upon it.
`Now,' he said with fiendish exultation, after carefully washing
the blood from his fingers, `now have I done it in so effectual a
manner, that I feel as if I had really murdered Howard myself!
If he gets through this clear, then it will be because he gets the
devil to help him!'
With these words Hamilton Woodhall gathered up with a stick
the hat coat and vest, and took his way along the rocks to the
beach, and thence up the pathway along the cliff leading to the
mansion of Judge Sumpter. It was just sun down when he
arrived
at the house, in front of which was Colonel Dudley and lady,
surrounded by their-friends, just getting into their carriage to
return
with heavy hearts to their home.
`Dere come Mass' Woodhall, Massa Colonel,' said the
coachman
.
`He runnin' and hab someting!'
Colonel Dudley drew back the foot which he had placed on the
step of the carriage, and looked in the direction his servant
pointed
,
towards which all eyes were now turned Woodhall was not a
little gratified to find himself the object of general attention, and
full of the importance of his discovery he advanced towards them,
endeavoring to conceal his malicious pleasure at the effect he was
about to produce under a look of deep sorrow and sympathy.
`What have you found?' asked Duncan with quickness, making
a step towards him!'
`What you same folks would like should have remained unfound,'
rejoined Woodhall, with a significant glance, which Duncan did
not understand, but which, nevertheless, made him feel
unpleasantly
.
`And what is it?' questioned Judge Sumpter, impatiently.
`Do you know whether that is Howard's cast or not?' asked
Woodhall, holding up the bloody and torn garment before Colonel
Dudley.
`I should not know my own in such a condition,' he answered
with a pale countenance, and catching at the carriage door for
support.
`Is that his vest?' asked Woodhall coolly, displaying the vest
stained with blood.
`It is, it is!' shrieked Mrs. Dudley, and Isabel at the same
moment
!
`My son is dead! Howard is murdered!'
`Here is his hat which I also found!' he said.
Duncan snatched the ensanguined hat from him, and glancing
inside, dropped it from his hands, and pressing his forehead
groaned
,
fell his whole length upon the ground, insensible to the shrick
of Isabel and of his mother which pierced the air.
CHAPTER IX.
The investigationHamilton Woodhall's narrativeThe
astonishment
of DuncanHis resentmentThe examination by
Judge SumpterWoodhall relates his visit to Judge Sumpter's
His entranceHe overhears Duncan and IsabelThe
effect
of his statementDuncan is suspectedHis arrest
Isabel believes him guilty
The
manner and situation in which Hamilton Woodhall had
found the bloody hat and vestments, were briefly detailed by him
to Colonel Dudley, Judge Sumpter, and other gentlemen who
were present; and the conviction was, that he had been
murdered
.
`There can be no doubt of it, gentlemen,' said Woodhall, in
wardly rejoiced at the success of his fiendish deception; `see the
back of this coat! It has plainly been dragged over the ground,
and when Howard was in it! The buttons are scratched as if with
gravel! And the hat has mud upon it!'
`It is very clear,' said Judge Sumpter, with deep
commisseration
in his tones and looks, as he glanced at Colonel Dudley, who
stood gazing upon the vestiges of his son with stupefied
amazement
.
`It is very clear that my young friend Howard, has been
vilely murdered.
`Murdered! my brother murdered!' murmured Duncan, who
had been partially restored, and now started from the arms of
his-friends
who were supporting him.
`There can be no doubt of it, my son,' said his father! `he has
been decoyed from the house, and brutally murdered upon the
beach! These bloody clothes bear stronger testimony to the deed
than human language!' And the old gentleman brushed the tears
from his eyes, and tried to address a word of consolation to Mrs.
Dudley, who sat in the carriage overcome with the most violent
grief. Duncan glanced at the garment of his brother as they lay
upon the ground, and with a groan of horror turned away and
wept like a child.
`Have you any suspicion, sir, who could have been the
perpetrator
of the deed?' inquired Judge Sumpter of Hamilton
Woodhall
.
`Do you know if he has recently had a quarrel with any
person?'
`No, Judge, I do not,' answered the young man hesitating, and
then glancing at Duncan slightly but significantly.
`Did you search for the body?'
`No, sir! As soon as I found these, I hastened to let you
know!'
`Search must be at once made for the body. Besides we would
like to see the spot where the clothes were found! Would you
not Colonel?'
A general assent being given, the whole party proceeded to the
beach, and were guided to the spot on the ledge by Woodhall, who
explained to them the situation of things as he pretended to have
found them, as clearly to establish their convictions that he had
first been murdered and then dragged violently over the rocks.
Search was made for the body until too dark to discover any
object
,
and they prepared to return and defer further search until
morning.
`His body was probably thrown into the sea at ebb tide, in which
case it would have been carried down the bay, said Woodhall;
and I don't think any body 'll be likely to see it again. Or
perhaps
they carried it out in a boat and sunk it with rocks.'
This opinion was plausible and was received by them all. And
they returned slowly to the house of Judge Sumpter, under the
melancholy conviction that by foul hands, the noble and generous
Howard hed been made way with.
`Now to discover the murderer,' said Judge Sumpter, after they
had entered his drawing-room.
`This I fear will be difficult,' said Colonel Dudley, pacing the
floor between indignation and grief, while Duncan stood by a
window
,
his fraternal bosom torn with a thousand conflicting emotions
at the extraordinary event. The idea that Howard might have
made way with himself once entered his mind, but was rejected
with horror, while a moment's reflection showed him that it must
have been by violence at other men's hands. He was bewildered
with doubt and grief; while his heart bled for Isa bel, whose sobs
he could hear from her apartment, mingled with the weeping of
his mother. He was startled by Hamilton Woodhall's reply to
the remarks of Judge Sumpter:
`Not so difficult neither, Judge, as people would imagine,' was
his reply in a tone and look of mystery.
`Why have you suspicions of any one, sir?' quickly demanded
the Judge, while the eyes of Duncan, and of all others in the
apartment were turned upon him.
`Why not exantly, Judge. But '
`Well, sir; for God's sake speak out!' cried Colone! Dudley,
stopping in his walk across the apartment, and fixing his eyes
earnestly
upon his face.
`If you know any one likely to have committed this murder, for
murder it plainly ispoor Howard! It is your duty to name him,'
said the Judge with impressive authority. `You said that it would
not be difficult to find out the perpetrator!'
`And I repeat my words,' answered the young man doggedly,
not pleased with the manner in which he was addressed. Proud
and sentitive, and knowing he was not entitled to respect, he was
ever irritated when he thought it was wanting towards him. `It
is my opinion you will not have to go very far to find the
murderer
!'
and his eyes again glanced towards Duncan with that covert,
significant expression which he had before noticed so unplesantly.
`Then you know the man?' said the judge with surprise.
`I only have my suspicions,' answered Woodhall, cautiously.
`It is your duty then, to make them known,' was the answer of
Judge Sumpter and other gentlemen present.
`I only suspect from what I have overheard between him and
another person!'
`Between who and another person? You are very mysterious
in your language.'
`Unless I can receive the courtesy due to a gentleman, Judge
Sumpter, I shall decline any further conversation on the subject,'
he answered moodily.
The Judge was about to reply warmly by reminding him that
it was in his power to arrest him and detain him to answer; but
having some knowledge of the disposition of Woodhall he merely
remarked mildly,
`It is is not my intention to treat you with any disrespect, Mr.
Woodhall. You know we are all deeply interested in this painful
affair.'
`It makes my heart bleed to think of it,' answered Woodhall,
willing to be conciliated. `Poor Howard! I knew him well!
We were great friends. It was a vile murder!'
`On whom do your suspicions rest?'
`Perhaps it might not be exactly safe to mention names,' he
answered
,
again fixing his eyes with more marked significance upon
the face of Duncan, who was standing near, waiting the issue with
impatient anxiety. The direction of his eye was noticed by all,
but gave rise to no suspicion. Duncan felt the glance, and was
trying to understand its meaning, when Judge Sumpter continued,
`We are all friends here, Mr. Woodhall. You can speak with
perfect security. While you are delaying here the assassin may
effect his escape.'
`He has'nt escaped yet, nor will he, I think. He believes no
one can suspect him, and feels secure as you or I. But there's
more known than he thinks for,' and again Hamilton Woodhall's
glance rested full upon the face of Duncan, and he smiled
significantly
.
`What do you mean, sirrah,' demanded Duncan angrily, `thus
glancing repeatedly at me with eyes full of secret malice?'
`I did not look at you! It must have been your own conscience,'
he answered with provoking coolness.
Duncan was about to strike him in his impatience, when Judge
Sampter restrained him.
`Be temperate, my friend. He tries us all! If he answer not
soon. I will have him arrested, and put him under oath.'
`If you arrest any body, Judge, it will not be me. The man who
murdered Howard Dudley
stands there!
'
He pointed with an emphatic gesture, as he spoke, full at
Duncan
!
There was a general exclamation of indignant surprise at
this bold charge, and for a moment all were thunder-struck at its
audacity. Duncan started, as well he might, and after surveying
his accuser a moment with indignant contempt, he relaxed the
hand which he had clenched to fell him to the earth, and smiling
scornfully, he turned away. After a few moments silence, during
which the eyes of all had been moving alternately from one to the
other, Judge Sumpter, in a voice of stern displeasure addressed
Woodhall, who stood calm and unmoved, and in a confident
attitude
,
as if he was ready to maintain his words.
`Young man, this is trifling! Some private malice hath led thee
to this! We are not to be deceived by such groundless
accusations
!'
`I am ready to re-assert and maintain it,' answered Woodhall
firmly. `Duncan Dudley, who stands there, is the murderer of
Howard Dudley!'
His tone and manner seemed to carry conviction with them.
Every one fixed his eyes upon Duncan, who, after recovering from
his susprise at this repetition of the charge, stood silently and
proudly looking with wonder and astonishment at his accuser.
`This is becoming serious,' said Judge Sumpter in a low voice
to a gentleman near him.
`It is indeed a grave charge, but it is groundless, I am
convinced
,'
was the answer in the same tone.
`So am I, answered the Judge. `Young man, you have made a
weighty accusation against Mr. Dudley. You are aware of the
difficulty in which you have involved yourself unless you are
prepared
to substantiate your charge. Something more than mere
suspicion must be advanced to shield yourself from the
consequences
of criminal proceedings against you?'
`I have not made my accusation idly, nor from any private
pique,' answered Woodhall quietly. `What I have asserted I
believe
to be true, and when I have stated my reasons, I feel I shall
be acquitted of any intention of wronging Mr. Dudley without
cause, and prove to all present that in making the accusation I
have, I have been influenced only by the motives which should
govern the conduct of every good citizen.
At this speech Duncan was filled with indignant astonishment,
mingled, nevertheless, with not a little curiosity to know what he
would bring against him to give the least color to such an
extraordinary
accusation.
`It is false! He shall not speak! Duncan is innocent! The
rascal should be driven hence by the dogs!' cried old Colonel
Dudley
with uncontrollable resentment.
`It is necessary, Colonel,' said Judge Sumpter, `in justice to
Duncan, that we should hear what he has to say, that suspicion
may be wholly removed from your son's character.'
`Well, well! Let him speak! And when he has done I will
force the dog's words back again down his throat!'
Woodhall smiled inwardly at the consciousness that he had the
power of humbling the father and son, and said, in a calm voice:
`I have publicly charged Duncan Dudley, who stands there,
with being the murderer of his brother, Howard Dudley. I will
now give my reasons for making this accusation. While Duncan
Dudley was at home, during the college vacation, a year ago, he
became
deeply attached to Miss Sumpter, and betrothed himself to
her. During his absence they corresponded as lovers do!'
`Impertinent slave!' cried Duncan, advancing towards him, as
if he would have torn him in pieces.
`Patience, Mr. Dudley! Let him go on!' said the Judge.
There is nothing told I know not already.'
Duncan with difficulty suppressed his wrath, and Woodhall with
a vindictive smile, went on.
`A change at length came over the affections of Miss Sumpter.
Howard had become her companion instead of Duncan, and
insensibly
he stole her affections from his brother. He did it
ignorantly
,
not aware of his brother's regard for her, for I know, from my
knowledge of his character, and of his love for his brother, he
would never have been more than a brother to her. At length
Duncan returned and discovered the true state of affairs. At first
he was not angry with Howard or with her; but waited to assure
himself of their sincere attachment. He was at length satisfied
that their happiness was bound up in each other, and that to
interrupt
it would make them miserable!'
`How knew you these were my thoughts sir?' demanded
Duncan
with a surprise that for the moment overcame his disgust for
Woodhall.
`By accidentally overhearing you talking aloud to yourself, as
lover's sometimes do, in the forest path, one evening, as I was
passing.'
`Rather hideing to listen,' answered Duncan contemptuously.
`But proceed with thy pleasant tale!'
`You will find it less agreeable as I proceed,' answered
Woodhall
casting upon him a look of fiendish triumph. `This seemed
to be his first feeling and it was honorable to him. I give him
credit for it, as every gentleman would! But as day after day he saw
Howard and Isabel'
`When you speak of that lady, you will call her Miss Sumpter,'
said the irritated Duncan.
`Your interruptions will not prevent me from telling all, Mr.
Dudley,' answered Woodhall. `He became dissatisfied with his
brother and envious of him; and having an interview with Miss
Isabel (if that name will suit Mr. Dudley) he was convinced that
if his brother was out of the way, he could win back her affections,
without which it was very plain he could never be happy!'
`You will keep your reflections to yourself!' cried Duncan
chafing, and with difficulty restrained by his friends. `I cannot,
gentleman, suffer this vile wretch to desecrate thus the most sacred
feelings of my nature! Are you willing this should go on? Judge
Sumpter can you suffer this fellow, to speak thus freely of your
daughter?'
`It is painful my young friend; but the charge against you is
very serious, and it is proper that you and your friends should know
all the grounds upon which it stands. You will oblige us by being
brief, Mr. Woodhall! Come to the point!'
`I will, sir! Last evening about this time, perhaps a little earlier,
I called here to see Judge Sumpter about a pair of hound-pups I
have. The hall door was open and I knocked but brought no one.
I heard persons talking in the room, and supposed it was you sir,'
he said looking at the Judge, and your daughter, `I walked into
the hall and laid down my hat. I was then stepping towards the
door which was open, when I heard Mr. Duncan Dudley's voice!
There was no light in the room, nor in the hall. It was
twilight. I had got to the door when I heard Mr. Dudley's
voice, and not wishing to interrupt a
tete-a-tete
, I hesitated and
was about to return, when I heard him say in a very impassioned
tone:
`You love me then, Isabel!'
`Yes, Duncan, I love you as I ever did, and with the same
degree
of affection. I only love Howard more! I knew not all my
heart's depths when I first gave it to you. What I gave you, you
still have. What I have given to Howard you knew not of!'
`What you gave me then,' he said to her, `was enough to make
me happy then, it is enough to make me blessed now! I envy not
Howard the deeper place he hath discovered in thy heart, so thou
givest me the place that was mine.'
`It is thine, as ever it has been, Duncan,' she said in a voice of
deep emotion.
`Then but for Howard,' he said with earnestness, may I hope
you would still have been mine?'
`Yes,' she answered faintly but firmly.
There was a pause during which I was about to retire, for I had
been an involuntary listener, when I heard him say, `I have one
question to put to you, Isabel; answer it truly.'
`I will,' she replied but her voice trembled.
`Would you have been true to me if Howard had not sought her
heart?'
`Yes; next to him you are most dear to me!' she answered him.
`Thanks, thanks!' he said warmly. `One more questions!' Here
his voice fell but I distinctly heard him say:
`If Howard were awayif he were
dead
, would you still love
me and be mine?'
Here there was a perceptable emotion and movement among all
present; and all eyes were fixed earnestly on Duncan, who stood
petrified with amazement. The interest was now painfully
intense
.
Woodhall saw the full extent of the impression he had
made and triumphed in his dark spirit.
She replied with a perceptible shudder at the idea, in the
affirmative
.
`Then Howard alone stands between me and your true and
whole affection?' he said.
`Yes, Duncan,' she answered him,' but why such dreadful
questions;'
`Only to relieve my self-love and pride; for I had suspected the
cause might lay in some dislike to me!'
`No, oh no!' was her earnest reply.
`I trust then that circumstances will yet restore you to me,' he
said to her in an impressive manner.
Up to this sentence it will have been seen that the accuser kept
tolerably well within the bounds of the truth; though leaving out
much that would have redounded to the credit of Duncan's heart,
and twisting other parts to suit his evil purpose. He said nothing
of Duncan's intended departure, but as will be seen, gave an
entirely
different character to his closing interview with Isabel. He
thus continued:
`What do you mean?' she cried as if astonished at his words as
I was myself.
`Nothing,' he answered carelessly; `but Howard you know is
adventurous, and some accident might bafall him, such as falling
from a cliff or '
`Foul-mouthed fiend! I will pluck thy lying tongue from thy
throat!' cried Duncan springing upon him. Two or three
gentlemen
drew him back, while he received so severe a reproof from
Judge Sumpter that he felt the tide of prejudice was flowing strong
against him. He folded his arms, and sternly and silently awaited
the issue.
`What strange words are these? exclaimed Miss Sumpter.
`They have no meaning! he said with a laugh. `Say you will
be mine Isabel
mine
but for Howard!'
`I have said it, Duncan, but'
`I could not hear the rest he said; but he made some inaudible
reply which seemed to throw her into the greatest agitation. Suddenly he broke from her and rushed from the apartment through
that window, when Miss Sumpter uttering a loud shriek fell
lifeless
upon the floor! I flew to her assistance, and had just raised
her upon a sofa when you, sir,' looking impressively at Judge
Sumpter, came in alarmed by your daughter's shriek!'
`Is this last fact true, Judge Sumpter? asked Colonel Dudley,
in a hoarse voice.
`It is, sir! I was in my study and heard the shriek, and when I
came in, I saw Mr. Woodhall bending over my daughter.
`And you asked me the cause of it?' said Woodhall eagerly.
`I did.'
`And I said briefly that there had been some misunderstanding
between her and Duncan Dudley.'
`That was your answer,' said Judge Sumpter.
There reigned for a few moments a dead silence throughout the
large apartment. Eye met eye unconsciously, and all looked
grave-Duncan
Dudley stood like one entranced. He had been utterly
confounded with surprise and astonishment, as Woodhall's
testimony
gradually unfolded itself! He saw at once his unpleasant
position. He remembered his words to Isabel; but how had
villany
and conspiracy turned them against his own life! He felt
that he could not deny having said them, and that the
circumstances
were strong against him. Yet his emotions were not those
of fear and alarm! In the consciousness of his innocence, he
believed
that all others would regard Woodhall's words with the
same sentiments of contempt he did himself. But when he looked
round and met the various looks of surprise, suspicion, horror and
grief fixed upon him, he was roused.
`Can it be possible,' he said, looking round upon the ten or
twelve gentlemen present, his eyes flashing, `that there is one
individual
here present, that can for a moment give harbour to the
suspicion this vile fellow's words would seek to establish! He is
only worthy of the contempt of every honorable mind. Yet I
meet glances whose expression tells me I am really suspected of
my brother's murder! Is it not quiet enough for me to know that
he had been basely slain, that I must have my sorrow invaded by
the suspicions of my friends?'
`But, Mr. Dudley, the evidence is very strong,' said Judge
Sumpter, mildly. `You doubtless are innocent of this crime! I
believe you to be! We all believe you to be. But you must
confess
that circumstances are strong against you!'
`I do,' answered Duncan more calmly.
`It therefore is necessary, your own honor demands it, that this
matter should be fully understood. Did you have a conversation
with my child last evening, as has been stated? This is no
tribunal
!
we are friends only solicitous for your honor!'
`Did you make use of the words, that he has reported.'
`Part of the conversation this honorable eaves-dropper has
correctly
stated. More he has garbled; more maliciously mis-stated,
and much he has invented with no other motive, I now plainly
discern than to injure me!'
`One part of the conversation is only of importance. Did you
say to my daughter `if Howard were
dead
would you still love me
and be mine?'
`I did,' answered Duncan calmly.
Every person in the room gave a start, and his father groaned
deeply. Hamilton Woodhall looked round with a triumph he
could ill conceal.
`This is unfortunate,' said Judge Sumpter, shaking his head and
giving Duncan a commisserating look.
`The question was asked in a morbid state of feeling, only to
secure additional support to my pride and self-love, as he has had
the grace to mention,' answered Duncan. `It is well known to
all how fondly attached I was to my brother, and that my life at
any time would have been sacrificed to save his.'
`But love and rivalry make a great change in such feelings,
even between brothers,' said Woodhall. `But I have not done,
gentlemen! As soon as I could I followed him, thinking over
what I had heard, and resolved to give Howard, for we were great
friends, warning! So you see, gentlemen, I had even then my
suspicions; but I must confess I was not prepared for quite so
sudden a catastrophe as has taken place! Poor, Howard! Well,
I followed him; but it was sometime before I found him, when I
saw him and Howard standing together in the path on the cliff,
talking. It might have been then about nine o'clock. I watched
them, for I had my doubts and expected some mischief. At length
they had high words.'
`'Tis false!' cried Duncan, in a tone of thunder. `Our
interview
was full of kindness and brotherly love!'
`Then you confess having been with your brother on the cliff
after nine o'clock last night?' said Judge Sumpter, very gravely.
`I do. After I left Miss Sumpter, having taken leave of her,
with the intention of departing the country the next day, my
brother overtook me, and generously offered to resign her. This
I would not consent to; and told him of my intention. This was
the subject of our conversation. We returned home together,
and parted in the hall for the night, since then I have not seen my
unfortunate brother.'
`Now what further have you to say, Mr. Woodhall,' said the
Judge, who by general consent had been suffered to pursue the
inquiries
.
`They had high words, though I could not distinctly
understand
what was said, and then walked homeward together. I saw
them till they entered the forest path by the cliff-head, and seeing
they were quiet, walking along without speaking, I said to myself,
`He will not do it to night, and to-morrow I will caution
Howard
!
As it was late I then went to the Stag Inn, and lodged,
instead of going home. Whether they went strait home or not is
best known to Mr. Dudley.'
Here the wily villain cast a significant look upon Duncan, and
every eye followed the direction of his own.
`This is an unpleasant business, Mr. Dudley,' said Judge
Sumpter.
`Gentleman, I am innocent! This is a conspiracy of fiendish
malice and vindictive revenge against me, by this miscreant. I
repeat to you, with a blush of shame, that your unworthy
suspicions
,
should compel such an avowal from me, that I am innocent
of this crime; if my brother be murdered!'
`No man, Mr. Dudley, is above suspicion. The circumstances
are very clear, and strengthened by your own confession of
having
proposed a benefit to yourself on the supposed condition of your
brother's death. It is unfortunate, very. But I fear it will be my
duty, holding as I do the commission of the Peace, to detain you
on this charge.
`Impossible,' exclaimed Duncan, with undisguised amazement,
while grief and anger struggled in his expressive face.
`It nevertheless is my duty.'
`My father! do you regard me as guilty? Say you believe me
innocent!' he cried, clasping his hands.
`I do, my son! But suspicions are strong, and it is your duty
to submit to arrest that you may be acquitted by the law of the
land.'
`I submit, sir,' answered Duncan, firmly; and folding his hands
upon his heart, he quietly yielded himself a prisoner.
`You must be detained as a witness, Mr. Woodhall,' said the
Judge; `or give bonds for your appearance.
The intelligence of his arrest was soon conveyed to his mother
and Isabel by Judge Sumpter. His mother believed him innocent;
but when he was told that Isabel uttered curses upon his head as
Howard's murderer, his heart sunk within him, and with a
desponding spirit he suffered himself in silence to be led away to
a felon's cell.
CHAPTER X.
The trial of DuncanThe evidence of WoodhallIsabel's
condemning
testimonyThe defence of DuncanHe is found
guiltyThe effect upon IsabelThe sentenceDuncan in
prisonChange in public opinionPetition for his pardon
The pardonThe tragic fate of WoodhallThe
departure
of Duncan in search of HowardThe Tripolitan cavalry
chiefThe conclusion
.
There
are some men who rise by the fall of others. Such a
person
was Hamilton Woodhall. The prominent position he had
taken in the late events, made him for the time a conspicuous
individual in the neighborhood. He was resolved, too, that it
should not be his own fault if he sank again into his former
insignificance
.
After the arrest of Duncan he made himself very busy
deepening the prejudice against him. There was not an inn
within
ten miles where he had not held forth to gaping listeners,
repeating
with fresh embellishments, each time, the story of his
discovery
of the clothes; nor was there a private family in the
county
which he could have the least claim or color to call upon,
into which he did not intrude himself to strengthen the impression
against Duncan. His visits to Judge Sumpter's were frequent,
but he had not yet had an opportunity of seeing Isabel, who had
been confined to her chamber, extremely ill, after the excitement
she had gone through. She passed her days in mourning the fate
of Howard, whom in a sort of delirium she addressed as if present,
in the most touching manner; and then suddenly changing her
manner, she would break forth into the wildest invectives against
Duncan as his murderer.
`Yes, yes,' she would shriek at such times, `you did say those
words, and you meditated his murder! But know, that you have
my curse instead of my love!'
Three months elapsed, during which period it was the firm
conviction
of all men that Duncan Dudley was the murderer of his
brother
.
At length the day of his trial drew nigh. Isabel had been
summoned as a witness. She had now so far recovered as to ride
and walk out, leaning upon her father's arm. It was her firm
conviction
that Duncan was guilty. But her anger and horror had
gradually softened down to pity and tender interest as she
reflected
that it was for her love he had imbrued his hands in blood. But
she felt she could never forgive him; and when once he sent to
her to request her to visit him in his cell, she firmly refused.
`Let him restore me Howard,' she said with tears.
At length the morning of the trial came. The popular
excitement
was intense, and long before the hour of opening the court,
thousands were gathered about the doors. They were at length
thrown open and the multitude filled the house. The Judge took
his seat upon the bench, and the prisoner was brought into court.
His demeanor was calm and dignified. He had resigned himself
to his fate. But conscious of innocence he was upborne by a
strength from within that the guilty never know. His appearance
prepossessed all in his favor. The case was now called, and the
first witness was placed upon the stand. It was Hamilton
Woodhall
.
His manner was jaunty and defying; and a sinister smile
was visible on his lip. He looked round and assumed a bullying
air to conceal his want of manly confidence. He looked the most
like a criminal. He turned pale when the oath was administered,
and meeting Duncan's clear eye fixed upon him, he looked down.
His testimony varied considerably from what he had formerly
given
,
for he now omitted his exaggerations and malicious
inventions
.
He, however, struck to that part in relation to Duncan's
words on the supposition of Howard's death. But on the whole,
his testimony made under oath was so different from what it had
been voluntarily at other times, that the circumstances in every
candid mind were much weakened against Duncan's guilt.
Isabel was then placed upon the witness stand, supported by her
father, who was not the presiding Judge at the trial. She was
calm and collected; but her extreme paleness showed that it was
with the greatest effort she could command herself. Her
testimony
put the affair in its true light, and gave a true account of what
transpired between her and Duncan, at their last interview. But
it confirmed the testimony of Woodhall, in the question put to her
by Duncan, involving a supposition of Howard's death. Once,
during the delivery of her testimony her eyes met the tender,
reproachful
gaze of Duncan's, and such was the effect upon her that
she would have fallen but for the support afforded her by her
father's
arm.
The testimony for the prosecution having been gone through,
Duncan rose to speak in his own defence. His address was
manly
,
eloquent, and carried conviction of his innocence to every
unprejudiced
mind. He spoke affectingly of his love for his brother;
and how for that brother's happiness, when he discovered his
attachment
for Miss Sumpter, he had so far from wishing his death,
resolved the next day to take his departure from the country, that
he might be no obstacle in the way of the youthful lovers.
`I made this intention known to my brother, that night when we
were conversing upon the cliff, and it was his warm and positive
remonstrances against it, which the witness chose to represent as
high words of quarrel between us. The absence of my brother is
as great a mystery to me, gentlemen of the Jury, as it is to all of
you. I do not believe that he has been murdered! I believe that
he lives at this moment, though perhaps in a distant land. I know
my brother's generous nature so well, that it is my firm conviction,
that when he discovered my deep and prior attachment to Miss
Sumpter, and my resolve to leave her that I might not interfere
with his, that he anticipated my intention and secretly departed
himself. It will be remembered that there was a fleet in the Roads
which sailed the day he was missing, and he could easily have got
on board of it undiscovered. It is my firm conviction that he did
so. You would ask me to explain then the fact of his clothes
having been found, torn and bloody upon the rocks. This may
have been a ruse of my brother's to put an end to all hope in the
mind of Miss Sumpter. If, as I believe, he swum out to some
vessel, his hat, coat, vest and boots, would have been the garments
he would necessarily leave behind him. You have here at the
bar for inspection, only the three first named articles. But I have
testimony to prove that his boots were found near the same spot;
and the witness is now in court to produce them!' Here Duncan
looked at Judge Sumpter, who on being sworn testified that he had
found the boots with a rock in each at low tide, within a yard of
the spot where the clothes were discovered. He then produced
them to the inspection of the jury.
`Now, gentlemen of the jury, if I had murdered my brother, I
should have had no motive in pulling off his boots afterwards;
neither his coat nor vest. If I had sunk the boots, why did I leave
the clothes in open view upon a rock. It is plain that my brother
disrobed himself and swam to some one of the fleet. I believe the
boots were with the clothes and were sunk by the finder, because
they would not assist his story. I repeat gentlemen, my firm
conviction
that my brother is not murdered. It is your duty to prove
the fact of murder, before you can convict me of crime!'
The address of Duncan had an extraordinary effect. The idea
that he might not have been murdered, had not once entered the
head of any man. Now that it had been suggested, it seemed
plausible. No one could help contrasting Duncan's manly and
open language, with the shuffling, shifting testimony of Woodhall;
and popular feelings began to waver.
The Judge now delivered his charge to the jury. It was
doubtless
meant to be impartial, but its bearing was rather against the
probability of the prisoner's innocence. His honor had seen in the
course of his judicial experience, too many bad cases seem good
ones, by smooth and ingenious defences; and he was suspicious
even where truth lay at the bottom. The more ingenious and
plausible the defence, the more positive he was of the prisoner's
guilt.
`You must not give undue weight,' he said in conclusion, `to
the fraternal attachment previously existing between them.
Circumstances
of a trivial nature, as all of you must have experienced,
often interrupt this. And what cause so potent as that where the
heart is interested and brother becomes a brother's rival! You
have seen that the testimony of the first witness, in that most
important
part of it which relates to the language of the prisoner to Miss
Sumpter, when he asked her `if she would be his in case his
brother were dead,' is corroborated by the second witness in almost
the precise words. This testimony is all important. You will not
forget to connect with these words of the prisoner, his interview
with his brother immediately afterwards, during which high word's
were interchanged; and that this conversation is testified as having
taken place near the spot where the bloody garments of the
deceased
were found by witness. And the fact that the prisoner was
also the last person seen in the company of the deceased, is also
strong circumstantial evidence in corroboration of his guilt.'
The jury retired and after half an hour's absence, returned into
court, and after resuming their seats in the midst of a profound
silence, Duncan was commanded to rise and hear his sentence.
`Gentlemen of the jury,' said the Judge in a tone of solemn
emphasis
;
`do you find the prisoner guilty or not guilty?'
Duncan looked the foreman full in the face as he answered, in a
firm, unhesitating voice,
`
Guilty!
'
Duncan did not move his eyes from the face of the foreman for
the space of full a minute, during which he regarded him with an
expression of undisguised surprise. He had evidently not
anticipated
this. His emotion could not have been ascertained from his
countenance, for it was as pale and moveless as marble. But the
agitated heaving of his chest showed that he was moved greatly
within, from the very foundations of his being. The full extent of
her testimony had not forced itself upon Isabel's mind, until this
terrible announcement fell upon her ear. She had only thought of
Howard, of his dreadful end and her loss! She had not given a
thought of the consequences that were suspended on the
assumption
that Duncan was the murderer. The gallows and a public
execution had not entered her mind! Now all rushed upon her!
And the impression, too, filled her mind, since Duncan's defence
that Howard lived! She was overcome by the agony of the
conflicting
feelings that flowed in upon her, and shrieking aloud,
`I too am become a murderer!' she fell senseless upon the floor.
She was borne from the court nearly lifeless, followed by the
pitying and loving eyes of Duncan, who but that he was a prisoner,
would have obeyed the impulse of his soul, and flown to her. He
did not know that she had expressed a wish before she was
summoned
,
to bear testimony against him. But this knowledge could
not have changed his affection; He knew that she believed him
guilty; and sorrow, not anger, filled his bosom.
`Prisoner, stand and receive your sentence,' said the Judge.
Duncan rose and looked upon the Judge with a firm
countenance
,
and with an air of impressive dignity. But it was plain
that it cost him a strong struggle to seem thus calm. After briefly
touching upon the chief points of the convicting testimony, and
showing in strong colors the heinous character of the crime of
which he had been convicted, the Judge thus concluded:
`Therefore, in atonement to the laws of the land which you
have openly violated by the commission of a great crime, and of
which you have been this day convicted by a jury of your peers,
you are condemned to incur its penalty; which is
death!
You
will now be taken in custody of the sheriff to the prison whence
you were brought, there to remain until Friday the seventh day
of March ensuing, when you will be led forth to execution between
the hours of ten and twelve in the morning, to be hung by the
neck till you are dead, dead, dead! And may God have mercy on
your soul!'
This sentence was pronounced amid a most profound silence
throughout the court, and was listened to by Duncan with
calmness
.
The court then adjourned, and the prisoner was
reconducted
to his cell.
Left alone, Duncan for a few moments remained wholly over
come by his feelings. But strong in the power of his innocence,
he shock off this weakness, and, walking to and fro in his cell,
began calmly to survey the whole ground of past events, and the
result was his firm conviction that Howard had voluntarily fled,
and was then alive! This conviction strengthened itself in his
mind the more he thought of it, and the reflection,
notwithstanding
the dark cloud that hung over his own head, was a source
of joy to him.
`If I die, Howard will hear of my sad fate, and his presence here
will prove to the world my innocence and its own injustice. I shall
not die leaving a felon's memory behind me! My innocence will
be proclaimed as wide as my crime hath flown! If Howard
return, and with Isabel be happy in their mutual love, then shall
my death be welcome. She, at least, will weep over my grave,
and my memory will be blessed.'
It was night, three days after his trial. A carriage suddenly
stopped in front of the prison. In a few minutes after the jailor
ushered into the cell a veiled female. It was Miss Sumpter.
`Duncan,' she said, as the door closed on them, `Duncan,' and
she fell on her knees at his feet. Her sobs prevented her from
articulating more.
`Isabel, this is kind to visit me,' he said, tenderly! `Calm
yourself
!'
And he raised her from the stone floor.
`I will. I have come to ask you to forgive me!'
`I have nothing to forgive, Isabel!' he replied, in a kind tone.
`I am your murderer! I believed you guilty; and in a feeling
of strange, wild vindictiveness, I cursed you, and desired to bear
evidence against you! But I was mad! I had lost Howard, and
I forgot all else in him! I knew not the consequence! I have
suffered, oh, I have greatly suffered for it. Duncan, I cannot live
unless you say you forgive me!'
`You are not an offender, dear Isabel! I can easily understand
your feelings. Circumstances, too, have been strong against me,
in proof of which I am now under sentence of death. Do you
believe me guilty?'
`Nooh, no!' she said, carnestly. `Forgive me that I have
done so! Oh, say I have your forgiveness!'
`You have, dear Isabel!'
`I am happy then! I know you do not despise me! I have
wronged you from the first, noble Duncan! I ought to have been
true to you in my affection! I ought to have crushed in the outset
all wandering of the heart towards Howard! I was fascinated!
I was weak! I was guilty! But I have your forgiveness!' she
said, with such intense emotion that he trembled for her reason.
`Yes, all and freely. Be calm, I entreat you, Isabel!'
`Duncan,' she said, with startling energy, `I not only do not
believe you guilty (God forgive me that I ever should have
cherished
the thought!) but I do not believe, oh joy! I do not believe
that Howard is dead! I believe he lives, and that we shall yet see
him again!'
`This is my own firm conviction,' he said, with solemn
earnestness
.
`I think he escaped to the fleet!'
`And so do I and also my father, since your defence. He has
already written to the Mediterranean, to the commander of the
squadron, to ascertain if any intelligence of him can be elicited
before the day of'
Here Miss Sumpter stopped, trembled, hid her face in her hands
and groaned with anguish.
`Let not this distress you! I fear not to die! But I trust my
innocence may be established before it is quite too late!'
`You shall not die! I will throw myself at the feet of the
President
!
I will implore, I will entreat, I will obtain your pardon!
You must not die!'
`But death were preferable to life, with the stigma of crime
upon my name! No, Isabel! Do nothing further than your father
has done, and thank him from me for his kindness. My father
and mother also believe me innocent, and are persuaded that
Howard
lives! This assurance, with the consciousness of my
innocence
,
supports me in this hour of trial!'
`Oh, that I should have increased the load of your sorrow!'
`Think no more of it! The assurance of your sympathy'
`Call it not coldly thus, Duncan!' she said, reproachfully. `It
is
love!
Your danger has told me how truly I love you! I now
see that I have erred in turning from your noble affection to
Howard's
bewildering passion! Through all my delight in the idea of
being loved by him, I know my heart was thine still! It is thine
now! It shall be thine forever!'
`But I am a felon condemned to die!' said Duncan, scarcely able
to restrain his heart's deep joy at the return of his wanderer!
`I care not for this,' so I can hear thee say that your heart will
once more be opened to receive me!'
`It will, it will, dear Isabel!' he said clasping her to his breast.
`It has ever been open to thee, ever been true to thee! But, alas!
if Howard lives and comes back, am I not robbing him in taking
thee to my bosom!'
`No, Duncan. If Howard lives, it is that he has voluntarily
departed that he might return me to you! It will make his
generous
spirit happier to see me thus lying on your true and manly
breast than to fold me his bride to his own heart! Henceforth if
he be dead, his memory shall be to me as that of a brother; if he
is living he should be to me as a brother dearly loved for his sake
and thy own. Am I forgiven and accepted, dear Duncan? Is the
heart that first throbbed for me beating as in former days, true and
strong with love to me? for mine hath found its resting place.'
Duncan replied only by folding her more closely to his doting
heart.
The day of execution approached, and as the time drew night, the
opinion that Howard Dudley might still be alive, gained ground.
It prevailed among all his friends and even the press advocated it.
The result was that a petition was drawn up and signed by a large
proportion of the citizens of the county praying for his pardon.
It was successful, and the pardon arrived on the very morning of
the execution, while his parents, Judge Sumpter, Isabel and other
friends were present, either to take their last leave of him or
conduct
him away in triumph. On its being read, Isabel shrieked
with joy and threw herself into his arms. Duncan received the
announcement with that dignity and self-possession which had
characterised his conduct throughout. He was at once escorted
to the carriage of Judge Sumpter amid the cheers of a numerous
multitude, who had not only imbibed a strong impression of his
innocence, but had assumed at once with the fickleness of popular
prejudices as the alternative the
guilt of Hamilton Woodhall!
This
impression spread rapidly among the crowd assembled to the
execution
,
and soon became general.
This individual in achieving the condemnation of Duncan
had effected a purpose that gave him no little satisfaction. He had
avenged himself for the contempt with which Duncan had treated
him, and he triumphed over his fall. But the conviction
of Duncan was but a secondary object to one of primary
importance
.
He had got him out of the way that he might safely
address
Miss Sumpter, whose fortune made her hand a desirable
acquisition
to a young man of his broken fortunes. He, therefore,
waited only a day after Duncan's conviction, before he presented
himself at the residence of Judge Sumpter. He was well received,
for his conspicuous part in the late events had thrown him more
familiarly into his society and that of other gentlemen. His efforts
and artifices to obtain an interview with Isabel, safe in her father's
presence, were all in vain. At length his visits became so
frequent
and his manner so pointed, that Miss Sumpter could not be
blind to his object. She, therefore, studiously shunned him; for
she never endured him, and the part he had taken in the
condemnation
of Duncan, so far from commending him as he hoped, to her
good graces, only roused in her bosom emotions of disgust.
The day before that set for the execution of his victim he called,
and entered the drawing-room unannounced. He surprised her
in tears! She would have fled but he detained her by calling
her by name.
`Sir!' answered Isabel proudly.
`May I ask why you avoided me! I had hoped that I stood
better
in your opinion.'
`Sir, I look upon you as little better than Mr. Dudley's
murderer
,
if he dies,' she said almost fiercely. `Your testimony was
a false representation of facts, and through all I have discovered
a fiendish disposition on your part to destroy him.'
`But I firmly believed that he murdered Howard!'
`It is false! It is my belief, sir, that you stained with blood
and bruised the clothes you found, to effect the end you have
plainly sought to achieveMr. Dudley's ruin! It is like your
nature, sir, to do it and I believe it! Else' here she fixed
upon him a look beneath which his own hardened glance fell,
`you yourself are the murderer!'
With these words Miss Sumpter left him standing alone and
overpowered with surprise and conscious guilt. He remained a
moment in the attitude in which she had left him, and terrible
fears took possession of his bosom. `Can she have seen his note?'
he muttered to himself. `It can't be, for I destroyed it soon
afterwards
!
Yet how should the woman have guessed so near the
truth! I see I have no chance here after all! She is proud as
Lucifer! If this idea should get abroad I had best take myself
off. The country will be too hot to hold me! Especially if they
should get this pardon. I must be cautious, I see!'
With these reflections he left the house and proceeded
homeward
,
or rather towards the Stagg Inn, where he lodged.
It was towards this Inn, on the night of the day the pardon was
sent to Duncan, and while he was surrounded in his father's house
by numerous congratulating friends, that a band of gentle
looking
young men might have been seen cautiously approaching.
They surrounded the house, and three or four of them entering,
they drew Hamilton Woodhall from a crevice in the garret
whether
he had flown for concealment, and dragged him forth into the
road. It was in vain that he plead for mercy. They mounted
him upon a horse and escorted him to the village, where a
attribunal
was erected beneath the very gallows on which Duncan was
to have paid the forfeit of his life, for a crime of which he was
innocent
.
Here before a judge chosen by the young men, and the
populace, Hamilton Woodhall was arraigned to answer, as he was
told, for the murder of Howard Dudley. In a trembling was he
protested his innocence. The opinion had gone abroad that he
had stained the clothes with blood; and he was now called upon
to tell the truth. Here a rope was put about his neck, and he was
adjured to make a clean breast, or suffer death upon the spot.
The result was a full, but trembling confession of the whole
truth, with the use made of the blood of the gull, and the motives
which led him to seek the ruin of Duncan. Every word of the
confession was extorted from him by piece-meal, with the rope
straitened to his neck.
`Now, gentleman, said a young man, who had been a chief
examiner
in this well-conducted court of justice, for justice was
at least found here, `what should be the punishment for such
flagitious
villany? I had a knowledge of the true facts of the case,
from an account given me from an old deaf negro-slave, who only
yesterday heard of the conviction of Mr. Dudley, and learned the
facts. He then came to my uncle and told me he had shot a gull,
as it proved on the very day of Howard Dudley's disappearance,
when he was out in his fishing boat, and saw its fall upon the
ledge. That he continued fishing awhile and then paddled in
shore to get it, his course leading him under the rocks, a part of
the time out of sight of the spot where the bird lay. He had
emerged near it when he saw a man whom he knew to be
Hamilton
Woodhall, with the gull in his hand. He stopped his boat
and watched him from behind the rocks, when he saw him cut
open the bird and sprinkle the blood on some clothes and a hat he
had in his hand. He then saw him throw the bird into a crevice
and hide it with stones.
On hearing this, I went with the old man and found the bird
where he said it had been hid. It was not decayed, and its breast
had plainly been out open: Old Paul's testimony would not be
received in a court of law, we all know; but we reeive it here in
our court of Justice. Acting on his testimony I suggested this
arrest
and examination. You perceive, gentleman, that it is
corroberated
by the confession of the culprit himself. Now, what
sentence
is commensurate with his crime? He has not murdered
Howard Dudley, I am satisfied; for that gentleman has in all
probability absented himself from the generous self-sacrificing
motive, stated in his brother a defence. Now what is your
decision
,
gentlemen of the jury, for I address the whole multitude. Is
the prisoner guilty or not guilty?'
`Guilty!' was the simultaneously reply from a thousand voices.
`Mercy! mercy!' cried Woodhall in imploring accents of
agony.
`You showed no mercy! But for the Governor's clemency your
victim would have been dead this day beneath this gallows. Ask
no mercy here, catiff! What shall be his sentence?' demanded
the young man again of the multitude.
`
Death
!
The Gallows!
' swolled upon the air in one deep
voice from the stern throng of men.
`Mercy! mercy!' shricked Woodhall, endeavoring to loosen
the noose that was drawn tightly around his neck by the hands of
three men on the other side of the beam.
`Say your prayers, you have but a minute longer to live,' said
the young man determinedly. When the shadow of the moon
touches that nail you swing!'
The wretch glanced a moment at the moon in the skies, shrieked,
clasped his hands, and began to supplicate for mercy of those
around him in the most heart-rending accents of terror.
`The minute 's out! Up with him!' cried the young man in a
strong clear tone.
`Hold!' cried a voice, clearer than his own, in the throng.
`Will you do murder, my friends! Make me a passage through!'
The rumor of what was going on in the village had reached
Col onel Dudley's and instantly Judge Sumpter ordered his
carriage
,
saying it must be stopped. The other gentlemen mounted
their horses, and Duncan with them; but his anxiety to prevent
the fearful tragedy gave impetus to his course and he first reached
the ground. The shricks of Woodhall pierced his ears before he
came in sight of the gallows, where a glance showed him the
crisis of things.
At the sound of his voice, the men who were drawing upon
the rope involuntarily suspended operations to learn what it
meant. In the interval of delay he gained the foot of the gallows;
and without more ado, throwing himself from his horse, he with a
knife severed, the fatal rope.
`What madness is this, my friends!' he said, looking around.
`We were but administering justice to this scape-gallows,
Duncan
,'
said the leader. `We have proved him a conspirator against
your life.'
`It would have grieved me much, if this thing had been done.
I know he is a wretch and has been set on against my life by
malice
!
But I for give him freely, and think you will all do so, for my
sake! What he has suffered to-night will be a healthy lesson to
him. Nothing more could have been gained by his death. Let
him live; for life; with the scorn that will follow him, will be to
him worse than death, So, my friends, if you wish to punish him,
herein your end will be answered!'
There was at first some murmuring and loud objections, but
these subsided, and soon after he had ceased speaking, the air was
rent with loud acclamutions, in which Duncan's name was
repeated
with every note of pupular applause. Three cheers were then
given to him, and after thanking them in a neat speech he turned
to Hamilton Woodhall who had stood, trembling but silent and
self-condemned near, him.
`Now, sir, mount my horse and ride for your life! Take this!
and he forced a purse into his hand.
The terrified man did not wait to be twice bidden, for
notwithstanding
the diversion Duncan had worked in his favor, the
demonstrations
of hostility among the surrounding crowd were too
palpable and too alarming to be disregarded.
`Mr. Dudlev, I owe you my life!' said Woodhall, as he was
about to leap into the saddle, `It is my belief your brother lives!
In his pocket I found a note which I afterwards destroyed. It was
addressed to you, and stated that it was his intention to swim off
to one of the vessels of war, and leave the country. I believe
that he did so. I have confessed already to these demons here
that I sprinkled the blood '
Here he could say no more! The groans and cries of the throng
alarmed him for his safety, and leaping into the saddle he galloped
away through the space Duncan had opened amid the crowd.
There was seen the bright flash of one and then another pistol
from the midst of the crowd, none knew whence. The horse
suddenly
reared into the air, a wild cry like a yell rung upon every
ear, and Hamilton Woodhall was seen to reel and tumble dead
from his horse!
`He has it now,' said the young man, who had been so
conspicuous
as the leader of the lynching party.
`It's a pity; but he has revealed to me an act of villany I did
not suspect! He has his deserts. I knew not how dark a villain
he was! But he had done me a service for which I can forgive
him all the past. My brother lives! He told me Howard left a
note in his vest for me, stating that he was about to swim to a
vessel
of war and leave the country. This note he said he destroyed.
Oh, the artful fiend of private malice! But 'tis past. My brother
lives!'
`Here is your horse, Mr. Dudley, said a man leading his startled
horse towards the spot where he stood.
`And Woodhall!'
`He was a dead man before he left the saddle, sir.'
CONCLUSION.
The
intelligence that Duncan conveyed to his parents and Isabel
that his brother lived filled them with deep joy. He now resolved
to take measures at once to discover him. This his fraternal love
would have led him to do; but it was necessary for his own honor.
It is true he had been pardoned by the Executive; but pardon
necessarily
implies guilt; and in this respect his position was only
on a level with any pardoned criminal who had been really guilty
of a murder. It was true that his friends believed him innocent
but there were many who also believed him to be guilty. It was
therefore necessary, aside from all the inducements of affection, for
him to produce his brother.
For this purpose he proceeded to New York and took passage for
the Mediteranean, with letters from the Secretary of the navy to
Commodore Barron, of the squadron in those seas, recommending
him to him, and desiring him to afford him every facility in the
prosecution of his search. On reaching the Mediterranean,
Duncan
found the President's frigate was at Syracuse, where he joined
her. Six months had now elapsed since the fleet had sailed from
the Roads. Commodore Barron made every inquiry in his power;
but it was some weeks before Duncan could gain intelligence from
all the vessels of war, ss they were dispersed on different stations.
From neither of the frigates could he hear of any one coming on
board in the Roads. At length Commodore Barron received a
letter
from Lieutenant Sterret of the Enterprise, in reply to one he
had written, in which he stated that such a person had come off to
the brig in the Roads, and that he was four months ago taken
prisoner
in a brush on shore, with the crew of a Tripolitan polacca.
It would take another volume to recount the various adventures
through which Duncan passed in search of Howard, and the scenes
through which the latter passed during his captivity. After four
years' search Duncan discovered him the leader of party of
Moorish
cavalry, who came as an ally of General Eaton in his romantic
attack upon Derne, which expedition Duncan had joined with the
hope of entering Tripoli with it.
The brothers met side by side in scaling the fortress of the town.
Howard in his mustache and Moorish costume, was unrecognised
by Duncan, whom he instantly recognised, and called him by name.
Duncan suspended a blow in the air, he was about to deal upon
the turban of a Tripolitan, gazed an instant into his brother's eyes,
caught his smile, and with a glad cry cast himself into his arms.
The two brothers returned to the United States together, but
Howard was accompanied by his bride, a beautiful Greek girl,
whom he had recaptured from a slave caravan, and whose bright
eyes and thousand charms made him forget Isabel. The innocence
of Duncan was now like the sunlight, and all men sought to atone
for their suspicions by paying him marked public honors. His
marriage with Isabel was celebrated with great magnificence, and
during the evening Howard and his dark-eyed bride performed a
graceful Greek dance. Thus happiness, peace and honor were
once more restored to bosoms so lately darkened by grief and
suspicions
of guilt; and Duncan, from having known misfortune, had
learned how to receive and enjoy the calm delights of prosperity.
Let the reader, from the facts here recorded, long pause before
he condemns another from the evidence of circumstances,
however
strong and convincing they may appear in his own eyes and
those of the world.`When you return, dear Duncan, we shall have much more of
each other's society than before; for Isabel Sumpter has taught
me to love in-door pursuits. Would you believe it! I can sit in a
room with her a whole morning, without any wish to go out, shine
the sun never so brightly. The other day when I was walking
with her, `Belt' started a hare and instead of joining him in the
chase, I called the dog away, because Isabel was talking, and I
had rather listen to her. I think she has grown much more
beautiful
.
Her step is just like a deer's! and every motion is as
graceful
as a fawn's! I think when you see her you will fall in love
with her. I am sure I love her she is so very lively and
entertaining
always. I dont know what I should do without her, she is such
clever company. She can shoot a rifle nearly as well as I can, and
is a most accomplished fisherman, or fisherwoman, perhaps I ought
to say. I am glad you are to take your degree and come home so
soon. We shall have fine times! Father, says something about
sending you to England; but I think you have got learning enough
for one head! There are a great many things I dont know, that I
find Isabel knows, but I get along very well; though sometimes,
she condescends to enlighten my ignorance, at which times I am,
she says, a very apt scholar. It is so pleasant to be taught by a
pretty girl! You had better come home and be her pupil, than go
any where else. Five words from her give me more insight into a
thing than a whole book would do! You didn't have an opportunity
in the little time you were here, of knowing her so well as I do,
and I want you to see how she has improved in the year you have
been absent. But I am engaged to ride with her to the cliff-head
at five o'clock, and it is now half past four. So good bye.'
Howard
.'